<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89421-0030 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.4-21-89.f2.A1029</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 54, No. 76 / Friday, April 21, 1989 /Proposed Rules <ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Coast Guard</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">46 CFR Parts 30, 31, 33, 35, 70, 71, 75, 78, 90, 91, 94, 97, 107,108, 109, 112, 154, 160, 161, 167, 168, 188, 189, 192, 196, and 199 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[CGD 84-069] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="91">RIN 2115-AB72 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Lifesaving Equipment </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Coast Guard, DOT.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Notice of proposed rulemaking. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>This notice proposes a complete revision of the lifesavingequipment regulations for tank vessels, cargo and miscellaneous vessels,mobile offshore drilling units, passenger vessels, nautical school ships,offshore supply vessels, and oceanographic research vessels. The primarypurpose of the project is to implement the provisions of the new ChapterIII of the Safety of Life at Sea Convention 1974, as amended in 1983, whichcame into force July 1, 1986. The proposed rules would also implement anumber of recommendations arising from major vessel casualties. Lifesavingregulations for Great Lakes vessels and certain vessels in domestic tradewhich are not covered by the Safety of Life at Sea Convention would alsobe revised to require more effective lifesaving equipment. The proposedrules also reorganize the lifesaving regulations in order to simplify,clarify and reduce redundancy. A number of specification regulations forCoast Guard approved equipment will also have to be revised to meet thenew Safety of Life at Sea Convention requirements. Those revisions willbe proposed under additional notices at a later date.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATE: </T2>Comments must be submitted on or before August 21, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESSES: </T2>1. Comments should be mailed to the Commandant (G-LRA-2/21) (CGD 84-069), U.S. Coast Guard, 2100 Second St., SW., Washington,DC 20593-0001. Between the hours of 8:00 a.m. and 3:00 p.m. Monday throughFriday, except holidays, comments may be delivered to, and are availablefor inspection and copying at, the Marine Safety Council (G-LRA-2/21) Room2110, U.S. Coast Guard Headquarters, 2100 Second St., SW., Washington,DC, (202) 267-1477. 2. The revised Chapter III of the Safety of Life at Sea Convention is publishedby the International Maritime Organization (IMO) in Volume I of the ``1983Amendments to the International Convention for the Safety of Life at Sea,1974'' (SOLAS 74/83) (IMO publication 096 83.10.E). IMO also publishesthe ``Recommendation on Testing of Life-saving Appliances'' and the ``Codeof Practice for the Evaluation, Testing and Acceptance of Prototype NovelLife-saving Appliances and Arrangements'' in a document titled ``Testingand Evaluation of Life-saving Appliances'' (IMO publication 982 85.02.E).These publications, and other IMO documents referred to in this notice,are available from: a. The International Maritime Organization, Publications Section, 4 AlbertEmbankment, London SEl 7SR, England. The price of publication 096 83.10.Eis andCx.13;2.50 or the dollar equivalent at current exchange rates. Publication982 85.02.E is andCx.13;4.00. If payment is by check, it must be drawn ona United Kingdom bank. The price includes surface mail delivery. Airmaildelivery is available at extra cost. b. New York Nautical Instrument Co., 140 West Broadway, New York, NY 10013,(212) 962-4522. c. Southwest Instrument Co., 235 W. Seventh St., San Pedro, CA 90731, (213)519-7800. d. Marine Education Textbooks, 124 North Van Ave., Houma, LA 70360-3866,(504) 879-3866. e. Baker-Lyman andamp; Co., 308 Magazine St., New Orleans, LA 70130, (504)522-0745. 3. This notice refers to two technical reports. These reports have beenplaced in the docket for examination and copying. A limited number of singlecopies is available free of charge from Office of Marine Safety, Security,and Environmental Protection, Survival Systems Branch (G-MVI-3), U.S. CoastGuard Headquarters, 2100 Second St., SW., Washington, DC 20593-0001. Thereports may also be purchased from the National Technical Information Service,Springfield, VA 22161, (703) 487-4650. The reports are: a. ``Shipboard Training and Maintenance for Merchant Vessel Survival Equipment'',October 1979, Report No. CG-M-1-80, NTIS Accession number ADA100528. b. ``Transitory Fire Resistance of Tanker Lifeboats'', February 1980, ReportNo. CG-D-19-80, NTIS Accession number ADA084257.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT: </T2>Mr. Robert Markle, Office ofMarine Safety, Security, and Environmental Protection (G-MVI-3), Room 1404,U.S. Coast Guard Headquarters, 2100 Second St., SW., Washington, DC 20593-0001,(202) 267-1444. Normal office hours are between 7:30 a.m. and 4:00 p.m.,Monday through Friday, except holidays.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2>On June 17, 1983, the IMO MaritimeSafety Committee approved SOLAS 74/83, including a new Chapter III (LifesavingAppliances and Arrangements). Under the SOLAS ``tacit amendment'' procedure,SOLAS 74/83 was deemed to be accepted on January 1, 1986. There were noobjections from any contracting government. Therefore, the new requirementscame into force on July 1, 1986 for the United States and all other contractinggovernments. Ships whose keels were laid or which are at a similar stageof construction on or after that date must comply in order to qualify fora SOLAS Safety Certificate. In addition, some of the operational requirementsapply to existing ships on that date, and some equipment requirements willbecome effective for existing ships on July 1, 1991. SOLAS 74/83 appliesto self-propelled merchant vessels on international voyages, except for(1) Cargo ships (including tankers) under 500 tons gross tonnage and (2)Fishing vessels. The Coast Guard announced a series of meetings with the U.S. LifesavingManufacturers Association in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>of July 30, 1984 (CGD 84-051, 49 FR 30339). Theimplications of the SOLAS 74/83 Chapter III requirements on Coast Guardapproved lifeboats, inflatable liferafts, and their launching equipmentwere discussed. Guidelines for lifesaving equipment manufacturers werealso developed covering the additions and deviations from present regulationsthat are necessary to meet the new SOLAS 74/83 Chapter III. The rules proposedin this notice reflect some of the discussions held at those meetings.The Coast Guard published an Advance Notice of Proposed Rulemaking (ANPRM)on this project on December 31, 1984 (49 FR 50745). That notice describedthe major changes under consideration, and invited comments on the proposals.Twenty-two parties offered a total of 106 separate comments. Those submittingcomments included nine vessel operators, five industry associations, threedrilling companies, two equipment manufacturers, one union, one shipbuilder,and one interested individual. Two of the comments generally supportedthe regulations, while none opposed the concept in general. The remainderof the comments either supported or opposed particular parts of the ANPRM,or suggested changes. These comments are covered in the appropriate sectionsof the following discussion on the rules proposed in this notice. The Coast Guard also published an Advance Notice of Proposed Rulemaking(ANPRM) on Offshore Supply Vessel Regulations on February 14, 1983 (48FR 6636, Coast Guard docket CGD 82-004). That notice proposed a new SubchapterL on offshore supply vessels that included lifesaving equipment requirements.This notice supercedes the lifesaving equipment proposals under CGD 82-004.A notice of proposed rulemaking (NPRM) on offshore supply vessels willbe published later that will reference the regulations proposed in thisnotice for lifesaving equipment requirements. The inspection and operationalrequirements for lifesaving equipment on new offshore supply vessels willbe addressed in the NPRM under CGD 82-004, taking into consideration thecharacteristics, methods of operation, and the nature of their service(see 46 U.S.C. 3306(f)). The rules proposed in this notice do not cover small passenger vesselsinspected under 46 CFR Subchapter T. Proposed lifesaving equipment regulationsfor small passenger vessels were published on January 30, 1989 (54 FR 4412)as part of a comprehensive project to revise Subchapter T (CGD 85-080,RIN 2115-AC22).Interested persons are invited to participate in this rulemaking by submittingwritten views, data or arguments. Comments should include the name andaddress of the person making them, identify this Notice (CGD 84-069) andthe specific section to which each comment applies, and give reasons forthe comments. If an acknowledgment is desired, a stamped, self-addressedpost card should be enclosed. The proposal may be changed in light of commentsreceived. All comments received before the expiration of the comment periodwill be considered before final action is taken on this proposal.No public hearing is planned, but one may be held if requested in writingand it is determined that the opportunity to make oral presentations willbenefit the rulemaking process.A regulatory information number (RIN) is assigned to each regulatory actionlisted in the Unified Agenda of Federal Regulations. The Regulatory InformationService Center publishes the Unified Agenda in April and October of eachyear. The RIN number contained in the heading of this document can be usedto cross reference this action with the Unified Agenda.<ITAG tagnum="84">Drafting Information</ITAG>The principal persons involved in drafting these regulations are Mr. RobertMarkle, Project Manager, and Lieutenant Commander Don M. Wrye, ProjectAttorney, Office of the Chief Counsel.<ITAG tagnum="84">General Discussion of the Proposed Regulations</ITAG>This notice proposes a complete revision of the vessel lifesaving equipmentcarriage regulations in CFR Title 46 for tank vessels, cargo and miscellaneousvessels, mobile offshore drilling units, passenger vessels, nautical schoolships, offshore supply vessels, and oceanographic research vessels. Theproposal consolidates the regulations into new Subchapter W of Title 46which would replace most of the repetitive sections of the lifesaving equipmentparts of the present vessel regulations, which would be deleted.Specification regulations for Coast Guard approval of various items oflifesaving equipment, such as lifeboats, liferafts, lifejackets, flares,and others, also need to be revised to meet the new SOLAS 74/83 requirements.These revisions will be proposed in separate notices.Some of the requirements of the SOLAS 74/83 Chapter III will require anumber of changes to 46 CFR 113.30 on sound-powered telephone systems,46 CFR 113.50 on emergency loudspeaker systems, and 46 CFR 113.65 on whistleoperators. These revisions will be covered in a separate notice of proposedrulemaking on changes to Subchapter J of Title 46, ``Electrical Engineering'',to be published at a later date.Although the proposed regulations are completely revised in format, theircontent is similar to the present regulations with the exceptions coveredin the following discussions.a. The proposed vessel regulations incorporate the changes required bySOLAS 74/83, Chapter III. Although the new Chapter III is much closer toU.S. regulations than the previous version, the U.S. regulations stilldescribe more completely the onboard inspection requirements for approvedlifesaving equipment. These existing provisions, which SOLAS 74/83 ChapterIII does not cover, are generally retained. Persons who want to reviewthe revised Chapter III should obtain Volume I of the ``1983 Amendmentsto the International Convention for the Safety of Life at Sea, 1974'' (seeaddresses section). (1) Three of the comments on the ANPRM were to the effect that the U.S.regulations for vessels subject to SOLAS 74/83 should follow the SOLAS74/83 requirements as closely as possible and should not include unilateralrequirements that exceed the SOLAS 74/83 regulations. We agree with thesecomments as a general principle. The regulations proposed in this noticedo exceed SOLAS 74/83 requirements in a number of areas however, becausethe SOLAS 74/83 requirements are vague or do not address certain importantsafety problems. Proposed requirements that exceed SOLAS 74/83 regulationsand that are not covered in present regulations are covered in the discussionsthat follow, along with the reasons why the regulation is being proposed.A derivation table is also included at the end of this preamble that showsthe relationship of the regulations in this notice to existing regulationsand to SOLAS 74/83. Comments are specifically requested on proposals whichexceed or are not addressed in SOLAS 74/83. Most of these proposals arefully discussed in following sections of this notice, but the followingis a summary of regulations proposed in this notice that would affect SOLASvessels, but which are not covered in SOLAS 74/83:Sections 199.15(f) and 199.135(c) would require each vessel equipped witha liferaft not served by a launching appliance, and each vessel equippedwith an inflatable buoyant apparatus, to have rail or bulwark openings,or appropriate mounting arrangements.Section 199.15(g) would require retrofitting of gravity davits.Section 199.15(h) would require retrofitting of totally enclosed lifeboats.Sections 199.15(i) and 199.310(b) would prohibit the use of new aluminumlifeboats on tank ships certificated to carry crude, product, chemicals,or liquified gases; having a flashpoint less than 60anddegrees;C.Section 199.15(l) would require all lifeboats to meet the propulsion powerrequirements in effect for all new Coast Guard approved lifeboats since1965 (see 46 CFR 160.035-3(a)).Section 199.25 explains the conditions under which the Officer in Charge,Marine Inspection (OCMI) may require specialized or additional lifesavingequipment.Section 199.64 contains requirements for satellite Emergency Position IndicatingRadio Beacons (EPIRBs) and Search and Rescue Radar Transponders (SARTs).These requirements are not in SOLAS 74/83, but are in a new set of SOLASAmendments adopted in 1988 which completely revise the requirements forship radiocommunications.Section 199.110(d) would limit the amount of climbing necessary to reachthe survival craft from the deck of the vessel.Section 199.153(h) would require appropriate guards or other protectionfor falls subject to damage or fouling.Section 199.153(j) clarifies the lowering speed for a lightly loaded survivalcraft. SOLAS 74/83 is not clear on this point, and could be interpretedas imposing a more stringent requirement.Section 199.170(d) covers the need for the auxiliary line needed for usewith a line throwing appliance.Section 199.170(e) covers stowage of line throwing appliances.Section 199.175(c)(24) would require two lifejackets to be carried in eachlifeboat.Section 199.175(c)(35) would require lifeboats to have a rainwater collectiondevice.Section 199.217(b) would require formation of an emergency squad on certainpassenger vessels.Section 199.272 would require each vessel with an inflatable liferaft stowedin a remote location to have enough lifejackets to equal the capacity ofthe liferaft stowed at the liferaft station. Sections 199.273 and 199.640 would require immersion suits on all cargoships and mobile offshore drilling units (MODUs) in colder waters, whileSOLAS requires them only on vessels not equipped with totally enclosedlifeboats. Section 199.650 contains several requirements for MODUs which have no counterpartin SOLAS 74/83, but do conform with a new version of the IMO MODU Code,now under consideration by IMO. The MODU Code interprets SOLAS for MODUs,which are a very specialized type of vessel. (2) Two comments recommended that the regulations include the possibilityfor exemption from SOLAS 74/83 requirements that would not be appropriatefor certain voyages, such as the exemption provisions under regulation2 of SOLAS 74/83. We agree with these comments, but no new regulation isneeded since these exemptions are provided for in existing 46 CFR 30.01-6,70.05-10, and 90.05-10. b. As part of the consolidation of the regulations, revised requirementsfor vessels not subject to SOLAS 74/83 are proposed in this notice. Whereverappropriate, proposed revisions for the vessels not subject to SOLAS 74/83are consistent with the SOLAS requirements. Vessels not subject to SOLAS74/83 are primarily nonself-propelled vessels, Great Lakes vessels, coastwisevessels, cargo and tank vessels under 500 tons gross tonnage, and othervessels not on international voyages. Mobile offshore drilling units (MODUs)are also covered in this notice. Self-propelled MODUs are technically coveredby SOLAS 74/83 when working in waters of a nation other than the nationwhere they are registered. The IMO has developed the Code for the Constructionand Equipment of Mobile Offshore Drilling Units (MODU Code) to providea level of safety equivalent to conventional vessels under SOLAS 74/83.U.S. MODUs are not required to meet the MODU Code, but if they operatein waters of another country, that country may require a MODU Code Certificateas a condition for their operation in those waters. Self-propelled MODUson international voyages are ships under SOLAS 74/83, but most countrieswill accept MODU Code Certificates as an equivalence to SOLAS. For thesereasons, the Coast Guard will issue a MODU Code Certificate to a MODU thatmeets the Code, if the operator requests it. The present MODU Code anda revision of the MODU Code presently under consideration by the membersof IMO, are used as a basis for some of the revisions proposed in thisnotice. These are more completely discussed in a following section titled``Additional Requirements for Mobile Offshore Drilling Units.'' (1) Two comments opposed the inclusion of MODUs into Subchapter W becausethe present Subchapter I-A of Title 46 on MODUs was intended to be a setof uniform, comprehensive regulations for MODUs, recognizing the significantdifference between MODUs and other types of vessels. One of the commentsadded the suggestion that MODU revisions should be proposed separately,and should take into account the various types of MODUs. When SubchapterI-A was developed, it was intended to be a single comprehensive set ofregulations for MODUs, like Subchapter D for tank vessels, Subchapter Hfor passenger vessels, and Subchapter I for cargo and miscellaneous vessels.This type of regulatory organization leads to extensive repetition sincemuch of the general lifesaving requirements are the same for all vessels.Subchapter W can accommodate the special requirements for MODUs as wellas for other vessels. A consolidation of regulations by subject matter,rather than by vessel type, has already been utilized in Subchapter F onMarine Engineering, Subchapter J on Electrical Engineering, and SubchapterS on Stability. Consequently, this proposed notice includes MODUs underSubchapter W. (2) The same two comments expressed concern over the application of SOLAS74/83 and the MODU Code to MODUs. One stated that the ANPRM implied thatSOLAS 74/83 changes would automatically be applied to MODUs, and pointedout that the MODU Code recognized the differences by establishing a levelof safety equivalent to SOLAS. The comment noted that the U.S. is not boundto comply with the MODU Code since it, unlike SOLAS 74/83, is not a convention.The other comment supported making regulations for self-propelled MODUsconsistent with the MODU Code, and did not want MODUs to be forced intocomplying with SOLAS 74/83 or required to meet requirements more onerousthan the MODU Code. The requirements of SOLAS 74/83 that would apply toMODUs under the regulations proposed in this notice are general in natureand should apply to any vessel with lifesaving equipment. These regulationsare in Part B of proposed Subchapter W. Regulations proposed in this noticethat go beyond the requirements of SOLAS 74/83 and the MODU Code are completelydiscussed in the following section on ``Additional Requirements for MobileOffshore Drilling Units.'' (3) One comment noted that the International Association of Drilling Contractorswould sponsor a Second International Conference on Offshore Safety in March1986, and suggested that a new regulatory scheme should not be put in placebefore the conference is concluded. The transactions of that conferencewere available and were reviewed in drafting this NPRM. (4) Five comments on the ANPRM stated that the SOLAS 74/83 requirementsshould not be applied to nonself-propelled vessels and other vessels invarious domestic services not subject to SOLAS 74/83. The comments expressedconcern that this would generate excessive costs and requirements for unnecessaryequipment. We agree that many of the SOLAS 74/83 requirements for oceangoingvessels in international trades are not appropriate for inland vesselsand vessels trading solely within U.S. coastal waters, but many of theSOLAS 74/83 requirements are basic principles that apply to any vesselcarrying lifesaving equipment. These are the SOLAS 74/83 requirements thatare proposed as requirements for other vessels in this notice and theyare generally not new requirements. Where a certain regulation is applicableonly to vessels in certain services, the regulation clearly states theservices to which it applies. As an example, see proposed andSection; 199.10(b).(5) One comment stated that the Coast Guard would be hard-pressed to provethat revised equipment requirements would have prevented any fatalitieson the Great Lakes. The comment pointed to the ``impressive safety recordof the Great Lakes maritime sector'', especially the self-propelled tankvessel sector. Over the past 30 years, there have been four major casualtiesresulting in abandonment on the Great Lakes, each of which pointed to theneed for improvement of the lifesaving equipment carried on these vessels.None of these casualties involved a tank vessel, however, we believe thehazards that would be present in accidents involving Great Lakes tank vesselswould be similar to those involving oceangoing tank vessels. Similarly,a sinking of a Great Lakes tank vessel would present survival problemsfor the crew similar to those that would be experienced in the sinkingof a Great Lakes bulk carrier. Each of the major revisions that would resultfrom the regulations proposed in this notice are discussed in the followingsections along with the reasons for the changes.c. Revisions are proposed to incorporate various recommendations of CoastGuard Marine Boards of Investigation and the National Transportation SafetyBoard. Most of these recommendations are consistent with revisions thatare required to comply with SOLAS 74/83 Chapter III. Significant differencesare discussed in following sections. <ITAG tagnum="84">Organization of the Proposed Regulations </ITAG>The lifesaving equipment requirements are proposed as a new SubchapterW (Part 199) of Title 46 of the Code of Federal Regulations. This new subchapterhas been placed first in the proposed revisions contained in this notice,even though it is the last numerically and would appear at the end of ChapterI of Title 46. This is done for the benefit of the reader, since most ofthe rest of the proposed regulations involve inspection and operationalrequirements which require an understanding of the equipment requirementsin Subchapter W. Subchapter W would completely replace Parts 33, 75, 94,192, and Subpart E of Part 108 of Title 46. The structure of Subchapter W parallels Chapter III of SOLAS 74/83. Thegeneral requirements applying to all vessels are set out first in SubpartsA and B. Subparts C through H contain additional requirements for passengervessels, cargo vessels, tank vessels, special purpose ships, nautical schoolships, and mobile offshore drilling units. For andSection;andSection; 199.10to 199.290, the corresponding regulation of SOLAS 74/83 Chapter III isgenerally the section number following the decimal point, divided by 10.For example, the SOLAS 74/83 Chapter III regulation generally correspondingto andSection; 199.140 is regulation 14 (140 divided by 10). One commentto the ANPRM urged language similar to the SOLAS 74/83 regulations be usedin the U.S. regulations in order to avoid future problems with interpretationand possible conflicts. This is the main objective for using this typeof organization. The language used differs in some areas because the SOLAS74/83 regulations are silent on some points, and are sometimes deliberatelyvague since complete international agreement was not possible on a particularpoint. Other changes were necessary in order to conform with current regulatorydrafting practices. There are exceptions to the organizational system described in the precedingparagraph. Chapter III of SOLAS 74/83 contains some inspection and operationalrequirements. These requirements are proposed as changes to the existingsections of the vessel regulations covering inspection and certification(Parts 31, 71, 91, 107, and 189), and operations (Parts 35, 78, 97, 109,196, and Subpart 167.65). Part C of SOLAS 74/83 Chapter III (Regulations30 to 53) contains specifications for lifesaving equipment. A few of theserequirements are covered in the proposed Subchapter W, but most affectthe specification regulations in Subchapter Q of Title 46 of the Code ofFederal Regulations. Most of the revisions to Subchapter Q that are requiredby the new Chapter III will be proposed in separate notices. One of the objectives of this project is to eliminate repetitive and overlappingregulations. The new Subchapter W accomplishes this by covering all ofthe lifesaving system equipment requirements for major inspected vesselsin one place. While this type of organization should help to eliminateregulations that are inconsistent from one type of vessel to another, itwill require the user to look in two places in order to find the regulationsapplying to a particular vessel. The user will have to refer to the requirementsfor all vessels as well as the specific requirements for the particulartype of vessel. The revisions for inspection and certification, and foroperations are proposed as changes to the existing parts of the variousvessel type regulations covering these subjects. This means there are anumber of very similar changes being proposed to as many as seven differentparts of Chapter I of Title 46. Eventually, these regulations may alsobe consolidated, and this repetition will be eliminated. Consolidationof these sections of the regulations is outside the scope of this regulatoryproject. <ITAG tagnum="84">References to SOLAS 74/83 </ITAG>These regulations are based in part on SOLAS 74/83, the 1983 Amendmentsto the International Convention for the Safety of Life at Sea, 1974, whichincludes a completely revised Chapter III, ``Life-saving Appliances andArrangements.'' References to the 1983 Amendments are written as ``SOLAS74/83.'' References to individual regulations follow the convention usedin SOLAS 74/83 of listing the chapter, followed by a slash ``/'', thenthe regulation number, and the various numbered subdivisions of the regulationseparated by decimal points. ``Regulation III/4.2.1'' therefore refersto Chapter III, Regulation 4, paragraph 2.1. <ITAG tagnum="84">Additional Requirements </ITAG>The proposed Subchapter W is intended to establish lifesaving system requirementsfor vessel operations in tropical and temperate climates. It does not coveroperations under unusually severe conditions, such as Arctic conditions.New developments in the search for mineral resources will regularly takevessels into environments where commercial vessel operations have beenlimited. Proposed andSection; 199.25 will provide for appropriate lifesavingequipment under the conditions in which these vessels will operate. <ITAG tagnum="84">New and Revised Terminology </ITAG>a. The SI (metric) system of measurement is used throughout the regulationsproposed in this notice. This is done to be consistent with the measurementsused in the new Chapter III of SOLAS 74/83 which are in SI units for thefirst time. It is also consistent with the international character of shippingand shipbuilding. For the convenience of those wishing to use the Englishsystem, English equivalents are given in parentheses immediately followingthe SI units. The SI units would be the official regulatory requirement.b. The term ``immersion suit'' replaces ``exposure suit'' formerly usedin Coast Guard vessel regulations. These suits have also been widely knownas ``survival suits''. A separate rulemaking project has updated the specificationsfor these suits and incorporates the new terminology. These regulationswere published on October 22, 1987 at 52 FR 39532. c. ``Thermal protective aids'' would be required for certain vessels underthe proposed regulations. These devices are made of lightweight materialthat will fold into a compact package so that they can be carried as survivalcraft equipment. They are used to limit heat loss of persons riding insurvival craft. The Coast Guard published a new specification regulationfor these devices on May 29,  1986 at 51 FR 19342. d. The term ``lifejacket'' replaces ``life preserver'' in order to be consistentwith SOLAS 74/83 terminology. This device is also referred to in CoastGuard regulations for recreational boats as a Type I Personal FlotationDevice (PFD). The Type I PFD designation will continue to be used in theregulations for recreational boats. e. The term ``lifejacket light'' replaces ``personal flotation device light''to be consistent with SOLAS 74/83 terminology. f. The term ``hydrostatic release unit'' replaces ``hydraulic release''and ``hydraulic and manual lifesaving equipment release'' to be consistentwith SOLAS 74/83. g. The term ``mechanical disengaging apparatus'' replaces ``release mechanism''to be consistent with SOLAS 74/83. h. The term ``survival craft'' is defined in proposed andSection; 199.30.The term includes lifeboats, liferafts, buoyant apparatus, and life floats,but does not include rescue boats. <ITAG tagnum="84">Equivalent and Novel Lifesaving Appliances and Arrangements </ITAG>Proposed andSection; 199.40(b) provides for approval of ``novel'' lifesavingappliances. Criteria for acceptance and approval of these devices are inIMO Resolution A.520(13), ``Code of Practice for the Evaluation, Testingand Acceptance of Prototype Novel Life-saving Appliances and Arrangements''.Regulation I/5 of SOLAS 74/83 allows national Administrations to acceptarrangements that are equivalent to those specified in the convention.Resolution A.520 establishes performance criteria for these equivalentsystems for the first time.<ITAG tagnum="84">Rescue Boats</ITAG>One or more rescue boats would be required on most vessels under theseproposed regulations. These boats are intended primarily to rescue personswho fall overboard. They could also be used to assist another vessel introuble. Rescue boats would replace the emergency lifeboats now requiredon certain passenger vessels. Present regulations require rescue boatson those vessels where inflatable liferafts are substituted for lifeboats.As in present regulations, vessels operating in relatively protected waterswould continue to use the simple rescue boat approved under existing 46CFR 160.056. Present regulations also require that vessels in exposed waterscarry a more seaworthy rescue boat, but the regulations give no criteriafor these boats. Under SOLAS 74/83 and the proposed regulations, theserescue boats would have to meet Regulation III/47 of SOLAS 74/83. The needfor rescue boats or improved means of retrieving survivors from rough seaswas identified by the National Transportation Safety Board in its investigationsof the SS BADGER STATE and SS PANOCEANIC FAITH casualties. A lifeboat couldalso be used as a rescue boat if it meets both the rescue boat and lifeboatrequirements. One comment stated that a rescue boat had to be arrangedto allow no more than two persons of average build and strength to assistthe person into the rescue boat, and that a lifeboat could not meet thisrequirement. A specification regulation for rescue boats will be proposedunder another notice and it will contain performance requirements for rescueboats. If a manufacturer can design a lifeboat so that it meets the performancerequirements for both a lifeboat and rescue boat, it could be approvedas both.a. Proposed andSection; 199.140 covers the stowage requirements for rescueboats, including a requirement that rescue boats be stowed ready for launchingin not more than 5 minutes. One comment stated that rescue boats have sometime to prepare before launching, and that the same speed and efficiencyis not required as when abandoning ship. We do not agree with this comment.One of the primary functions of the rescue boat is to rescue persons thatfall overboard. The time required to launch the rescue boat is of the utmostimportance. This is the reason for the 5 minute requirement for preparationof the boat for launching, and for the requirement in proposed andSection;199.160 that the boat be capable of being launched in the shortest possibletime.b. Proposed andSection; 199.160 covers general requirements for rescue boatembarkation, launching, and recovery arrangements. This paragraph is basedon Regulation III/16 of SOLAS 74/83.c. Many of the rescue boats used on U.S. vessels not on international voyagesare small and lightweight, can be put into the water easily by severalcrew members, and can be boarded in the water from the deck of the vessel.These rescue boats could be exempted from the requirement for a launchingappliance on the same basis as survival craft under proposed andSection;199.150(a)(1).d. Proposed andSection; 199.202(d) would require rescue boats meeting 46CFR 160.056 used on passenger vessels to be motor-propelled. Although rescueboats approved under 46 CFR 160.056 are basically rowboats, they can usuallybe equipped with an outboard motor. This proposal is in response to a recommendationby the National Transportation Safety Board (NTSB) arising from an investigationof the collision between the passenger vessel MISSISSIPPI QUEEN and thetowboat CRIMSON GLORY in the Mississippi River in 1985 (NTSB recommendation86-075). Although the rescue boat was not used in this casualty, the boardnoted that current, visibility, and traffic problems in the river wouldlimit the usefulness of an oar-propelled boat, and that a motorized rescueboat would greatly reduce the time needed to retrieve a victim in the river.e. One of the purposes of a rescue boat on a passenger vessel in ocean,short international voyage, and coastwise service, is to marshal the liferaftswhich have no means of propulsion other than their paddles. Proposed andSection;199.203 would establish acceptable liferaft-to-rescue boat ratios. (Lifeboatscould also be used for this purpose, even if not approved as rescue boats.)This proposed regulation is based on Regulation III/20.3 of SOLAS 74/83.One of the comments on the ANPRM stated that there should be a generousassignment of personnel to the rescue boat to allow for several shiftsof persons to operate the boat and act as towline tenders. Assignment ofpersonnel to the rescue boat in the event of a casualty is the responsibilityof the master. The boat will be large enough to accommodate at least sixpersons so there should be room for enough personnel for alternating shifts.f. Proposed andSection; 199.262 (e) and (f) provide for exemptions from therequirement to carry rescue boats for certain cargo vessels not in oceanservice, and for nonself-propelled vessels. Proposed andSection; 199.410provides for exemptions from the requirement to carry rescue boats forspecial purpose ships operating on the continental shelf of the UnitedStates. A similar provision was included in the February 14, 1983 ANPRMon offshore supply vessel regulations. One comment on the December 31,1984 ANPRM on this project pointed out that during the development of thenew Chapter III of SOLAS 74/83, the United States had submitted a proposalto IMO to exempt small cargo vessels from the rescue boat requirement,if the vessel itself provided a satisfactory rescue platform. The commentstated that although the proposal was not accepted by IMO, the conceptwas still valid, especially for crew boats servicing the offshore drillingindustry. As special purpose ships, the proposed regulations would exemptsuitably arranged crew boats from the rescue boat requirement if they operateon the continental shelf of the United States, or if they carry less than50 offshore workers and are not in ocean service. Offshore supply vesselsthat are not crew boats, as well as oceanographic research vessels wouldqualify for the same rescue boat exemptions since they are also classifiedas special purpose ships under proposed andSection; 199.400. On December24, 1987, the Coast Guard published an NPRM on an Emergency EvacuationPlan for Manned OCS Facilities (52 FR 48717). An offshore supply vesseldesignated as a ``standby vessel'' in such an emergency evacuation planmight include a rescue boat as part of the emergency evacuation plan. Thisrescue boat could be the same one used to meet the rescue boat requirementsproposed in this notice.<ITAG tagnum="84">Prevention and Reduction of Hypothermia</ITAG>Many of the new requirements proposed in this notice are intended to preventor reduce the effects of hypothermia.a. In accordance with Regulation III/7.3 of SOLAS 74/83, proposed andSection;199.73 would require vessels to carry immersion suits for each member ofthe rescue boat crew. As proposed, this requirement would apply not onlyto SOLAS 74/83 vessels, but also to those vessels operating in coastwiseand Great Lakes service. One comment on the ANPRM wanted this immersionsuit requirement limited to vessels operating in those areas where immersionsuits are required to be carried, apparently referring to the warm waterexemptions further discussed in item (e.) under this heading. The proposedregulation does not include such an exemption since it is not providedfor under regulation III/7.3 of SOLAS 74/83. Comments are specificallyrequested as to whether or not the final regulations should include a limitedwarm water exemption for this requirement for certain vessels not requiredto meet SOLAS 74/83.b. Thermal protective aids would be required to be carried as an item oflifeboat, liferaft, and rescue boat equipment on vessels in ocean, shortinternational voyage, and coastwise service. These aids are compact, waterproofdevices that are intended to retain the body heat of the wearer ridingin a boat or liferaft. They are not intended to be effective devices fora wearer in the water. This proposed requirement is consistent with RegulationsIII/38.5.24, III/41.8.31 and III/47.2.2.13 of SOLAS 74/83 and appears inthe equipment list in andSection; 199.175(c)(48) and as item 48 on Table199.175(c).c. Proposed andSection; 199.214 would require each passenger vessel in ocean,short international voyage, coastwise, and Great Lakes service to carryimmersion suits for the crew of each survival craft on the vessel. Thermalprotective aids would be required for the rest of the persons on board.For Great Lakes passenger vessels, this requirement would replace 46 CFR75.41, which requires immersion suits for all persons on board during theWinter season.(1) One comment stated that thermal protective aids should be carried oncargo vessels as well as passenger vessels. This is not necessary sincecargo vessels are covered by a requirement for immersion suits in proposedandSection; 199.273. (2) The same comment also suggested that there should be more than onethermal protective aid on board for each person in order to provide sparesfor those that might be lost or damaged. The thermal protective aids carriedas lifeboat and liferaft equipment under andSection; 199.175(c)(48) wouldbe in addition to those carried under andSection; 199.214, therefore spareswould be available on board. (3) Finally, the comment noted that the ANPRM would have exempted passengervessels that carry totally enclosed or partially enclosed lifeboats fromthe requirement to carry thermal protective aids. The comment went on tosuggest that only vessels with totally enclosed lifeboats should be exempted.Proposed andSection; 199.214 contains no exemptions related to totally enclosedor partially enclosed lifeboats. On February 6, 1984, the Coast Guard publishedfinal rules requiring the carriage of exposure suits on certain cargo vessels.These rules provided an exemption for vessels with totally enclosed lifeboats.On November 8, 1984, the President signed into law an act (Pub. L. 98-623)which included a specific legislated requirement for the carriage of exposuresuits and a prohibition on excluding a vessel only because that vesselcarries other lifesaving equipment (such as totally enclosed lifeboats).On December 31, 1984, the Coast Guard published an amended final rule removingthe exemption for vessels with totally enclosed lifeboats (49 FR 50724).Although Pub. L. 98-623 did not address thermal protective aids on passengervessels, the purpose of these aids is to provide a degree of hypothermiaprotection, as is the purpose of exposure suits on cargo vessels. The sameprinciples should therefore apply, so these proposed rules contain no exemptionfrom the thermal protective aid requirement based on the carriage of eithertotally enclosed or partially enclosed lifeboats. d. Immersion suits would be required for cargo vessels under proposed andSection;199.273, and for MODUs under proposed andSection; 199.640. These proposedregulations are essentially identical to the present regulations requiringexposure suits. Three comments wanted these suits to be able to be usedto satisfy the requirement for rescue boat crew immersion suits in andSection;199.73. This would be permitted under proposed andSection;andSection; 199.273(d)and 199.640(d). e. Warm water exemptions from the immersion suit requirements are proposedin andSection; 199.214(d) for passenger vessels, in andSection; 199.273(a)for cargo vessels, and in andSection; 199.640(a) for MODUs. The latitudesfor the exemption would be established at 32 anddegrees;N and 32 anddegrees;Sworldwide. The present regulations establish the exemption lines at 35anddegrees;N and 35 anddegrees;S worldwide, except in the Atlantic Ocean wherethe lines are 32 anddegrees;N and 32 anddegrees;S. These latitudes are establishedby law (46 U.S.C. 3102(a)). The same Act of Congress that established thisstatute (Pub. L. 98-623) stated that it ``does not limit the authorityof the (Coast Guard) to prescribe regulations requiring exposure suitson vessels not required by section 3102 to have exposure suits.'' Thisact also required the Coast Guard to report to Congress on the benefitsand disadvantages of extending the regulations to require exposure suitson designated vessels operating in all waters north of 31 anddegrees;N orsouth of 31 anddegrees;S. The report to Congress is complete and has beenentered in the docket for this project so that it is available for inspectionand copying. The report found that there was little advantage to worldwideexemption lines of 31 anddegrees;N and 31 anddegrees;S, but it did find thatWinter water temperatures in the Pacific Ocean near the west coast of theUnited States at 32 anddegrees;N were colder than they were in the AtlanticOcean at the same latitude. This is the reason that the change to 32 anddegrees;Nand 32 anddegrees;S exemption lines are proposed. Expected water temperatureat 32 anddegrees;N is at least 60 anddegrees;F at all times during the yearin the coastal areas of North America. If a vessel will operate north of32 anddegrees;N or south of 32 anddegrees;S only when the water temperatureis at least 60 anddegrees;F, the vessel may be exempted from the exposuresuit requirement under existing exemption provisions in 46 CFR 30.01-6and 90.05-10. f. The best way to prevent hypothermia is to keep survivors from enteringthe water. Proposed andSection; 199.150(a) is derived from Regulation III/15.1of SOLAS 74/83 Chapter III and would require launching appliances for allsurvival craft, with certain exceptions. Launching appliances enable survivorsto board the survival craft aboard the vessel before it is launched, sothere is no need to climb down the side of a sinking vessel to board them,or to swim to them. One exception in the proposed regulation would generallyapply to liferafts that can be readily put into the water and boarded simplyby jumping from the vessel to the survival craft. The other exception appliesto the float-free liferafts carried on cargo vessels in ocean and coastwiseservice. On cargo vessels in Great Lakes service, proposed andSection; 199.150(a)would require the liferafts to be davit launched unless they are boardedfrom a position on deck less than 4.5 m (14 ft., 9 in.) above the lightwaterline, and meet one of the other conditions in andSection; 199.150(a)(1)(i)or andSection; 199.150(a)(1)(ii). Section 199.405(d) includes an exemptionfor launching appliances for liferafts on self-elevating offshore supplyvessels known in the industry as ``liftboats''. Liftboats are used to serviceoffshore platforms, and in an emergency, personnel on board the liftboatcan transfer directly to the platform the liftboat is working on. If theemergency is on board the platform, or if the liftboat is not adjacentto a platform, these vessels are capable of dropping quickly to the waterfor abandonment. (1) One comment expressed concern that liferafts as small as 15 personscapacity might have to be davit-launched since changing requirements forliferafts might cause them to exceed the 185 kg limit. The comment citedin particular a proposal to require stability appendages on inflatableliferafts which was published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>on January 11, 1985 (50 FR 558). We believe thatthe combined effect of the changes needed for inflatable liferafts to complywith SOLAS 74/83 and any required additional stability appendage will resultin inflatable liferafts as large as 20 persons capacity being under the185 kg limit. It should also be noted that under proposed andSection; 199.150(a)(1)(ii),liferafts exceeding 185 kg are not required to be davit launched if theyare stowed for direct launching and are less than 4.5 m above the waterline.(2) One comment stated that davit-launched liferafts on Great Lakes bulkcargo vessels could offer no advantage over float-free liferafts, exceptin the case of fire. Under proposed andSection; 199.290(b), liferafts oncargo vessels would have to be arranged to automatically float free, whetherthey are davit-launched or not. On Great Lakes vessels, lifeboats for only100% of the persons permitted on board would be required. This contrastswith vessels in ocean and coastwise service where 200% capacity in lifeboatsis required. If the lifeboats on one side of a vessel in ocean or coastwiseservice can not be used, there is still 100% capacity available on theother side. The float-free liferafts are used only if the vessel sinksbefore the lifeboats can be launched. On Great Lakes cargo vessels, theliferafts serve a dual purpose. They must float free if the vessel sinks,and they must be available if the lifeboat (usually only one is carriedon newer vessels) can not be used. If they are stowed high above the waterline(over 4.5 m), they must be davit-launched so that they can be boarded bytheir full complement at deck level, then launched into the water. g. Proposed andSection; 199.150(h) would require each launching applianceto be actuated from a position within the survival craft, in addition toa position on deck. This is to enable all persons to board the survivalcraft at the deck, without the need for a deck crew to remain behind. Conventionallaunching appliances require at least one winch operator on deck, who mustclimb down a ladder to the survival craft once it has been launched. Transferringfrom the ladder to the boat in heavy seas can be very difficult, and mayresult in the deck crew having to enter the water in order to reach theboat. The term ``actuated'' is used in response to one comment on the ANPRMthat ``controlled'' should not be used since it implied a need to be ableto operate the winch brake from inside the survival craft while the survivalcraft is being lowered. The regulation is intended to permit, but not requirethe capability to control the winch brake from inside the survival craftwhile the survival craft is being lowered. h. The present regulations require open lifeboats on most large commercialvessels, with the exception of MODUs. In heavy seas and cold weather, occupantswill get wet and cold in open lifeboats, exposing them to the risk of hypothermia.There is also a danger that the boat can be swamped and made more susceptibleto capsize. If the boat capsizes, those that do not drown would be exposedto an even greater risk of hypothermia. Proposed andSection; 199.261 (b)and (e) would require totally enclosed lifeboats on cargo vessels and tankvessels in ocean; coastwise; Great Lakes; and lakes, bays, and sounds service.Totally enclosed lifeboats provide protection from heavy seas. SOLAS 74/83requires totally enclosed lifeboats to be self-righting when fully loadedand not swamped. If they do swamp, the lifeboats meeting SOLAS 74/83 arerequired to provide an above-water escape for the occupants. Some lifeboatswill be effectively self-righting in the swamped condition. Proposed andSection;199.201 (b), (c), and (d) would require totally enclosed lifeboats or partiallyenclosed lifeboats on passenger vessels in ocean, short international voyage,coastwise, and Great Lakes service. Partially enclosed lifeboats have rigidcanopies at each end, and an open area in the center that can be quicklyclosed with a foldable cover. This arrangement provides some of the samehypothermia protection as a totally enclosed boat, but can generally accommodateand provide more rapid boarding for a larger number of persons. Most largepassenger vessels use very large lifeboats. (1) One comment on the ANPRM expressed support for the totally enclosedlifeboat requirements on cargo vessels. (2) Another comment stated that open lifeboats in combination with immersionsuits already carried, provide adequate protection in case of a casualty.The comment also noted that survival craft Emergency Position IndicatingRadio Beacons (EPIRBs) would reduce the amount of time survivors have tospend in lifeboats. While the observations made in the comment are valid,the open lifeboat is still susceptible to swamping and capsizing, and cannot be made to be self-righting. Furthermore, survival time will be increasedby keeping survivors dry, even if they are wearing immersion suits. (3) A third comment opposed a requirement for totally enclosed lifeboatson Great Lakes cargo vessels, stating no lifeboats had been launched inconnection with a U.S. flag vessel loss on the Great Lakes in the pastthree decades. There have been four major vessel casualties on the GreatLakes in the three decade period mentioned in the comment. The reason lifeboatswere not a factor in three of these casualties is that the lifeboats wereserved by mechanical davits, which would be replaced with gravity davitsunder this proposal. This issue is more completely covered elsewhere inthis discussion. Had boats been launched in these casualties, they wouldhave been subject to the same hazards discussed previously. i. Some of the present regulations for passenger vessels do not requiresurvival craft for all persons on board the vessel, even though the vesselmay operate in waters cold enough to quickly cause the onset of hypothermia.Table 75.10-20(a) in Title 46 of the Code of Federal Regulations is a complexsystem of requirements for percentages of persons that must be providedfor in lifeboats, liferafts, and life floats on vessels operating in GreatLakes service; lakes, bays, and sounds service; and river service. Thereare different requirements for a Winter season (Sept. 16 to May 14) andfor a Summer season (May 15 to Sept. 15). There are different requirementsfor vessels operating north of the 33rd parallel and those operating southof the 33rd parallel. Other variations in the requirements are providedfor vessels based on routes, radio equipment, daytime operation, etc. Theprimary considerations in all of these variations are the risk of injurydue to cold water and the speed of rescue in case of a casualty. This complexsystem would be replaced by the regulations proposed in this notice, whichare based on the simple principle that survival craft should be providedfor all persons on board, and that appropriate additional survival craftshould be provided in case some of the survival craft can not be used.The number of survival craft can be reduced below the number necessaryto accommodate all persons on board only in those cases where there isminimal risk of death due to hypothermia or its complications. (1) In place of the complex table of alternatives, the regulations forpassenger vessels proposed in this notice give a basic requirement forsurvival craft, then provide for various alternatives for vessels operatingunder certain conditions. For hypothermia risk, water temperature is theprimary concern, although the degree of risk at a particular water temperaturevaries widely for different individuals. The alternatives proposed in thisnotice are based on the assumption that water temperatures above 15 anddegrees;C(59 anddegrees;F) do not present an immediate risk of hypothermia. The variousalternatives proposed are more fully discussed in the following sectiontitled ``Alternative Survival Craft Requirements for Small Vessels andVessels in Protected Waters''. For the alternatives based on water temperature,it is not intended that the water temperatures in which the vessel operatesbe continuously monitored. The survival craft requirements for the vesselwould be established according to the routes on which it operates, andthe normal prevailing water temperatures during the times of the year itoperates on those routes.(2) One comment on the ANPRM stated additional lifeboats and liferaftswould severely affect passenger vessels operating in river service, witha doubtful result. The regulations proposed in this notice may, but notnecessarily, result in an increase in lifeboats and liferafts over presentrequirements. The ANPRM did not present specific regulatory proposals forthese vessels, as this notice does. <ITAG tagnum="85">Alternative Survival Craft Requirements for Small Vessels and Vesselsin Protected Waters </ITAG>The proposed requirements for totally enclosed lifeboats and partiallyenclosed lifeboats are appropriate for large vessels operating in waterswhere severe sea conditions can be anticipated. Alternative arrangementsare proposed for certain other vessels. a. Under proposed andSection; 199.201(e), passenger vessels on lakes, bays,and sounds service, and those in river service would be permitted to carryopen lifeboats for that portion of the complement that would have to beaccommodated in lifeboats. Most passenger vessels in these services, however,can be expected to use one of the other alternatives discussed in the followingparagraphs. b. Under proposed andSection; 199.201(f), passenger vessels under 500 tonsgross tonnage with fewer than 200 persons on board could carry liferaftsfor all of the persons on board. A similar provision for cargo vesselsless than 85 m (278 ft.) long in ocean and coastwise service is proposedin andSection; 199.261(d). Cargo vessels under 85 m long in Great Lakes service;lakes, bays, and sounds service; and those operating on the continentalshelf of the United States would be covered under proposed andSection; 199.261(f).No boats would be required other than rescue boats. These alternativesare based on Regulations III/20.1.5 and III/26.1.3 of SOLAS 74/83. Nonself-propelledvessels (barges) are not covered under SOLAS 74/83, but the liferaft alternativewould also be permitted for those vessels under proposed andSection; 199.261(d)and (f). (1) One comment addressed the substitution of liferafts for lifeboats onpassenger vessels by stating that it was not supported, but no reasonswere given. Substitution of liferafts for lifeboats on small vessels ispermitted by the present regulations, and has proved to be a satisfactoryarrangement to date. (2) One comment stated that the present requirement for 100% capacity ininflatable liferafts should be retained for offshore supply vessels andalso for nonself-propelled vessels. These vessels would continue to havea requirement for 100% capacity in inflatable liferafts under proposedandSection; 199.261(f). c. Proposed andSection; 199.201(g) would allow ferries not in ocean serviceor short international voyage service, or a passenger vessel in lakes,bays, and sounds service, or in river service, to carry inflatable buoyantapparatus instead of lifeboats or liferafts. Inflatable buoyant apparatusare a relatively new type of survival craft. They are similar to inflatableliferafts, except that they have no canopy, can be used either side up,and carry only a limited amount of equipment. These devices provide importantprotection from hypothermia since they support their occupants completelyout of the water. The proposed regulations would limit the services inwhich they could be used, because the lack of a canopy would compromisetheir hypothermia protection in severe sea conditions. Since they haveno canopy, they can be rapidly boarded by a large number of persons witha minimum amount of supervision, which is very important in high densitypassenger service. The new inflatable buoyant apparatus, the proposed requirementfor survival craft in andSection; 199.201(g), and the retrofit requirementproposed in andSection; 199.15(k), is the Coast Guard's response to a provisionin the 1984 Coast Guard Authorization Act which required the Secretaryof Transportation to proceed vigorously with efforts to develop improvedlifesaving equipment for use on passenger ferries. Additionally, we believe that the use of inflatable buoyant apparatus willresult in the most cost effective way to provide out of the water flotationfor survivors of a ferry casualty because (1) inflatable devices storein a compact form, limiting the amount of structural modifications thathave to be made to accommodate them, (2) inflatable buoyant apparatus aresignificantly less bulky on a per-person basis than even inflatable liferafts,so that comparatively fewer of them are needed, (3) they do not carry alarge amount of survival equipment, so that bulk, weight, and cost arefurther reduced, and (4) because their open structure allows one personto supervise the launching and loading of several devices at one time,there is no requirement to have a lifeboatman or other trained crewmemberfor each individual device. On high density ferry services, a requirementfor one crewmember for each device could significantly raise the numberof crewmembers required, for the sole purpose of being available for anabandon-ship casualty. With the appropriate arrangement of inflatable buoyantapparatus, we believe that vessels will generally not have to increasetheir crew size for the sole purpose of manning the survival craft.d. Proposed andSection; 199.201(h) would permit passenger vessels operatingin warm waters (15 anddegrees;C (59 anddegrees;F)) and not in ocean, shortinternational voyage, or coastwise service to increase the number of personscarried. Survival craft would be required only for 10% of the persons onboard. The number of persons carried may exceed the capacity of the survivalcraft provided because each person will be provided with a lifejacket,the warm water does not present an immediate hypothermia threat, and rescuewould be quickly available in the areas where these vessels operate. The10% survival craft requirement is retained to provide for persons who maybe incapacitated and for other persons attending them. Present regulationsin 46 CFR 75.10-20(a) permit reductions in lifesaving equipment in certainareas and at certain times of the year regardless of prevailing water temperature.e. Proposed andSection; 199.201(i) would permit passenger vessels not inocean, short international voyage, or coastwise service to operate in shallowwater near land without survival craft. A similar alternative is proposedfor cargo vessels in andSection; 199.261(j). These proposed regulations aresimilar to existing passenger and cargo vessel regulations permitting vesselsto operate without survival craft in waters less than 3 ft. deep. Thereare few, if any vessels, believed to be taking advantage of these regulations,therefore they are being considered for elimination from the final rules.Comments are specifically requested as to the usefulness of these proposals.f. Cargo vessels in river service would be required to carry a combinationof survival craft to accommodate all persons on board under proposed andSection;199.261(g).g. Proposed andSection; 199.261(i) would permit cargo vessels operating inwarm waters (15 anddegrees;C (59 anddegrees;F)) and not in ocean or coastwiseservice, and vessels operating on the continental shelf in the Gulf ofMexico, to carry life floats instead of lifeboats or liferafts. The warmwater in these areas does not present an immediate hypothermia threat andrescue would be quickly available in the areas where these vessels operate.h. Present regulations in 46 CFR 94.10-20, 94.10-25, 94.10-45 and 94.10-50cover alternative lifesaving equipment requirements for fireboats, wreckingvessels, fishing vessels, pilot boats, and yachts. Ordinarily vessels ofthese types are inspected vessels only if propelled by steam. Virtuallyall vessels of these types are now motor propelled and covered under either46 CFR Subchapter C, or 33 CFR Subchapter S, so these regulations are obsolete.There are no corresponding regulations proposed in this notice.<ITAG tagnum="84">Improved Distress Communications</ITAG>a. Proposed andSection; 199.62 would require each vessel in ocean, shortinternational voyage, coastwise or Great Lakes service to have survivalcraft portable two-way radiotelephone apparatus. These radios are intendedfor communication between survival craft, between survival craft and thevessel, between the vessel and its rescue boat, and for communication withon-scene rescue units. These portable radios would not be required foreach survival craft, but at least three would have to be on each vessel.The Federal Communications Commission (FCC) adopted final rules on approvalof this equipment on May l, 1985 (50 FR 18489).(1) Two comments wanted clarification on whether or not these radios wereto be portable or permanently installed, and whether existing equipmenton the vessel could be used to meet the requirement. Three other commentsstated that equipment already in use would meet this requirement. Thisequipment is intended to be the same as or similar to the two-way radioequipment typically used on vessels for routine operations, so althoughthe requirement is new, it should not result in the carriage of additionalequipment on most vessels.(2) One comment stated that two-way radiotelephone apparatus now used asoperational equipment on board vessels is not kept in good operationalcondition, and that regulations were needed to cover maintenance and spareparts requirements. The FCC is responsible for regulations covering radioequipment and its operation. That agency requires operational testing ofthis equipment once a week in its regulations at 47 CFR 80.834(c). Thistesting should determine if the equipment is in good operating conditionand whether or not it needs repair. This comment has been forwarded tothe FCC for their consideration.b. On March 18, 1974, the Coast Guard published rules that required inspectedvessels in ocean and coastwise service to carry Class A Emergency PositionIndicating Radio Beacons (EPIRBs) operating on 121.5/243 MHz (39 FR 10139).Vessels in coastwise service could escape the requirement under certainconditions. On October 18, 1984, the Coast Guard published final rulesthat required vessels operating on the Great Lakes to carry Class C EPIRBsoperating on VHF-FM channels 15 and 16 (49 FR 40407).(1) For vessels in ocean, short international voyage, coastwise, or GreatLakes service, the regulations proposed in andSection; 199.64(a) would requireon each side of the vessel, a Federal Communications Commission (FCC) TypeAccepted float-free EPIRBs operating on the dedicated satellite frequencyof 406.025 MHz. Elimination of the exemption for coastwise service is proposedsince rapid alerting and location of vessels in distress in this regionis as necessary as it is further at sea. The ``406'' MHz Satellite EPIRBsystem not only provides improved alerting and locating over conventionalEPIRBs operating on 121.5/243 MHz, but also includes safeguards to preventproblems arising from false alarms. False alarms are a major problem whichlimit the effectiveness of the 121.5/243 MHz system. Although ``COSPAS/SARSAT''search and rescue satellites can receive 121.5 MHz signals, 121.5/243 MHzEPIRBs are not designed as ``Satellite EPIRBs'' and their coverage areaand alert and locate ability is significantly inferior to that of the 406MHz Satellite EPIRB. Necessary final rules permitting manufacture and saleof 406 MHz Satellite EPIRBs were published by the Federal CommunicationsCommission (FCC) on September 26, 1988 (53 FR 37308). These beacons shouldbe readily available later this year.(2) The proposed regulations would require two 406 MHz Satellite EPIRBs,one on each side of the vessel. The present regulations require only oneClass A EPIRB. This proposal is made because vessels often list stronglyto one side, or roll over before sinking, which could render a single EPIRBinoperable. A fire or explosion could also destroy a single EPIRB, or makeit inaccessible. The second EPIRB also provides added reliability. We alsobelieve that under certain conditions, these EPIRBs can be substitutedfor the Class S EPIRBs or transponders discussed in paragraph (c.) whichfollows. The substitution is proposed in andSection; 199.64(b)(3). Havingtwo 406 MHz Satellite EPIRBs on the vessel could be more economical thanhaving one 406 MHz Satellite EPIRB and two Class S EPIRBs or transponderson the vessel.(3) The Coast Guard recognizes that many vessels have Class A EPIRBs incompliance with the present regulations, and that this equipment has along service life. Therefore, proposed andSection; 199.64(d) would allowClass A EPIRBs that are installed on or before the effective date of thefinal rules to be carried for about 6 years. This phase-in period is identicalto the period provided for fishing vessels, fish processing, and fish tendervessels under a final rule published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>on August 17, 1988 (53 FR 31004). At the presenttime a revision to SOLAS 74/83 is under consideration at IMO, which wouldintroduce the Global Maritime Distress and Safety System (GMDSS). The revisionis expected to be accepted at an international conference in late 1988.Satellite 406 MHz EPIRBs are part of the GMDSS, and the revision couldcome into force as soon as 1993, with all ships on an international voyagerequired to carry Satellite EPIRBs at that time. In spite of the 6-yearphase-in period proposed in this notice, vessels on international voyageswould have to comply with any earlier SOLAS amendment date in order tobe issued SOLAS Safety Certificates.(4) For vessels in Great Lakes service, the regulations proposed in andSection;199.64(e) would also require the 406 MHz Satellite EPIRB to replace thetwo Class C EPIRBs within 6 years. The Class C EPIRBs do not have the falsealarm problem that Class A EPIRBs do and can provide an immediate alertwithout having to wait for a satellite to pass within range, since theGreat Lakes have virtual full coast station coverage of the VHF-FM systemon which Class C EPRIBs operate. On the negative side, the Class C EPIRB'sshort low-power alert signal on channel 16 can easily be drowned out bymore powerful transmissions on that busy channel. They are not recognizedas a distress device in Canada, or anywhere else outside the United States.Because of the limited use of these devices, EPIRB transmissions on channel16 often aren't recognized by persons guarding the channel, and the transmissionmay not be identified as a distress.(5) Under proposed andSection; 199.66, each vessel on an international voyagenow required to carry a portable radio apparatus for survival craft (portablelifeboat radio), would not have to carry one once the vessel is equippedwith the 406 MHz Satellite EPIRB. The United States will have to file aSOLAS Equivalency Statement with IMO for this rule, since the portableradio apparatus will still be required under SOLAS 74/83 until the SOLASamendments providing for the GMDSS come into force. The equivalency statementwould be based on the vessel carrying a float-free Category 1 SatelliteEPIRB, in addition to locating equipment for survival craft consistingof Class S EPIRBs, transponders, or Category 2 Satellite EPIRBs as discussedin paragraph (c.), which follows.(6) Three comments opposed EPIRBs for inshore or river operations. Theregulations proposed in this notice would not require any EPIRBs on vesselsin river service, or in lakes, bays, and sounds service. c. Regulation III/6.2.3 of SOLAS 74/83 requires each vessel to carry twosurvival craft EPIRBs, one on each side of the ship, stowed in a way thatthey can be rapidly placed in survival craft. Survival craft EPIRBs aredesignated as Class S EPIRBs by the FCC, and the rules published by theFCC on May 1, 1985 (50 FR 18489) included technical requirements for them.Under the GMDSS, the Class S EPIRB would be replaced by a Search and RescueTransponder (SART). These SARTs would be required to be stowed one on eachside of the ship in such locations that they can be readily placed in anysurvival craft, or else one would have to be carried in each survival craft.The Coast Guard is proposing that each lifeboat and rescue boat carry eithera Class S EPIRB, a 406 MHz Satellite EPIRB, or a SART instead of havingjust one stowed on each side of the vessel for use of all the survivalcraft on the vessel. This arrangement should provide more protected stowagefor the EPIRB or SART. More importantly, it simplifies the abandonmentprocedure by eliminating an additional item that has to be remembered,and since each lifeboat and rescue boat would be provided with an EPIRBor SART, survivors of a casualty should be able to be more rapidly located.For liferafts, the proposed andSection; 199.64(b) would require one EPIRBor SART on each side of the vessel unless each liferaft carries one ofthese devices. Carriage of EPIRBs or SARTs in the liferafts would be desirablefor the same reasons as discussed for lifeboats and rescue boats, but theoption being proposed would allow the saving of weight in liferafts limitedto 185 kg under SOLAS 74/83 Regulation III/38.2.2. Note that the presentFCC regulations at 47 CFR 80.833(b) require Class S EPIRBs to be stowedin survival craft, so if this proposal is adopted as a final rule, theCoast Guard will have to request a change in the FCC rules. The proposedregulations requiring an EPIRB or SART in survival craft are consistentwith a recommendation on survival craft EPIRBs made by the Coast GuardMarine Board of Investigation on the sinking of the drillship GLOMAR JAVASEA. Since the EPIRB or SART would be required to be carried in lifeboatsand rescue boats, ``EPIRB/SART'' is listed as an item of survival craftequipment in proposed andSection; 199.175(c)(12). Lifeboats and rescue boatsequipped with SARTs will not have to carry the passive radar reflectorrequired in proposed andSection; 199.175(c)(34) and under SOLAS 74/83 RegulationsIII/38.5.1.14 and III/41.8.30. (1) The ANPRM of December 31, 1984 stated that the Coast Guard would proposethat a Class S EPIRB in a float-free liferaft be required to activate automaticallywhen the raft floats free and inflates. The present requirement for theClass A float-free EPIRB on the vessel could then be eliminated. One commentidentified a number of potential problems with the automatic activatingEPIRB in a float-free raft. Another favored retaining the Class A EPIRBin addition to the Class S EPIRB. Since neither the Class S EPIRB nor theSART will have a 406 MHz signal, neither can perform the function of the406 MHz Satellite EPIRB; therefore, neither can replace the 406 MHz SatelliteEPIRB whether automatically activated or not. For this reason, the regulationsproposed in this notice do not propose automatic operation for any ClassS EPIRBs or SARTs. (2) Two comments suggested that new EPIRBs for survival craft should notbe required until the GMDSS and the international rescue apparatus arein place. Class S EPIRBs and SARTs do not need any special internationalrescue apparatus to operate. Class S EPIRBs function with existing aeronauticalradios, direction finders on larger Coast Guard cutters, and the COSPAS/SARSATsatellite system. SARTs function with most radar sets which operate inthe bands 9200-9500 MHz or 9300-9500 MHz. The GMDSS is expected to be adopted(although not fully implemented) by the time the final rules arising fromthis notice are in effect. (3) Vessels subject to SOLAS 74/83 built since July l, 1986 have been requiredto be equipped with Class S EPIRBs. Class S EPIRBs have circuitry similarto Class A EPIRBs, so they will be detected by COSPAS/SARSAT satellites.Consequently, andSection; 199.175(c)(12) would permit continued use of ClassS EPIRBs. The United States is considering allowing Class S EPIRBs or 406MHz Satellite EPIRBs to be used instead of SARTs even after the GMDSS isin place. In order to do this, the United States will have to file an equivalencystatement with IMO when the GMDSS requirement for SARTs goes into effect.SARTs allow any ship with a 9 GHz radar set to locate survival craft ata range of 6 to 10 nautical miles. These detection ranges were determinedin testing using Coast Guard cutters and aircraft. Aircraft with compatibleradar can locate SARTs at a range of up to 20 nautical miles. About halfof the Coast Guard's aircraft do not have compatible radar and would notdetect SARTs. Commercial airliners and most military aricraft would alsobe incapable of detecting SARTs. On the other hand, Class S EPIRBs and406 MHz Satellite EPIRBs are detectible at relatively long ranges by CoastGuard, civil, and military aircraft. (Satellite EPIRBs operation on 406MHz will also have a low-power homing beacon operating on the same 121.5MHz frequency as Class S EPIRBs.) Large Coast Guard cutters can also homeon this signal, although few other ships have this capability. (3) Two comments supported the proposal to have an EPIRB in each survivalcraft. Another comment supported an EPIRB in each lifeboat, but not inthe inflatable liferafts, stating that their usefulness was doubtful inview of the other EPIRBs on board, and their functional reliability ina liferaft would be questionable. The comment did not explain why the reliabilityof an EPIRB in the liferaft was doubtful. Two comments concerned the possibilitythat an excessive number of EPIRBs would create problems with multipletransmission sources. Another did not agree that pilferage of EPIRBs wasa problem, or that they were necessarily more secure in a lifeboat. Thesame comment expressed doubt that EPIRBs would be likely to be forgottenif they were stowed outside a survival craft. Our understanding is thatpilferage of Class A EPIRBs has been a problem, and that they are oftenlocked up when the vessel is in port. If survival craft EPIRBs and SARTsare not stowed in the survival craft, they would have to be kept in prominentlymarked boxes on deck. Stowage in a lifeboat equipment locker, and especiallyin a packed inflatable liferaft would appear to be more secure. We believethat the equipment should be stowed where it will be used_in the survivalcraft. Although a well-trained crew might not forget to carry the EPIRBor SART to the survival craft, the abandonment procedure should not beunnecessarily complicated by additional tasks to be carried out under emergencyconditions. We believe that the requirement for carriage of EPIRBs or SARTsin lifeboats and rescue boats, and the option to carry EPIRBs or SARTsfor liferafts either on deck or in the liferaft, provides the best balanceamong the various concerns. <ITAG tagnum="84">Rapid Launching of Survival Craft </ITAG>The ability to abandon a vessel quickly is often important in a marinecasualty. A number of proposed new requirements are intended to make suresurvival craft can be quickly boarded and launched. a. Proposed andSection; 199.110(c) would require muster and embarkation stationsfor survival craft boarded before they are launched, to be arranged toenable stretcher cases to be placed in survival craft. This proposal isbased on Regulation III/11.6 of SOLAS 74/83 and is intended to make surethat loading of disabled persons into the survival craft does not undulydelay launching of the survival craft. One comment expressed concern thatall totally enclosed lifeboats might not have entrances sized to allowstretcher loading, and that the embarkation areas on existing vessels mighthave to be rearranged to provide for stretcher access. There is no intentto have existing vessels rearranged to meet this requirement. All new totallyenclosed lifeboats built to meet SOLAS 74/83 will have entrances sizedto permit stretcher loading. The embarkation area on new vessels wouldhave to be arranged so that the stretcher could be loaded in the intendedmanner. This is a detail that will have to be considered when the vessel'sembarkation area is designed, but it should not normally result in difficultyor additional cost.b. Proposed andSection; 199.110(d) would require embarkation stations tobe located where it is not necessary to climb more than three steps orclimb over obstructions to reach the embarkation station from the adjacentdeck house and to board the survival craft from the embarkation station.There is no corresponding requirement in the present regulations becauseconventional launching arrangements require lifeboats to be lowered tothe deck edge in order to be boarded. This arrangement limits climbingto board the survival craft. The proposed regulation would make sure thatfuture survival craft installations continue to minimize the need for climbingto board the survival craft. c. Proposed andSection; 199.135(c) would require a gate or other suitableopening in the rail or bulwark adjacent to the stowage location of eachliferaft and inflatable buoyant apparatus, not served by a launching appliance,unless the raft is mounted above the rail so it can be pushed overboard.This is to enable the liferaft or inflatable buoyant apparatus to be pushedover the side without lifting it. The need to lift a liferaft over therail has been a problem in several casualties, and recommendations to providean opening in the rail or bulwark were made by the Marine Board of Investigationon the explosion and fire aboard the SS PUERTO RICAN, and by the investigatingofficer on the fire aboard the M/V FINALISTA 100. d. Proposed andSection; 199.150(c) would require all new launching appliancesto operate only by gravity or stored mechanical power. Launching systemsthat depend on manual power would not be permitted because of the longtime required to launch a survival craft by manual means. Note, however,that proposed andSection; 199.130(a)(2) would permit manual power to be usedto bring a davit launched liferaft from its stowed position to the embarkationposition. Stored electrical power (batteries) would also not be permittedbecause of reliability problems and diminished performance at low temperatures.e. Proposed andSection; 199.153(i) would establish a formula to determinethe minimum lowering speed for survival craft launched by a system employingfalls and a winch. The minimum speed increases as the launch height increases.The formula comes from Regulation III/48.2.6 of SOLAS 74/83, although thatregulation does not state the condition of survival craft loading for whichthe formula is intended. Based on correspondence with several foreign maritimeregulatory agencies, we believe that most of the drafters of SOLAS 74/83intended this formula to apply to a fully loaded survival craft. Therefore,proposed andSection; 199.153(i) would apply to a loaded survival craft. Arelated proposed regulation is andSection; 199.153(j) which would requirea lowering speed for a light survival craft to be not less than 70% ofthe speed required under andSection; 199.153(i). One comment expressed concernabout the application of this regulation to MODUs, because the high freeboardsof these vessels would result in extremely high launching speeds when theformula in Regulation III/48.2.6 of SOLAS 74/83 is used. The comment pointedout that the SOLAS 74/83 regulation was developed for conventional vesselsto limit the swinging of a lifeboat against the side of a rolling vesselas the lifeboat is launched, and that this should not be a concern on MODUsbecause of the clearance requirement which is covered under proposed andSection;199.650(d) of this notice. We agree with this comment, but the concernis addressed by the 30 m launching height limit used to calculate the loweringspeed under proposed andSection; 199.153(i). No lifeboat would be requiredto have a loaded lowering speed greater than 1 m/sec. f. Proposed andSection; 199.153(k) would establish a maximum lowering speedof 1.3 m/sec. (256 ft./min.). Regulation III/48.2.7. of SOLAS 74/83 requiresAdministrations to establish a maximum lowering speed. g. Proposed andSection; 199.245(b) would require the total number of personson board a passenger vessel to be able to be launched in survival craftwithin 30 minutes from the time the abandon-ship signal is given. Othervessels would be required to provide for abandonment in 10 minutes underproposed andSection; 199.280(e). One comment expressed support for the 10minute requirement on cargo vessels. h. Conventional lifeboat launching systems require the lifeboat to be movedfrom its stowage position, down to an embarkation position at the edgeof a lower deck. The boat is held close to the deck by ``tricing pendants.''``Frapping lines'' are then passed around the falls and the tricing pendantslet go. The boat is then boarded, the frapping lines let out, and the boatlowered. A superior method allows all persons to board the lifeboat atthe stowage position and launch the lifeboat directly. The regulationsproposed in this notice would allow this method of launching from the stowedposition for passenger vessels (andSection; 199.220(a)(1)) and require itfor other vessels (andSection; 199.280(b)). During discussions on this matterat IMO prior to the completion of SOLAS 74/83, the delegates decided notto require this method of launching on passenger ships because (1) it hadnot been demonstrated with the large lifeboats that are typical on passengerships, and (2) if the lifeboats were located on one of the upper decksin a typical passenger ship configuration, passengers would be requiredto climb at least one additional deck level to board the lifeboats, andthe loaded lifeboats higher on the vessel could adversely affect the stabilityof a ship already in danger. These problems could be overcome by a departurefrom typical passenger ship configuration by locating the lifeboats ata lower deck. Some ship designers have indicated an interest in stowinglifeboats at a lower level with launching directly from the stowed position.IMO committees are now considering a proposed recommendation to limit passengership lifeboats to a stowage height of 13.5 m (44.3 ft.). Comments are specificallyrequested on passenger ship lifeboat stowage and launching arrangements.i. One new system of lifeboat launching is the free-fall system. It isintended to improve the speed and reliability of lifeboat launching byeliminating the need to lower the lifeboat to the water on a wire. Instead,the boat is boarded on the vessel and, when all on board are strapped intotheir specially designed seats, the boat is released and allowed to dropinto the water. The design of the boat and its angle of entry into thewater are such that the boat with the survivors can safely endure the impactwith the water, and the boat is carried safely away from the vessel. SOLAS74/83 provides for the approval of free-fall lifeboats in Regulations III/44.6and III/48.4, and the Coast Guard has already approved one such a systemas equivalent to a conventional launching system. Free-fall systems couldbe used in place of conventional launching systems on most vessels, exceptthey would not be permitted on passenger vessels. Proper training essentialfor the safe use of free-fall systems is not practical for passengers.Free-fall lifeboats are most likely to be used on MODUs and on large cargoand tank vessels. Proposed andSection; 199.261(c) would permit the use offree-fall launched lifeboats on the stern of cargo and tank vessels. Thisproposed regulation is based on Regulation III/26.1.2 of SOLAS 74/83. Thelifeboats required on a MODU under proposed andSection; 199.605(b) couldbe free-fall boats also. One comment expressed concern about the vulnerabilityof a stern-mounted free-fall boat to storm damage, and its ability to getaway from the stern of the vessel. There are no free-fall lifeboats onU.S. flag cargo vessels or tankers, but several vessels registered in othercountries are equipped with such systems. The boats are mounted high enoughon the stern to prevent wave damage, and the motion given the boat by thefree-fall ramp propels it away from the stern. (j) Proposed andSection; 199.135(f) would require float-free liferafts andinflatable buoyant apparatus to use hydrostatic release units for the firsttime. Existing regulations allow the use of float-free arrangements whichkeep the raft from shifting on deck, but which permit it to float upwardand away from a sinking vessel unrestrained. This arrangement, and thearrangement of the present Coast Guard approved hydraulic release, requirethat the raft painter be secured to the vessel by a weak link, which breaksunder the buoyant force of the raft. This keeps the sinking ship from sinkingthe raft by dragging it under by its painter. Unfortunately, this arrangementalso means if the raft is launched manually, it is secured only by theweak link. The weak link can easily break under the force of wind and waves,which can lead to loss of the raft before it is boarded. This problem canbe solved by belaying the painter to a cleat, but this defeats the protectionof the weak link if the vessel sinks. Proposed andSection; 199.135(f) andnew hydrostatic releases approved under SOLAS 74/83 solve these problemsby allowing the raft to be manually released from the hydrostatic release,without releasing the painter from the vessel. The painter remains securedto the vessel through the hydrostatic release. If the vessel sinks, thehydrostatic release releases the painter, which remains secured to thevessel only by the weak link. The weak link is loaded only if the vesselsinks. This system has been required by other countries for many years,and seems to work well. <ITAG tagnum="84">Launching at a 20anddegrees; List </ITAG>Present regulations and SOLAS 74/83 requirements generally require survivalcraft to be launched with the vessel trimmed to 10anddegrees; and listedto 15anddegrees;. SOLAS 74/83 generally requires survival craft launchingappliances to operate at a 10anddegrees; trim and 20anddegrees; list. The draftersof SOLAS 74/83 Chapter III added the requirement for operation at an additional5anddegrees; list to allow for launching of survival craft if the decisionto abandon ship is made with the ship listing as much as 20anddegrees;.a. Proposed andSection; 199.130(a)(1)(iii)(C) would require the survivalcraft in the embarkation position to be above the waterline with the vessellisted to 20anddegrees;. b. Proposed andSection; 199.150(a)(1)(ii) would permit certain survival craftboarded from a position less than 4.5 m (14 ft., 9 in.) above the waterline(generally liferafts) to not have a launching appliance if the survivalcraft is stowed for launching directly from the stowed position under unfavorableconditions of trim of up to 10anddegrees; and with the vessel listed up to20anddegrees; either way. c. Proposed andSection; 199.150(b) would require launching appliances tosafely lower survival craft against a trim of up to 10anddegrees; and a listof up to 20anddegrees; on the high side, and the greater of 20anddegrees; orthe degree of list where the survival craft becomes waterborne, whicheveris the greater, on the low side.  d. Proposed andSection; 199.150(d) would require a factor of safety of 4.5for launching appliances and their attachments in accordance with RegulationIII/48.1.8 of SOLAS 74/83. Present regulations require a factor of safetyof 6; however, the present factor of safety applies to a vessel with alist of 15anddegrees;. The factor of safety of 4.5 would apply to the new20anddegrees; list requirement, which for davits should be roughly equivalentto a factor of safety of 6 at 15anddegrees; list. e. Proposed andSection; 199.153(d) would require falls long enough for thesurvival craft to reach the water with the vessel in its lightest seagoingcondition, under unfavorable conditions of trim and with the vessel listedup to 20anddegrees; either way. f. Proposed andSection; 199.157(d) would require a davit span for each openlifeboat and partially enclosed lifeboat. Each davit span would have tobe provided with not less than two lifelines of sufficient length to reachthe water with the vessel in its lightest seagoing condition, under unfavorableconditions of trim and with the vessel listed up to 20anddegrees; eitherway. g. Proposed andSection; 199.320(b) would require survival craft on an oiltanker, chemical tanker, or gas carrier to be safely lowered on the lowerside of the vessel at the final angle of heel calculated under_ (1) MARPOL 73/78 in the case of an oil tanker; (2) The International Code for the Construction and Equipment of Shipscarrying Dangerous Chemicals in Bulk (IBC Code) in the case of a chemicaltanker; or (3) The International Code for the Construction and Equipment of Shipscarrying Liquefied Gases in Bulk (IGC Code) in the case of a gas carrier.<ITAG tagnum="84">Availability of Survival Craft </ITAG>a. Proposed andSection; 199.261(b)(2) would require ocean and coastwise cargovessels and other ocean and coastwise vessels required to meet the cargovessel regulations, to carry liferafts for the total number of personspermitted on board. These liferafts are in addition to the lifeboats carried.This proposed regulation is based on Regulation III/26.1.1.2 of SOLAS 74/83,and is an increase over present requirements. Both Coast Guard regulationsand SOLAS 1974 require these vessels to carry liferafts for 50% of thepersons on board. These liferafts are required to automatically float freeif the vessel sinks so that there are survival craft available in casethe lifeboats can not be launched before the vessel sinks. The liferaftsare also available in case the lifeboats can not be used for some otherreason. A sufficient number of liferafts should therefore be availableto accommodate all persons on board the vessel. (1) Additional liferafts were recommended by the National TransportationSafety Board as a result of its investigations of the casualties involvingthe TEXACO OKLAHOMA and the PANOCEANIC FAITH. (2) One comment on the ANPRM stated that 100% liferaft capacity was probablyunnecessary since all hands would probably not get clear of a vessel thatsank too rapidly to launch the lifeboats. The comment may be correct forsome casualties, but the recommendations cited in the preceding paragrapharose from casualties where the present 50% liferaft capacity was not adequate.This matter also was discussed at length by the Lifesaving Appliances Subcommitteeand the Maritime Safety Committee of IMO before the 100% liferaft requirementwas finally adopted as part of the new Chapter III of SOLAS 74/83. A numberof other countries cited casualties to their vessels in which the present50% liferaft capacity was inadequate. b. The present regulations for seagoing cargo barges in 46 CFR 94.10-15require only a lifeboat with a capacity of 80 cubic feet, or the equivalentcapacity in inflatable liferafts for those barges small enough to qualifyfor substitution of liferafts for lifeboats. For tank barges in ocean andcoastwise service, 46 CFR 33.05-5 and 33.05-15 require lifeboats of 125cubic foot capacity. A typical 80 cubic foot capacity lifeboat would beabout 13 feet long with a capacity of 5 persons. A typical 125 cubic footcapacity lifeboat would be about 16 feet long with a capacity of 9 persons.Open lifeboats this size would probably be inadequate in heavy seas, andno provision is made to provide spare survival craft in case the boat islost or made unusable. Under proposed andSection; 199.261(d), most seagoingcargo barges would be required to carry an inflatable liferaft on eachside capable of accommodating all persons permitted on board the barge.Under proposed andSection; 199.310(c), tank barges over 500 tons gross tonnagewould have to have the same fire-protected lifeboats as self-propelledvessels. <ITAG tagnum="84">Survival Craft and Rescue Boat Equipment </ITAG>Proposed andSection; 199.175(c) and Table 199.175(c) contain requirementsfor survival craft and rescue boat equipment. Note that the liferaft equipmentcovered in this section is for rigid liferafts only. There are no rigidliferafts approved by the Coast Guard for new production at this time.Equipment for inflatable liferafts is covered in 46 CFR 160.051, and revisionsto that section to meet the SOLAS 74/83 requirements will be proposed undera separate notice. The quantities of equipment have been revised for vesselsin ocean and short international voyage service to be consistent with SOLAS74/83. Few revisions have been made to the quantities of equipment requiredfor vessels in Great Lakes; lakes, bays, and sounds; and river services.Comments are specifically requested on whether or not additional changesshould be made to the equipment lists for these services. Items to consideradding are first aid kits, heaving line, knife or jackknife, ladder, orangesmoke signals, and a signal mirror. The lifeboat equipment list has beenrevised to eliminate special equipment requirements for seagoing bargesand for Great Lakes cargo vessels not carrying cargo. In the followingdiscussion, the item number refers to both the paragraph number under proposedandSection; 199.175(c) and the number used in Table 199.175(c). a. Item 3 covers requirements for lifeboat bilge pumps. The size of thebilge pump is governed by the cubic capacity of the lifeboat under presentregulations, but cubic capacity will no longer be used to describe lifeboatsize. Instead, the persons capacity is used to determine bilge pump size.The size 1 bilge pump has also been deleted since there have been no CoastGuard approved size 1 bilge pumps produced in over 10 years. b. Item 4 covers boathooks. The 1\3/4\andmin16;andmin16; and 2andmin16;andmin16;pole diameter sizes are no longer listed since they are no longer generallyavailable. Boathooks would be required to be of at least the 1\1/2\andmin16;andmin16;size under item 4 as proposed. c. SOLAS 74/83 requires lifeboats and liferafts to carry 3 can openers.Item 6 covers this proposed requirement. The can opener in the Coast Guardapproved jackknife under item 20 could be used to meet the requirementfor one of these can openers. d. Item 7 covers the proposed requirement for a compass on a lifeboat andrescue boat. Coast Guard approved compasses in open lifeboats and manytotally enclosed lifeboats are now mounted in a box which is stowed inan equipment locker. The proposed regulation would require the compassin a totally enclosed lifeboat to be permanently installed at the steeringposition. This can be done in an enclosed lifeboat since the compass wouldbe adequately protected from the weather by the boat enclosure, it wouldreduce the need for stowage space, it would make the compass availablefor immediate use, and it could make the compass less susceptible to loss.In other than totally enclosed lifeboats, the compass could either be permanentlyinstalled, or be of the conventional removable arrangement. e. The dipper required in a lifeboat for collected rain water under SOLAS74/83 is covered in item 9. f. Item 16 covers flashlights. The Coast Guard removed 46 CFR 160.008 ina Final Rule published May 18, 1988 at 53 FR 17702. That specificationregulation was replaced by American Society for Testing and Materials (ASTM)Standard F1014. Item 16 reflects the revision. g. Item 22 covers proposed requirements for the lifeboat and rescue boatboarding ladder. For the first time, a permanently installed rigid ladderwould be allowed for this purpose in place of a rope ladder. Present regulationsrequire the rope ladder to be kept on the side benches rigged ready forimmediate use. The proposed regulations would now require a rope ladderto be rigged outboard at all times. If these boats are empty and not launchedwhen a vessel sinks, they can be torn loose of their davits as the vesselsinks and could be used by survivors that are cast into the water. Theladder needs to be readily available for the use of those that need toboard the boat from the water. Comments are specifically requested on problemsor advantages involved in keeping the ladder rigged outboard. h. Item 23 covers proposed requirements for the lifeboat lantern. Presentregulations require an oil lantern; however, under the proposed regulations,totally enclosed and partially enclosed lifeboats would have to have aninterior lighting system installed by the manufacturer. Item 26, matches,and item 29, illuminating oil are related items.i. Item 28 covers the requirement to carry oars, but for new lifeboats,paddles would be acceptable if the manufacturer of the lifeboat demonstratesthat paddles can be used for manual propulsion. Totally enclosed lifeboatsare generally not arranged for efficient operation under oars.j. Item 31 would establish a minimum length of 15 m (50 ft.) for lifeboatpainters in order to be consistent with SOLAS 74/83. SOLAS 74/83 also requiresa minimum length of two times the distance from the stowage position tothe waterline; however, item 31 would retain the requirement in the presentregulations for a length of at least 3 times the distance from the stowageposition to the waterline.k. Item 32 contains proposed revisions to the requirements for provisions.Existing regulations require 2 lb. of hard bread plus 1 lb. of condensedmilk per person in each lifeboat. Hard bread has not been used for manyyears, but provision manufacturers have instead provided a mixture of biscuits,sugar, and sometimes other components, which together with the condensedmilk provided about 5,000 calories of food energy value per person. Recentexperience with major commercial vessel casualties indicates that the lifeboatrations are rarely, if ever used. Water is more important to long termsurvival. Consequently, the proposed regulations would require emergencyprovisions with a total food value of at least 10,000 kJ (2,390 calories),or roughly half of the present requirements. This is consistent with RegulationIII/41.8.12 of SOLAS 74/83. Condensed milk would no longer be part of theration requirement. The condensed milk was once intended for babies andthose with injuries that prevented them from chewing. New Coast Guard approvedrations will have to include a water soluble component to take care ofthese needs. Furthermore, condensed milk increases the body's need forwater and is therefore not appropriate as a sea survival ration. Condensedmilk has also not been available in corrosion-resistant containers, makingit especially troublesome for stowage in lifeboats.l. Item 35 would require a rain water collection device for many totallyenclosed lifeboats. The water tanks in lifeboats are required to be designedfor the stowage of collected rain water and open lifeboats are requiredto be equipped with protective covers that incorporate a rain water collectiondevice. The rain water collection device requirement would result in alllifeboats being able to collect and make use of rain water.m. Item 38 contains the requirement for sea anchors. SOLAS 74/83 no longerrequires storm oil for the totally enclosed and partially enclosed lifeboatsnow required under that convention. Storm oil is dispensed from a containerattached to the sea anchor, and is intended to lessen the chance of wavesbreaking over the lifeboat. The enclosures of the totally enclosed andpartially enclosed lifeboats make storm oil less important. The proposedregulations would also not require storm oil in totally enclosed and partiallyenclosed lifeboats, but would continue to require it to be carried in openlifeboats.n. Item 39 would require each new lifeboat and rescue boat on vessels inocean, short international voyage, coastwise, and Great Lakes service tobe equipped with a searchlight. This is a new requirement, since in thepast, searchlights were required only on certain lifeboats on passengervessels.(1) Regulations III/41.8.29 and III/47.2.2.11 of SOLAS 74/83 require searchlightson lifeboats and rescue boats. Searchlights were not required on lifeboatsin the past, since many lifeboats did not have engines and electrical systems.All new lifeboats in these services would be engine driven, and would thereforehave a means to keep the searchlight battery charged. Searchlights havealso become more important since the widespread use of retroreflectivematerial on survival equipment has made searching for survivors in thewater at night a realistic possibility.(2) Passenger vessel searchlights were previously approved under 46 CFR161.006. This specification regulation originated over 40 years ago andhas become obsolete. The American Society for Testing and Materials hasdeveloped a voluntary consensus standard (ASTM FI003) for lifeboat searchlightsmeeting the SOLAS 74/83 requirements. Item 39 proposes to require a searchlightcertified to meet ASTM FI003. This notice also proposes removal of obsolete46 CFR 161.006.o. Item 40 would require lifeboats and liferafts on vessels in ocean, shortinternational voyage, and coastwise service to carry a seasickness kitfor each person, consisting of a seasickness bag and six doses of seasicknessmedication. This is consistent with Regulations III/38.5.21 and III/41.8.21of SOLAS 74/83. The Marine Board of Investigation on the SILVER DOVE alsorecommended that seasickness medication be carried in lifeboats. Presentregulations require inflatable liferafts to carry seasickness medication.The combination of ephedrine sulfate and promethazine hydrochloride prescribedas one option in the proposed regulations has been found by the Coast Guardto be the most effective seasickness remedy available at the present time.These drugs are taken orally and must remain in the digestive system forseveral hours to be completely absorbed. The other option, scopolaminein a transdermal patch, has been found to be significantly more effectivein preventing seasickness than both dramamine and meclezine in clinicaltests, according to its manufacturer. Its advantage is that since its medicationis released through the skin, it will not be lost due to regurgitationas oral medication will. It takes four to six hours to become fully effective,and one patch provides about three days of effective medication. Both medicationoptions seem to be reasonably stable throughout a wide temperature range,but both would probably be damaged by extended storage at temperaturesabove 50 anddegrees;C (122 anddegrees;F) or 55 anddegrees;C (131 anddegrees;F).p. Regulation III/41.8.13 and III/41.8.14 of SOLAS 74/83 would requirefour parachute flares and six hand flares in lifeboats. Present Coast Guardregulations require 12 of each, and items 42 and 43 would continue to require12 parachute flares and 12 hand flares in ocean, short international voyage,and coastwise services. These flares do not add great expense, but theycan greatly assist search and rescue forces in locating survivors. Forthis reason, the present requirement is not proposed to be lowered to theminimum number required by SOLAS 74/83. Six hand flares and six parachuteflares would also be required for the first time in survival craft on vesselsin lakes, bays, and sounds service. These signals will assist searchersin locating survivors in these waters at night. Even recreational boatsoperating in some of these waters are now required to carry flares or otherapproved visual distress signals.q. Item 46 would require survival instructions in each lifeboat in accordancewith Regulation III.41.8.4 of SOLAS 74/83. Similar instructions are nowrequired in all inflatable liferafts.r. Item 48 would require thermal protective aids in lifeboats, liferafts,and rescue boats in ocean, short international voyage, and coastwise service.This item is discussed fully under the section on ``Prevention and Reductionof Hypothermia.''s. Item 49 covers the lifeboat tool kit which must contain sufficient toolsfor minor adjustments to the engine and its accessories. The minimum contentsof the kit are listed and are the same as the tool kit required in thepresent regulations. Comments are requested as to the adequacy of thiskit and whether or not additional items such as a Phillips screwdriverneed be added.t. Item 51 would require 3 liters of water per person on lifeboats in ocean,short international voyage, and coastwise service in accordance with RegulationIII/41.8.9 of SOLAS 74/83. The present regulations require 3 quarts ofwater per person. This change will result in an increase of approximately6% in the amount of water carried. SOLAS 74/83 permits water to be dispensedwith on liferafts with the SOLAS B pack (short international voyage). Theregulations proposed in this notice would require water to be carried inliferafts on vessels in short international voyage service, since vesselsin this service could be as far as 200 miles from port.u. Items 25, 28, and 37 make reference to regulations in effect for vesselson June 30, 1986. These items are all components of traditional open lifeboatsthat would eventually be phased out of use. Present regulations containdetailed requirements for these components, which are not appropriate formodern performance-oriented regulations. These details would be includedin a Navigation and Vessel Inspection Circular (NVIC) so that they willbe available for reference as long as the old lifeboats continue in use.A draft of the NVIC has been placed in the docket for examination and copying.v. A number of items have been determined to be unnecessary for use ona MODU, unless the MODU is on an international voyage. MODUs operatingin U.S. waters are always in known locations and there are usually othervessels or offshore activities nearby, so that some items intended forlong term survival are not necessary. These include item 28, oars; item32, provisions; and item 35, rain water collection device.w. The lifeline is no longer listed as an item of lifeboat equipment becauseit is already required as part of the lifeboat under 46 CFR 160.035.<ITAG tagnum="84">Hyperbaric Lifeboats</ITAG>Some lifeboat manufacturers now offer hyperbaric lifeboats which includea diver decompression chamber built into a totally enclosed lifeboat. Diversmust spend many hours or days allowing their bodies to readjust to atmosphericpressure after a long period underwater. Without proper decompression,divers can suffer serious injury or death. The hyperbaric lifeboat is intendedto prevent these injuries in the event of abandonment of a vessel withdecompressing divers aboard. The regulations proposed in this notice wouldnot require hyperbaric lifeboats, but comments are specifically requestedas to whether or not hyperbaric lifeboats or other provisions for decompressingdivers, should be required on vessels supporting saturation diving operations.<ITAG tagnum="84">Training and Drills</ITAG>A number of revisions, including equipment requirements, are proposed toimprove training and drills in survival systems. Many of the proposed revisionsare consistent with recommendations made in a Coast Guard sponsored studytitled ``Shipboard Training and Maintenance for Merchant Vessel SurvivalEquipment.'' (See ADDRESSES section for information on how to obtain acopy of this report.) The proposed regulations are also responsive to recommendationsto improve on-board training and drill requirements made by the MarineBoards of Investigation on casualties involving the GLOMAR JAVA SEA, theCHESTER A. POLING, the OCEAN EXPRESS, the EDMUND FITZGERALD, the TRANSHURON,and the WILLIAM T. STEELE. A similar recommendation was made by the NationalTransportation Safety Board after its investigation of the loss of theWILLIAM T. STEELE.a. Proposed andSection; 199.153(c) would require launching appliances usingfalls and a winch to have a single-part fall arrangement. This is not requiredunder SOLAS 74/83, but is included to facilitate training and other operationswhere recovery of the boat is required. Complete launching of survivalcraft during drills is important to make sure the crew is fully familiarwith the launching procedure. If recovery of the survival craft after launchingis too difficult, launching will be avoided. The presence of a heavy sheaveblock at the lower end of a multiple-part fall arrangement can make recoverydifficult. It can make reattachment of the falls to the survival craftdangerous, even in good weather. One of the findings of the Marine Boardof Investigation on the GLOMAR JAVA SEA, was that difficulty in reattachingthe falls to the lifeboats discouraged the crew from launching the boatduring drills. The single-part fall requirement would make a block at thelower end of the falls unnecessary. In addition to removing a hazard, facilitatingrecovery of the boat should encourage launching during drills. One disadvantageto the single-part fall requirement is that the fall wire would have tobe about 40% larger in diameter than the wire on a two-part fall, makingit stiffer and requiring larger sheaves and drums on the launching equipment.b. Present regulations require vessels to hold regular fire and boat drills.These drills have been traditionally considered and conducted as a singledrill. The requirements in Regulation III/18 of SOLAS 74/83 revise manyof the requirements for the ``abandon-ship'' drill and also include requirementsfor on-board training. For this reason, and to emphasize the differencebetween the fire training and drills and the abandon ship training anddrills, the regulations proposed in this notice separate these requirementsinto separate sections, and require the abandon-ship drills and fire drillsto be conducted separately. Drills would be somewhat more comprehensivethan they are presently, but would only be required on alternating weekson vessels other than passenger vessels. Present regulations require weeklydrills on all vessels. Passenger vessels would continue to be requiredto conduct weekly drills. The proposed fire drill requirements are in proposedandSection; 35.10-2 for tank vessels, andSection; 78.17-55 for passenger vessels,andSection; 97.15-40 for cargo and miscellaneous vessels, andSection; 109.213for MODUs, andSection; 167.65-2 for public nautical school vessels, and andSection;196.15-40 for oceanographic research vessels. Abandon ship training anddrills are covered in proposed andSection; 35.10-1 for tank vessels, andSection;78.17-50 for passenger vessels, andSection; 97.15-35 for cargo and miscellaneousvessels, and andSection; 109.215 for MODUs. Under proposed andSection; 167.65-1for public nautical school vessels, and andSection; 196.15-35 for oceanographicresearch vessels, drill requirements are those required for either passengervessels or cargo vessels, depending upon the lifesaving equipment installed.New training and drill requirements are discussed in the following paragraphs.Two comments suggested that training on board MODUs should be done in accordancewith IMO Resolution A.538(13), ``Maritime Safety Training of Personnelon Mobile Offshore Units''. The training and drill requirements proposedin this notice for MODUs are based in part on Resolution A.538, and arenot inconsistent with it. Resoultion A.538 was also used in developingthe revision to the IMO MODU Code discussed previously. On December 24,1987, the Coast Guard published an NPRM on an Emergency Evacuation Planfor Manned OCS Facilities (52 FR 48717). The Final Rules for abandonmentdrills on MODUs developed as a result of this NPRM may have to be revisedto take into account the Final Rules for Emergency Evacuation Plans, oncethose rules are published.c. Requirements for mustering and attending to passengers are presentlyincluded in the passenger vessel regulations. A limited number of passengersmay be carried on other vessels, so the proposed training and drill requirementsfor vessels other than passenger vessels include provisions for musteringand attending to passengers, when passengers are carried. Present regulationsdo not specifically require mustering of passengers, except for vesselson international voyages. Proposed andSection; 78.17-50(b)(3) would requirea muster of the passengers on other voyages, or at least calling the attentionof the passengers to the emergency instructions on voyages of less thanone day's duration. Under andSection;andSection; 35.10-1(b)(3) and 95.15-1(b)(3),a similar requirement is proposed for other vessels when they carry passengers.This proposal is responsive to a recommendation of the National TransporationSafety Board arising from the grounding of the M/V PILGRIM BELLE in July1985 (Recommendation M-86-60).d. Abandon-ship training material would be required to be on board eachvessel in accordance with SOLAS 74/83, regulations III/18.2 and III/51.This training material could either be in the form of manuals or audio-visualtraining aids. Much of this material would normally be supplied by thesurvival equipment manufacturer. Many manufacturers produce this materialat the present time, and make it available to vessel operators. Two commentsdid not favor a requirement for training manuals since the ship's officerswould be able to indoctrinate the crew in its use, and since certificatedpersonnel (lifeboatmen) would have been trained in lifesaving equipment.The training material is important because of the growing diversity oflifesaving equipment. Licensed and certificated personnel will have receivedbasic training using certain lifesaving equipment, but the various lifesavingequipment designs have important differences. The training material preparedby equipment manufacturers provides professionally prepared instructionalmaterial and important reference information.e. Present regulations require weekly fire and boat drills. Under RegulationIII/25.2 of SOLAS 74/83, weekly drills are required only on passenger vessels.Because of an increased emphasis on abandon ship training outside of drills,the proposals in this notice would require drills on alternating weekson vessels other than passenger vessels. Passenger vessels would continueto be required to conduct weekly drills. All vessels would be requiredto make sure that each crew member participates in at least one abandonship drill per month. Present regulations contain no participation requirements.Under the proposed regulations, abandon ship training would be requiredat the same intervals as the drills. This training would make use of thetraining materials discussed in the preceding paragraph. These new trainingand drill requirements should typically result in either an abandon shipdrill or a training session being held each week.f. Present regulations require each lifeboat to be lowered to the waterat least once every 3 months. The regulations proposed in this notice wouldrequire each boat not only to be lowered, but also to be launched and maneuveredin the water once every 3 months. This requirement comes from RegulationIII/18.3.7 of SOLAS 74/83.g. The proposed regulations would require at least one abandon ship drillevery 3 months to be held at night, unless the master determines it isunsafe to do so.h. Vessels equipped with davit-launched liferafts would be required tohave special training in the use of these rafts at intervals of not morethan 4 months. Whenever practicable, this would include inflation and loweringof a liferaft. One comment suggested that a liferaft that is ready to besent for servicing be permitted to be inflated and used for training. Wehave no objection to using a liferaft that is ready for servicing for thistraining. If a liferaft is used for this training, it could be a specialliferaft intended for training purposes only, or a liferaft that is aboutto be sent for servicing.<ITAG tagnum="84">Operational Readiness and Maintenance</ITAG>a. One way to keep the lifeboats in good operating condition and keep thecrew familiar with their launching and operation is to use them when thevessel is in a harbor or at an anchorage. Regulations proposed in thisnotice would permit such use of the lifeboats provided there are sufficientsurvival craft on the vessel to accommodate those remaining on board. Theproposed regulations are in andSection; 35.90-20(c) for tank vessels, andSection;78.95-20(c) for passenger vessels, and andSection; 97.90-20(c) for cargoand miscellaneous vessels. Under proposed andSection; 167.35-90 for publicnautical school vessels, and andSection; 196.90-20 for oceanographic researchvessels, operational readiness requirements are those required for eitherpassenger vessels or cargo vessels, depending upon the lifesaving equipmentinstalled. Operators should be aware that use of a lifeboat as a launchto carry passengers may require that the lifeboat also be certificatedas a small passenger vessel under 46 CFR Subchapter T.b. Regulations proposed in this notice would require falls on launchingappliances to be turned end for end at intervals of not more than 30 monthsand replaced at least every five years. This proposal is intended to preventthe failure of falls due to corrosion and other deterioration. The proposedregulations are in andSection; 35.90-40 for tank vessels, andSection; 78.95-40for passenger vessels, and andSection; 97.90-40 for cargo and miscellaneousvessels. Under proposed andSection; 167.35-90 for public nautical schoolvessels, and andSection; 196.90-20 for oceanographic research vessels, maintenancerequirements are those required for either passenger vessels or cargo vessels,depending upon the lifesaving equipment installed. Section 109.305 containsthe corresponding proposal for MODUs. It contains an alternative for afall which can not be turned end for end. Such a fall would have to becarefully inspected between 24 and 30 months after its installation. Ifthe inspection shows that the fall is faultless, it may be continued inservice up to 48 months after its installation, when it must be replaced.This provision is based on one in the draft revision of the IMO MODU Code.Comments are requested on whether or not a similar provision should bemade for other vessels not subject to SOLAS 74/83.One comment on the ANPRM opposed this requirement on the basis that itwould not be necessary if proper maintenance and visual inspections aredone on the falls. Another stated that there was no record of failuresjustifying the requirement, and that turning falls end-for-end could notbe done because the fittings on opposite ends of the falls were different.Visual inspections are not fully satisfactory for wire rope falls, sinceonly the exterior of the rope can be seen. There is a continuing historyof wire rope failures averaging between 3 and 4 incidents a year on inspectedU.S. vessels. Many of these failures have occurred with falls that are4 to 5 years old. Turning the falls end-for-end every 2\1/2\ years causesthe heavy wear areas to be distributed over different portions of the fallsand should therefore safely extend their life to 5 years. Manufacturerscan design fall attachments with identical fittings at each end to facilitateturning them end-for-end. Approved retrofits are also possible for existingdesigns. Other national shipping administrations have had similar experiencewith wire rope falls, which is what led to the adoption of this requirementas a part of SOLAS 74/83.c. Present regulations require flares and smoke signals to be replacedthree years after the date of manufacture. Emergency drinking water isto be replaced five years after its date of packing. Regulations like theseare difficult to comply with since the person maintaining these items musteither know the federal regulations, or else must refer to them. A simplermethod is to require expiration dates to be marked on the equipment sothat outdated equipment is evident. Expiration dates also allow for theuse of items that the manufacturer can show are more durable than the threeyear or five year service life. Many approval regulations already requireexpiration dates. This notice contains a proposed revision to 46 CFR 160.040-6that would add expiration dates to line throwing device expendables. Otherproposed regulations concerning annual inspection and repair would makeuse of these expiration dates. The proposed regulations are in andSection;35.90-75 (c), (d), and (e) for tank vessels; andSection; 78.95-75 (c), (d),and (e) for passenger vessels; andSection; 97.90-75 (c), (d), and (e) forcargo and miscellaneous vessels; and andSection; 109.315 (c), (d), and (e)for MODUs. Under proposed andSection; 167.35-90 for public nautical schoolvessels, and andSection; 196.90-20 for oceanographic research vessels, maintenancerequirements are those required for either passenger vessels or cargo vessels,depending upon the lifesaving equipment installed.<ITAG tagnum="84">Additional Requirements for Tank Vessels</ITAG>Tank vessels would be required to meet the same lifesaving system requirementsas cargo vessels, with certain additions.a. Under proposed andSection; 199.310(a), tank vessels certificated to carrycargos that emit toxic vapors or gases would be required to have gas protectedlifeboats. These are totally enclosed lifeboats with a compressed air systemthat can supply the occupants and the lifeboat engine for 10 minutes, inorder to provide time to escape from a toxic gas cloud.b. Proposed andSection; 199.310(b) would require tankers carrying flammablecargos to have fire protected lifeboats. These lifeboats have the samecompressed air system as gas protected lifeboats, but also have a waterspray system designed to prevent the lifeboat from being damaged in a firein the water for a period of at least 8 minutes. Fire protected lifeboatson tank vessels are required under regulation 26.1.7 of SOLAS 74/83. Theywere also recommended by the National Transportation Safety Board as aresult of its investigation of the collision between the SS EDGAR M. QUEENYand SS CORINTHOS. One comment opposed the requirement for fire protectedlifeboats on Great Lakes tankers, noting that these vessels are equippedwith foam fire extinguishing systems, and that there had been no tankercasualties on the Great Lakes where fire protected lifeboats would haveprevented any injury. The fire protected lifeboat is designed to go throughfire on the water once the vessel has been abandoned. In such cases, thefoam fire fighting system would be of little use since it is designed tofight a fire on deck, not on the water, and there would be no one on boardto operate the system after the vessel is abandoned. Great Lakes tank vesselswould be susceptible to the same fire hazards as any other tank vesselinvolved in a collision or explosion. The need for fire protected lifeboatswas demonstrated in the collision between the SS EDGAR M. QUEENY and SSCORINTHOS. The possible consequences of fire on the water were also demonstratedwhen eleven crewmembers of the SS ESSO BRUSSELS died when their lifeboatwas engulfed in fire on the water. The fire resulted when the SS C.V. SEAWITCH collided with the SS ESSO BRUSSELS in New York harbor in 1973.c. Proposed andSection; 199.310(b) would prohibit lifeboats with aluminumhulls or canopies on tank vessels. Proposed andSection; 199.320(c) wouldprohibit aluminum launching appliances. Aluminum has a low melting pointcompared to fiberglass and steel, which are the other materials used toconstruct lifeboats. The low melting point makes the aluminum lifeboatsusceptible to destruction in even a short exposure to fire on the deckof a vessel. Aluminum lifeboats have been destroyed on deck before theycould be used in tank vessel accidents. The Marine Board of Investigationon the collision between the SS KEYTRADER and SS BAUNE recommended thatthe use of aluminum lifeboats be discontinued on tankers. A test performedby the Coast Guard in 1979 confirmed the susceptibility of aluminum lifeboatsto rapid destruction in a short-term fire. This test is covered in a reporttitled ``Transitory Fire Resistance of Tanker Lifeboats.'' A copy of thisreport has been placed in the docket for this project, and a limited numberof copies are available. (See addresses section for information on howto obtain a copy of this report.) d. Survival craft would be required to be stowed in positions protectedfrom fire and explosion under proposed andSection; 199.310(d). This requirementis intended to keep the survival craft out of the ``line of sight'' ofthe area most likely to be involved in an explosion in order to shelterthem from the shock wave generated by the explosion. Comments are specificallyrequested on the problems or advantages involved in this proposed requirement.e. Certain tankers have damage stability characteristics that provide afinal angle of heel greater than the 20anddegrees; list for which survivalcraft launching appliances are generally intended. Since these tankersmight not be abandoned until that final angle of heel is reached, proposedandSection; 199.320(b) would require launching appliances on the low sideof the vessel to be able to be launched at the final angle of heel. <ITAG tagnum="84">Additional Requirements for Special Purpose Ships and Nautical SchoolShips </ITAG>The IMO Code for Special Purpose Ships is intended for vessels that frequentlycarry persons in addition to the crew. Examples are oceanographic researchvessels which carry a scientific team, and offshore supply vessels whichmay carry a variety of offshore workers. These ``special personnel'' areneither crew members, nor passengers. The regulations proposed in thisnotice would classify oceanographic research vessels and offshore supplyvessels as special purpose ships for the purpose of establishing requirementsfor lifesaving systems. The IMO Code for Special Purpose Ships has notbeen widely used in the United States. The code is intended for vesselsof 500 tons gross tonnage and above. In the United States, 46 U.S.C. 2101(19)limits the term ``offshore supply vessel'' to vessels ``of more than 15gross tons but less than 500 gross tons'', but for lifesaving purposes,the Code for Special Purpose Ships gives reasonable guidelines for vesselsof this type. As in the IMO Code for Special Purpose Ships, proposed andSection; 199.405would require these vessels to meet lifesaving system requirements forcargo vessels if they carry not more than 50 special personnel. If theycarry more than 50 special personnel, they would be required to meet thelifesaving system requirements for passenger vessels. The proposed regulationswould apply to all inspected oceanographic vessels including nonself-propelledvessels under 300 tons gross tonnage, presently exempted under 46 CFR 192.01-1(b)from all lifesaving equipment requirements except life preservers. Under proposed andSection; 199.505, public nautical school ships and civiliannautical school ships that meet the structural fire protection requirementsfor passenger vessel of the same size and service would be required tomeet the lifesaving requirements for passenger vessels. Other nauticalschool ships would be required to meet the lifesaving requirements forcargo vessels. <ITAG tagnum="84">Additional Requirements for Mobile Offshore Drilling Units </ITAG>Mobile Offshore Drilling Units (MODUs) would be required to meet the samegeneral lifesaving system requirements as any ocean service vessel, buta MODU may be one of several radically different types, most very differentfrom conventional vessels. U.S. registered MODUs may operate in virtuallyany marine oil-producing area in the world. For these reasons, most MODUsneed lifesaving systems that differ from either the cargo vessel or passengervessel classifications that are used for other types of vessels. One commenton the ANPRM suggested that the regulations should be subdivided into separaterequirements for the varying types of MODUs. As explained in the followingparagraphs, the regulations proposed in this notice do recognize the essentialdifferences between types of MODUs and provide for appropriate requirementsfor each. As stated in some of the preceding discussions, the proposalsin this notice for MODUs are based in part on a draft revision to the IMOCode for the Construction and Operation of Mobile Offshore Drilling Units(MODU Code) now under consideration by the members of IMO. This draft appearsin various annexes to IMO paper ``DE 30/14'', of June 16, 1987. The draftrevisions were prepared with the active participation of the United States.Various oil companies and drilling contractors based in the United Statesalso participated in the development of the draft code through U.S. delegationworking group meetings, and also at IMO through various international observerorganizations. The IMO paper may be requested from the IMO at the addressprovided in the <T2>ADDRESSES</T2> section at the beginning of this notice, or from theCoast Guard contact listed in the section titled <T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT</T2>. a. A drillship is the one classification of MODU that is similar to a conventionalvessel in many respects. Proposed andSection; 199.600(c) would require adrillship to meet the same lifesaving system requirements as an oil tanker.b. Under proposed andSection; 199.605(a)(1), aluminum lifeboats would notbe permitted to be used on MODUs. Proposed andSection; 199.650(f) would prohibitaluminum launching appliances. This issue is discussed under the sectionof this notice titled ``Additional Requirements for Tank Vessels''. c. The present regulations require totally enclosed lifeboats for 100%of the persons on board. Survival craft for an additional 100% capacityare also required in case the lifeboats can not be used. These additionalsurvival craft can be either lifeboats or davit-launched inflatable liferafts.These requirements are based on assumptions similar to those made for conventionalcargo ships that have two sides and need 100% capacity available on bothsides in case the survival craft on one side can not be used. As statedabove, many MODUs are very different from conventional vessels. They mayhave three, four, or even five sides. Their decks are often far above thewater, and the area under the deck is usually open. For these reasons,the requirements for MODU lifesaving systems need to be developed consideringthe special characteristics of these vessels. The requirements for thenumber and arrangement of lifeboats and liferafts on MODUs would be completelyrevised under proposed andSection; 199.605(b). Totally enclosed fire-protectedlifeboats would be required in at least two widely separated locationson different sides of the MODU. The arrangement of the lifeboats wouldhave to provide sufficient capacity to accommodate the total number ofpersons on board if either all the lifeboats in any one location are lost;or all the lifeboats on any one side of the MODU are lost or rendered unusable.For many MODUs with davit-launched survival craft in two separate locations,this requirement would result in an arrangement similar to the presentregulations. For larger units with three or more separate survival craftlocations on different sides, it would result in a reduction of the totalnumber of davit-launched survival craft as compared to present regulations.d. The present regulations in 46 CFR 108.503(a) allow a MODU permittedto carry 30 persons or less to have only one lifeboat. One comment suggestedthat at least two lifeboats be required on all MODUs, and that existingMODUs be given 2 years to comply. The regulations proposed in this noticerequire at least two lifeboats on all new MODUs as suggested by the comment,but under proposed andSection; 199.10(e), existing MODUs would be permittedto retain their present arrangement. No retrofit requirement has been proposedbecause most of these small units could not be retrofitted without extensivemodification. New units of this size can be more economically designedto accommodate two lifeboats in separate locations, although andSection;199.605(c) would provide an alternative for certain (usually small) self-elevatingunits which could not comply with the proposed requirements. e. Present regulations allow the use of either davit-launched inflatableliferafts or totally enclosed lifeboats for the second 100% survival craftcapacity. Davit-launched liferafts were developed originally for conventionalvessels where they could be launched down the straight side of the hull.The open structure of MODUs makes davit-launched liferafts especially susceptibleto damage due to being driven into structural members by wind and waveswhile being lowered. We are not aware of any MODU casualty where abandonmentby davit-launched liferaft has been attempted. Totally enclosed lifeboatswould be required under the proposed regulations for the first 100% survivalcraft capacity as well as for the additional survival craft needed to meetthe requirement discussed in preceding paragraph (c.). Davit-launched liferaftswould no longer be permitted to meet the survival craft requirement onnew MODUs, although under proposed andSection; 199.15(b), they could be retainedon MODUs already equipped with them. They could also be used on certainself-elevating units under andSection; 199.605(c). In addition to the lifeboats,the regulations in proposed andSection; 199.605(b) would require float-freeliferafts with an aggregate capacity that will accommodate the total numberof persons on board. These liferafts would be available for use in casethe MODU is lost before the davit-launched survival craft are launched.(1) Three comments on the ANPRM suggested that davit-launched liferaftswere unsuitable for use on MODUs. One of the comments stated they wereunnecessary because most newly constructed rigs were being built with 200%lifeboats. Another stated ``the industry's general opinion is that davit-launchedinflatable liferafts have proven to be expensive, ineffective and a maintenancenightmare, especially for units operating in remote locations. Such liferaftsare a secondary, or backup, means of escape which has never gained theconfidence of personnel serving on MODUs.'' The regulations proposed inthis notice are consistent with these comments. (2) One comment stated that the present davit-launched liferafts shouldbe continued to be accepted in place of the float-free liferafts on existingMODUs. As explained in the preceding paragraph, the proposed regulationsprovide for continued acceptance of davit-launched liferafts on existingMODUs. f. Proposed andSection; 199.650(d) would require lifeboats on MODUs (otherthan drillships) to be arranged to clear each leg, column, footing, brace,mat, and each similar structure below the hull of a self-elevating unitand below the upper hull of a column stabilized unit, with the unit inan intact condition. A reduction in the total number of survival craftmeeting this requirement would be allowed when the unit is in the transitmode and the number of personnel on board is reduced. The ANPRM discussedrequiring survival craft to clear MODU structures by at least 5 m (16.5ft.) when the survival craft is launched with the MODU on even keel. TheANPRM also discussed requiring survival craft to clear the same structureswith the unit listed and trimmed at angles up to 20anddegrees;. The purposewould have been to reduce the possibility that the survival craft wouldbe damaged by collision with the lower structure of the MODU as they arelaunched. (1) Two comments expressed concern about the 5 m clearance requirementproposed in the ANPRM. They pointed out the disadvantages of a long cantileveredstructure that would be necessary to get the lifeboat 5 m away from thehull, including structural problems and the danger crew members would faceon such a structure in bad weather. The regulation proposed in this noticedoes not specify any minimum clearance. It follows the proposed IMO MODUCode revision in requiring that all survival craft clear the structureof the MODU in the upright, intact condition. Under damaged conditions,an aggregate survival craft capacity to accommodate the total number ofpersons permitted on board would be required to be capable of being launchedsafely, and clear of any obstruction. This is a more performance-orientedrequirement than the 5 m clearance requirement discussed in the ANPRM.Under the requirement proposed in this notice, MODUs should be able toprovide for adequate launching, and avoid the necessity of the cantileveredstructures discussed in the comments. (2) One comment noted that a new system (designated the PROD system) isunder development that would hold the lifeboat pointed away from the unitand would prevent it from contacting the structure. The comment suggestedthat the 5 m clearance requirement would not be needed if such a systemwere used. The PROD system, or similar systems would be acceptable underthe rules proposed in this notice. (3) One comment pointed out that some units are limited by design to anglesof less than 20anddegrees;, and that lifeboats would be underwater in somecases at 20anddegrees;. The rules proposed in this notice require operationof launching appliances based on list and trim derived from the damagestability characteristic of the unit, rather than requirements based onlist and trim of 20anddegrees;.(4) Another comment supported the present regulations in 46 CFR 108.506(a) and (b), and stated there was nothing in the various reports on theOCEAN RANGER that constituted a basis for changing the present requirements.The regulations in andSection; 108.506(a) on a surface type unit requirelaunching at a list of 15anddegrees; and a trim of 10anddegrees;. Under therules proposed in this notice, surface type units would have to meet thesame lifesaving requirements as a tank vessel. Launching equipment builtto meet SOLAS 74/83 will be designed to operate on these MODUs as wellas on conventional SOLAS 74/83 vessels, and there should be no difficultymeeting the requirement. For other MODUs, andSection; 108.506(b) requiresthe adverse list and trim to be determined by the characteristics of theunit. The comment stated that this requirement was appropriate and flexible.The rules proposed in this notice require operation of launching appliancesbased on list and trim derived from the damage stability characteristicsof the unit. Contrary to the statement in the comment about there beingno basis for changing the requirement, the abandonment of the OCEAN RANGERwas evidently attempted with the unit listing well beyond the 12anddegrees;list at which the lifeboats would clear the structure. Another casualtyto the Norwegian semi-submersible ALEXANDER L. KIELLAND resulted in anattempt to abandon the unit in the lifeboats at a list of about 30anddegrees;!We are not aware of any practical way to achieve clearance at angles beyond20anddegrees; for conventionally designed semi-submersibles, with the possibleexception of free-fall lifeboats. Further comments are invited on thismatter. g. Proposed andSection; 199.650(e) would require lifeboats with an aggregatecapacity that will accommodate the total number of persons permitted onboard to be capable of being launched safely, and clear of any obstructionin any damaged condition under 46 CFR 174, Subpart C. The ANPRM discussedconsideration of a requirement for lifeboats to be launched into the waterheading away from the unit. This would enable the boats to apply powerimmediately in the direction away from the unit. A boat launched broadsideon the weather side of a MODU in distress would be driven farther intoor under the unit during the time it takes to turn it away. This is a particularhazard on column stabilized MODUs that have large structures near waterlevel. It would also be a hazard on self-elevating units where the lifeboatsare installed adjacent to the legs, although the normal lifeboat installationon these units is between the legs. The proposed regulation would requirethat these potential problems be considered in the orientation of the lifeboats,but would not necessarily require them to be oriented in a direction headedaway from the unit. (1) One comment stated that orienting the lifeboats headed away from theunit could be a hazard on semi-submersible units where the lifeboats aremounted on the side of the unit. The comment pointed out that a semi-submersibleis normally oriented with its bow toward prevailing wind and waves, sothat a lifeboat launched on the side of the unit and headed away from it,would be broadside to the weather. The comment was not taken into accountin preparing the proposed rule since the weather at the time of abandonmentmay not be coming from the direction of the prevailing wind and waves atthe site. Furthermore, the lifeboats are required to be self-righting,so if they are launched broadside and capsize, they will automaticallyreright. We consider the hazard presented by collision with the structureof the MODU to be greater that the hazard presented by being launched broadsideto the waves. Nevertheless, the regulation proposed in this notice wouldnot specifically require the lifeboats to be oriented in a direction headedaway from the unit. (2) Two comments opposed a requirement for the lifeboats on self-elevatingMODUs to be launched in a direction headed away from the unit. The commentsnoted that lifeboats on self-elevating MODUs are usually installed betweenthe legs and are therefore not normally at hazard from a collision withthem. We agree with the comments, and the proposed regulation would notrequire a lifeboat to be launched headed away from a self-elevating MODU.<ITAG tagnum="84">Initial Inspections and Tests </ITAG>The initial inspections and tests are those that are conducted whenevernew lifesaving equipment is installed on board a vessel. A number of revisionsand additions are proposed in this notice for these inspections and tests.These proposed tests and inspections appear in proposed andSection; 31.01-5(c)for tank vessels, andSection; 71.20-20(a)(1) for passenger vessels, and andSection;91.20-20(a)(1) for cargo vessels. One or more of those sections are cross-referencedin andSection; 107.231(y) for MODUs, andSection; 167.15-27(a) for public nauticalschool ships, and andSection; 189.20-20(a)(1) for oceanographic researchvessels. The requirements for public nautical school ships and for oceanographicresearch vessels depend upon whether cargo ship lifesaving equipment orpassenger ship lifesaving equipment is installed. a. Installation tests for launching appliances using falls and a winchhave been revised to be consistent with SOLAS 74/83 and Part 2 of IMO ResolutionA.521(13), ``Recommendation on Testing of Lifesaving Appliances''. b. Tests for davit-launched liferaft launching equipment and rescue boatlaunching equipment are proposed in addition to tests for lifeboat launchingequipment. c. Installation tests have been added for free-fall lifeboats. d. A two-hour operational test has been added for lifeboats and rescueboats. Although not in the present regulations, a similar test is oftendone to make sure that the boat is operating properly before it is installedon the vessel, and that the boat has not been damaged in transportationto the shipyard. This test should be conducted on all lifeboats and rescueboats as part of the installation test procedure. e. A requirement for an abandon-ship simulation has been added to makesure the survival system is suitable for abandonment in 30 minutes forvessels required to meet passenger vessel standards, and 10 minutes forother vessels. This test demonstrates how well the lifesaving equipmentworks as a survival system on the vessel. This simulation would not berequired if a previously tested sister vessel with the same lifesavingequipment had successfully completed the test. f. Another system test would require a lifeboat and a rescue boat to belaunched with the vessel proceeding at 5 knots. This test will also verifythe manufacturer's instructions for launching the boat with the vesselunderway. This test would probably be conducted during sea trials.<ITAG tagnum="84">Inspections for Certification</ITAG>The inspections for certification are conducted whenever the vessel renewsits certificate of inspection. A number of revisions and additions areproposed in this notice for these inspections. These proposed revisionsand additions appear in andSection; 31.10-15(d) for tank vessels, andSection;71.25-15 for passenger vessels, andSection; 91.25-15 for cargo vessels, andandSection; 107.239 for MODUs. One or more of those sections are cross-referencedin andSection; 167.15-28(b) for public nautical school ships, and andSection;189.25-15 for oceanographic research vessels. The requirements for publicnautical school ships and for oceanographic research vessels depend uponwhether cargo ship lifesaving equipment or passenger ship lifesaving equipmentis installed. These tests are similar to some of the tests conducted underthe initial inspection for certification, but they are intended to establishthat the lifesaving equipment is still in good and serviceable condition.The primary revisions and additions to the inspections for certificationare:a. Load testing would be required for rescue boat and liferaft launchingdevices, in addition to the present requirement to test lifeboat launchingequipment.b. Testing of free-fall lifeboat launching equipment would be required.c. Tests of the air supply and water spray systems would be required fortotally enclosed lifeboats equipped with them.d. Inspectors would not stamp lifejackets, immersion suits, and work vestswith the present ``INSPECTED AND PASSED'' stamp unless the inspectors determinedthat it was necessary. Stamping might be necessary when a large numberof devices must be inspected, or in other cases where confusion might ariseover which devices have been inspected, and which have not.e. An abandon-ship drill would be required to determine that the equipmentis in working order, and that the crew has been appropriately trained inits use.<ITAG tagnum="84">Miscellaneous Revisions</ITAG>a. The existing regulations for tank vessels require ship's distress signalsand line throwing appliance to be carried in a portable magazine chestin the vicinity of the bridge. Regulations for other vessels require aportable watertight container that can be carried on the bridge or insidethe pilothouse. Proposed andSection;andSection; 199.68(d) and 199.170(e) wouldallow the use of either method of stowage on all vessels.b. The Lyle gun has been removed from the regulations as an acceptableline throwing apparatus. There are few, if any, Lyle guns still in service.c. Proposed andSection; 199.70(a)(2) would revise the requirement for thelines secured to ring lifebuoys in order to be consistent with SOLAS 74/83.The existing requirements are for a line 15 fathoms (90 ft.) long. Theline must be buoyant on vessels on an international voyage. The proposedregulation requires all lines to be buoyant, and to be at least as longas twice the height where the buoy is stowed above the waterline, or 30m (100 ft.), whichever is the greater. Additional requirements for thediameter, strength, and ultraviolet resistance are also proposed.d. Proposed andSection; 199.72(a) would require lifejackets on vessels ininternational voyage, short international voyage, or coastwise services,to meet Regulations III/30.2 and III/32.1 of SOLAS 74/83. Vessels in otherservices could continue to use lifejackets of the type currently approvedby the Commandant as ``life preservers''. The ``SOLAS'' lifejackets mustfloat wearers slightly higher in the water, therefore they have more buoyancythan ``life preservers''. The SOLAS lifejackets are also more bulky andslightly more expensive than life preservers. The current life preserveris considered suitable for continued use in Great Lakes; lakes, bays andsounds; and river services.e. Present regulations for passenger vessels require ``an approved lifepreserver for each person carried and in addition, * * * a number of lifepreservers suitable for children equal to at least 10 percent of the personscarried'' (46 CFR 75.40-10(a)). The Coast Guard interprets this regulationas requiring a child-size life preserver for each child carried, even ifmore than 10% of the persons on board are children. Other vessels are requiredto carry a ``suitable number of children's life preservers'', ``when childrenare carried'' (46 CFR 94.40-10(c)). Proposed andSection; 199.72(a)(1)(i)would require all vessels carrying passengers to carry a number of child-sizelifejackets equal to at least 10% of the number of passengers permittedon board, or such greater number as necessary to provide a lifejacket foreach person smaller than the lower size limit of the adult lifejackets.This proposed regulation would state the requirement for child-size lifepreservers more clearly than in the present regulations for passenger vessels.This proposed requirement is the same as Regulation III/7.2.1.1 of SOLAS74/83 and means that any vessel permitted to carry passengers would haveto carry child-size lifejackets. Proposed andSection; 199.72(b)(2) wouldpermit vessels not under SOLAS. 74/83 to omit the child-size lifejacketsif children are never among the passengers carried. This regulation meansthat child-size lifejackets well in excess of 10% of the total number ofpassengers permitted on board, may be required for a vessel that carriesa large number of children on infrequent occasions, or for a vessel thatcarries large numbers of passengers over short distances and does not normallycontrol the number of children carried.(1) One comment called the requirement for children's lifejackets reasonable.Another stated total opposition noting that a child can use an adult lifejacket.The comment also pointed out that in his particular operation, stowagespace was minimal, a lifejacket has never been needed, all operations areclose to the river bank, and the water is not deep enough to submerge thevessel. A third comment also cited a lack of stowage space as a problem.These last two comments regard the proposed regulation for children's lifejacketsas a change from the present requirements. The proposed regulation is onlya clarification of present requirements for passenger vessels. The onlyvessels that will have a revision in their requirements are cargo vesselsthat also carry passengers. Most of these vessels will have to have a minimumnumber of child-size lifejackets equal to 10% of the passengers permittedto be carried. We understand the problems of passenger vessel operators,but can not agree that adult lifejackets can necessarily be used for anyand all children. If the lifejacket is too big for a child, it may comeoff easily, or its buoyancy may be too low on the child's body causingthe child to float with the head under water. The Coast Guard has workedon the problem by testing some adult lifejackets on children. Some werefound to be satisfactory for children over 75 lb. Recognizing that future``adult universal'' size lifejackets may be approved for persons smallerthan 90 lb., the regulations proposed in this notice refer to the lowersize limit of the lifejacket.(2) Comments on the issue of lifejackets for children are invited. Commentssuggesting alternative approaches should consider the need to provide appropriateflotation devices for all children carried, as well as the problems thatare experienced by operators in complying with the requirement.f. Proposed andSection; 199.75 would require each lifejacket and immersionsuit carried on a vessel engaged in ocean, short international voyage,coastwise, or Great Lakes service, to have a lifejacket light, similarto existing regulations. Vessels in ocean service would be required tohave lights meeting Regulation III/32.3 of SOLAS 74/83. Other vessels wouldbe required to have lifejacket lights meeting the present 46 CFR 161.012.The ``SOLAS'' light would have to meet a brightness requirement after 8hours of operation. The lights now approved under 46 CFR 161.012 have aninitial brightness similar to the SOLAS light, but they are not requiredto be as bright at the end of 8 hours of operation. A battery-powered SOLASlight will therefore be slightly larger and more expensive than a comparable46 CFR 161.012 light. Normally, the Coast Guard would propose to revisethe existing specification regulation to bring all lights up to the SOLAS74/83 standard, but in this case, the lights approved under 46 CFR 161.012include a ``chemiluminescent'' light that can not practically be modifiedto meet the SOLAS 74/83 requirements. This light does not meet the SOLAS74/83 brightness requirement after 8 hours. When it is cold, the chemicalreaction is slowed so that the light is dimmer, but lasts much longer.This light has proven to be popular with vessel operators, and it is apparentlymore inherently reliable than other approved lights which are all batterypowered. Therefore, lights approved under 46 CFR 161.012 are proposed tobe acceptable for domestic services, in the belief that the higher reliabilityavailable with these devices is a worthwhile tradeoff for their slightlylower operational effectiveness.g. Proposed andSection; 199.80 contains more detail on the contents of thestation bill than present regulations. This was done to meet the requirementsof Regulation III/8 of SOLAS 74/83, and also to cover additional necessaryitems. The Coast Guard used to provide the form CG-848 series to vesseloperators as station bills, but these forms have been discontinued. Theproposed section therefore contains more descriptive information on thecontent of the station bill. Proposed andSection; 199.80 would also applyto all cargo vessels and tank vessels over 500 tons gross tonnage, so forthe first time, a station bill would be required on large barges coveredby these rules. Currently, the Coast Guard is involved in developing anASTM consensus standard under committee F 25.07, General Support Requirements,for locating and preparing station bills. Its text corresponds to the proposedrequirement. Should this standard be adopted by ASTM prior to publicationof the final rule, the ASTM standard could be incorporated by reference,in place of the text in proposed andSection; 199.80.h. Proposed andSection; 199.90 contains requirements for posted operatinginstructions for survival craft and their launching controls, as requiredunder Regulation III/9 of SOLAS 74/83. Currently, the Coast Guard is involvedin developing an ASTM consensus standard under committee F 25.07, GeneralSupport Requirements, for location and instruction symbols for evacuationand lifesaving equipment. Its text corresponds to the proposed requirement.Should this standard be adopted by ASTM prior to publication of the finalrule, the ASTM standard could be incorporated by reference, in place ofthe reference to IMO Resolution A.603(15).i. Present regulations require winches for gravity davits to have a fleetangle not exceeding 8anddegrees;, and no more than a single wrap of wirerope on the drum. Other types of davits may have more than one layer ofwrap. The purpose of the single wrap on gravity davit winch drums is toprevent the wire from winding unevenly onto the drum when the survivalcraft is recovered. Uneven winding could cause separate falls to wind ontothe drum at different speeds, or cause fouling of the wire on the drum.The requirements for gravity davit winches in proposed andSection; 199.153(f)and (g) would be less restrictive. Two layers of wire rope would be permittedon the drum, provided the fleet angle does not exceed 4anddegrees;. A fleetangle of 4anddegrees; or less should not result in uneven winding, therefore,a second layer of wire can be permitted. This should provide manufacturerswith more design flexibility. j. Proposed andSection;andSection; 199.211 and 199.271 would slightly revisethe requirements for the numbers of ring life buoys required to be carried.Most of the changes result from changing break points based on vessel lengthin feet to points based on length in meters. The changes would make therequirements for vessels in ocean and short international voyage serviceconsistent with Regulations III/21 and III/27 of SOLAS 74/83. Proposedrequirements for other vessels are similar to existing regulations. Thefollowing tables show only the changes that would occur as a result ofthe rules proposed in this notice. Vessels in size ranges not shown onthe tables would not be affected.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,i1,s25,10,10</C><T4>Passenger Vessels, Ocean and Short International Voyage </T4><H1>Length of vessel in feet</H1><H1> No. of ring life buoys (proposed in this NPRM) </H1><H1>No. of ring life buoys (existing regulations)</H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">196 ft.-300 ft. <D>12 </D><D>8 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">393 ft.-400 ft. <D>18 </D><D>12 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">590 ft.-600 ft. <D>24 </D><D>18 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">787 ft.-800 ft. <D>30 </D><D>24</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,i1,s25,10,10</C><T4> Cargo and Tank Vessels, Ocean Voyage </T4><H1>Length of vessel in feet </H1><H1>No. of ring life buoys (proposed in this NPRM) </H1><H1>No. of ring life buoys (existing regulations)</H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">98 ft.-100 ft. <D>4 </D><D>3 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">100 ft.-196 ft. <D>4 </D><D>6 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">200 ft.-300 ft. <D>6 </D><D>8 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">300 ft.-328 ft. <D>6 </D><D>12 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">400 ft.-492 ft. <D>12 </D><D>18 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">600 ft.-656 ft. <D>18 </D><D>24 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">800 ft.-820 ft. <D>24 </D><D>30</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,i1,s25,10,10</C><T4> Passenger Vessels Other Than Ocean and Short International Voyage</T4><H1>Length of vessel in feet </H1><H1>No. of ring life buoys (proposed in this NPRM) </H1><H1>No. of ring life buoys (existing regulations)</H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">Under 98 ft. <D>3 </D><D>2 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">98 ft.-100 ft. <D>4 </D><D>2 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">196 ft.-200 ft. <D>6 </D><D>4 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">297 ft.-300 ft. <D>12 </D><D>6 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">590 ft.-600 ft. <D>24 </D><D>18 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">787 ft.-800 ft. <D>30 </D><D>24</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,i1,s25,10,10</C><T4> Cargo and Tank Vessels Other Than Ocean Voyage </T4><H1>Length of vessel in feet </H1><H1>No. of ring life buoys (proposed in this NPRM) </H1><H1>No. of ring life buoys (existing regulations)</H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">98 ft.-100 ft. <D>3 </D><D>2 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">196 ft.-200 ft. <D>6 </D><D>4 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">300 ft.-328 ft. <D>6 </D><D>12 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">400 ft.-492 ft. <D>12 </D><D>18 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">600 ft.-656 ft. <D>18 </D><D>24 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">800 ft.-820 ft. <D>24 </D><D>30</D></ITAG></ITAG> k. Emergency signals are listed in proposed andSection; 35.10-5 for tankvessels, andSection; 78.13-1 for passenger vessels, andSection; 97.13-1 forcargo and miscellaneous vessels, and andSection; 109.503 for MODUs. Underproposed andSection; 167.35-5 for public nautical school vessels, and andSection;196.13-1 for oceanographic research vessels, emergency signal requirementsare those required for either passenger vessels or cargo vessels, dependingupon the lifesaving equipment installed. The requirements specify whateach signal must be, except for a man-overboard signal and an abandon-shipsignal which must be established for each vessel and listed on the stationbill. This notice does not attempt to resolve the differences that existfor emergency signals on different types of vessels. For instance, on MODUs,the signal to man the abandon unit stations is a continuous sounding ofthe general alarm and the whistle. On other vessels, the continuous signalis for fire and emergency stations. On MODUs, the signal for emergencystations is a rapid succession of short soundings, while a rapid sucessionof short soundings followed by a long sounding is the signal for boat stationson other vessels. Comments are specifically requested as to the need forestablishing uniform signals for these commands, and what those signalsshould be. Comments should address whether or not a separate abandon-shipsignal is required in addition to the signals to go to boat stations (sixshort blasts, one long), and to lower boats or rafts (one short). We areaware of at least two different signals in common use for man overboard(five short blasts, and also four sequences of three long blasts each).1. Proposed requirements for manning and supervision of lifeboats and liferaftsare in andSection; 35.11-5 for tank vessels, andSection; 78.14-5 for passengervessels, andSection; 97.14-5 for cargo and miscellaneous vessels, and andSection;109.323 for MODUs. Under proposed andSection; 167.35-10 for public nauticalschool vessels, and andSection; 196.14-1 for oceanographic research vessels,manning and supervision requirements are those required for either passengervessels or cargo vessels, depending upon the lifesaving equipment installed.The number of certificated lifeboatmen (including deck officers and ableseamen) required for a lifeboat in the present regulations is based onthe size of the lifeboat. Only one is required in a liferaft. The proposedregulations would require a minimum of one certificated person for eachsurvival craft, and a sufficient number of trained and certificated personsfor the various tasks involved in abandoning the vessel. A second certificatedperson would be required for each lifeboat on vessels in ocean service,and for each lifeboat permitted to carry more than 40 persons on all vesselsexcept those in river service. Each vessel that carries passengers andis not in river service would have to have at least one certificated personfor every 20 passengers assigned to each lifeboat. On certain passengervessels, persons ``practiced in the handling and operation of liferafts''could be permitted to be placed in charge of liferafts instead of certificatedpersons. This is based on a similar provision in Regulation III/10.4 ofSOLAS 74/83. m. Under existing regulations, a lifeboat must be marked and equipped forthe number of persons for which it is approved. Often lifeboats are largerthan necessary to accommodate the number of persons assigned to them onthe vessel. If the vessel owner wants to equip the lifeboat for a smallernumber of persons, the lifeboat must be recertified for the smaller number,and a new recertification plate attached to the boat. The marking requirementsfor lifeboats proposed in this notice would simplify the procedure. Thenumber of persons capacity painted on the lifeboat would determine thenumber of persons the boat must be equipped for. This number would haveto be equal to or less than the number the boat was originally approvedfor. The proposed regulations are in andSection; 35.40-40(b)(2) for tankvessels, andSection; 78.47-60(b)(2) for passenger vessels, andSection; 97.37-37(b)(2)for cargo and miscellaneous vessels, andSection; 108.645(b)(2) for MODUs,and andSection; 196.37-37(b)(2) for oceanographic research vessels. Underproposed andSection; 167.55-5(j), public nautical school vessels would haveto meet the marking requirements in the passenger vessel regulations.<ITAG tagnum="84">Additional Requirements for Existing Vessels </ITAG>The inspection and operational requirements proposed in this notice generallyapply to all vessels, but most major equipment requirements would applyimmediately only to vessels constructed on or after July 1, 1986. The majorequipment exemption for existing vessels (those built before July 1, 1986)is in proposed andSection; 199.10(e). Proposed andSection; 199.15(a) establishesthe basic requirements for an existing vessel as those requirements ineffect for the vessel on June 30, 1986. Section 199.15 also contains theproposed requirements to ``phase-in'' certain equipment requirements onexisting vessels. These are: a. When any lifesaving equipment is replaced on a vessel or added to it,the equipment would generally be required to meet the new requirements(andSection; 199.15(b)). An exception to this requirement would be allowedfor a survival craft replaced without replacing its davit and winch, orvice versa. b. On or before July 1, 1991, each vessel in ocean, short internationalvoyage, or coastwise service, would be required to have survival craftportable two-way radiotelephone equipment (andSection; 199.15(c)). (1) Under Regulation III/1.6 of SOLAS 74/83, vessels with SOLAS SafetyCertificates would have to have this equipment not later than July 1, 1991.(2) The requirement would also apply to existing vessels in coastwise service,even though SOLAS 74/83 does not apply to these vessels. c. On or before July 1, 1991, each passenger vessel in ocean, short internationalvoyage, coastwise, and Great Lakes service, would be required to have atleast three immersion suits for the crew of each lifeboat. A thermal protectiveaid would be required for each other person on board. An exemption fromthe requirement would be allowed for vessels operating only on routes between32anddegrees; N and 32anddegrees; S latitude (andSection; 199.15(d)). (1) This requirement would also apply to other vessels that would be requiredto meet the passenger vessel lifesaving equipment requirements, includingnautical school ships, oceanographic research vessels carrying more than50 scientific personnel, and offshore supply vessels carrying more than50 offshore workers. (2) Under Regulation III/1.6 of SOLAS 74/83, vessels with SOLAS SafetyCertificates would have to have this equipment not later than July 1, 1991.(3) The requirement would also apply to existing vessels in coastwise andGreat Lakes service, even though SOLAS 74/83 does not apply to these vessels.(4) The proposed requirement is based on Regulation III/21.4 of SOLAS 74/83,which includes an exemption from the immersion suit requirement for vesselswith totally or partially enclosed lifeboats in paragraph 4.2.1. The proposedregulations in this notice do not include such an exemption because itis not permitted by statute (46 U.S.C. 3102(a)). d. On or before July 1, 1991, each cargo vessel and tank vessel in oceanor coastwise service would be required to have liferafts for 100% of thepersons on board the vessel in addition to the lifeboats, rather than thepresent 50% (andSection; 199.15(e)). (1) This requirement would also apply to other vessels that would be requiredto meet the cargo vessel lifesaving equipment requirements and that donot substitute liferafts for lifeboats. This category could include oceanographicresearch vessels carrying not more than 50 scientific personnel, and offshoresupply vessels carrying not more than 50 offshore workers. (2) Under Regulation III/1.6 of SOLAS 74/83, vessels with SOLAS SafetyCertificates would have to have these extra liferafts not later than July1, 1991. (3) The requirement would also apply to existing vessels in coastwise service,even though SOLAS 74/83 does not apply to these vessels. e. On or before July 1, 1991, each vessel would have to have openings inrails or bulwarks for launching liferafts or inflatable buoyant apparatus(andSection; 199.15(f)). f. On or before July 1, 1991, each set of lifeboat davits on a cargo vesselor tank vessel in ocean, coastwise, or Great Lakes service, would be requiredto be gravity type davits (andSection; 199.15(g)). (1) This requirement would also apply to other vessels that would be requiredto meet the cargo vessel lifesaving equipment requirements and that donot substitute liferafts for lifeboats. This category could include oceanographicresearch vessels carrying not more than 50 scientific personnel, and offshoresupply vessels carrying not more than 50 offshore workers. (2) This proposed requirement arises from the Coast Guard investigationof the capsizing and sinking of the SS MARINE ELECTRIC in February, 1983.The Marine Board of Investigation found launching a lifeboat under theadverse conditions the MARINE ELECTRIC encountered to be much more difficultto perform with quadrantal davits than with gravity davits. The board recommended``that all vessels currently fitted with quadrantal davits be requiredto install gravity davits for the launching of their lifeboats.'' The Commandantof the Coast Guard stated in concurring with this recommendation, ``TheCoast Guard will propose that inspected cargo and tank vessels in oceanand coastwise service, equipped with mechanical davits of any type, befitted with enclosed lifeboats and launching systems that meet SOLAS 74/83no later than July 1, 1991.'' (See the discussion that follows in section(g) on retrofit proposals for enclosed lifeboats.) (3) The proposed retrofit requirement for gravity davits does not applyto vessels limited to river, or lakes, bays, and sounds service, wherethe severe conditions encountered by the MARINE ELECTRIC are not likelyto be found. It does, however, extend to vessels in Great Lakes servicesince very severe sea conditions can prevail in those waters. Four casualtieson the Great Lakes in the past 30 years illustrate the need for replacementof mechanical davits. In the case of the SS CARL D. BRADLEY which sankon Lake Michigan in 1958, the lifeboat was in the process of being launchedwhen the vessel sank. The SS <T3>Cedarville </T3>sank in the straits of Mackinac in 1965 after a collision.Both lifeboats were in the process of being lowered when the vessel capsizedand sank. There were no survivors from the stern section of the SS DANIELJ. MORRELL which broke up and sank in Lake Huron in 1966, so it is notknown if the process of launching either of the lifeboats had begun. Therewere approximately eight minutes available to abandon ship which wouldhave been enough time to launch a totally enclosed lifeboat with a moderngravity davit. The crew of the SS EDMUND FITZGERALD may not have had timeto even attempt to launch the lifeboats when the vessel sank in Lake Superiorin 1975, but testimony taken by the Coast Guard Marine Board of Investigationindicated that former crewmembers doubted that the lifeboats could havebeen launched in severe weather. (4) Although the evidence from the MARINE ELECTRIC casualty is the primaryjustification for the gravity davit retrofit requirement, the casualtyrecord indicates that there have been problems with launching of lifeboatsfrom mechanical davits in other casualties. In addition to those discussedin the preceding paragraph, these other casualties include the SS BUNKERHILL which exploded on March 6, 1964, and the M/V CHESTER A. POLING whichsank on January 10, 1977. (5) The proposed gravity davit retrofit requirement is consistent witha recommendation made by the National Transportation Safety Board (NTSB)in its report on the collision of the U.S. Coast Guard Cutter BLACKTHORN,and the tankship CAPRICORN on January 28, 1980. NTSB was concerned notwith the capability to abandon ship, but with the difficulty the CAPRICORNhad in launching one of its lifeboats to assist the crew of the sunkenBLACKTHORN. In recommending that U.S. merchant vessels over 1,600 grosstons be equipped with gravity davits, NTSB stated that the accident illustrated``the delays in launching lifeboats using sheath-screw type davits.'' Thereport goes on to say, ``the Safety Board does not believe that outdatedlifesaving equipment should be permitted to remain in service indefinitely.The Coast Guard should establish a service life after which all lifesavingequipment on U.S. merchant vessels should be upgraded to meet current vesselstandards.'' This is, in effect, what this proposed retrofit requirementand the enclosed lifeboat retrofit requirement, covered in the discussionthat follows in section (g) would do.(6) Two identical comments suggested that the Coast Guard go slow on retrofitrequirements since new equipment will not result in fail-safe systems.Another comment stated that the retrofit requirements would be too costlyfor existing vessels. The retrofit requirements proposed in this noticetake the concerns expressed in these comments into account. We are notproposing that all launching systems be replaced with the higher-performingsystems in SOLAS 74/83. This proposal would result in the replacement ofonly the most antiquated launching systems that do not have gravity davits.The requirement to retrofit totally enclosed lifeboats, discussed in followingsection (g.), would extend over many years. This would allow the boatsto be replaced whenever existing boats are no longer serviceable, or inneed of extensive repairs. g. On or before July 1, 2001, each lifeboat on a cargo vessel or tank vesselin ocean, coastwise, or Great Lakes service, would be required to be atotally enclosed lifeboat (andSection; 199.15(h)). (1) This requirement would also apply to other vessels that would be requiredto meet the cargo vessel lifesaving equipment requirements and that donot substitute liferafts for lifeboats. This category could include oceanographicresearch vessels carrying not more than 50 scientific personnel, and offshoresupply vessels carrying not more than 50 offshore workers. (2) This proposed requirement also arises from the Coast Guard investigationof the capsizing and sinking of the SS MARINE ELECTRIC in February, 1983.In considering the difficulties involved in launching the lifeboat, theCommandant of the Coast Guard stated, ``the Coast Guard will propose thatall existing inspected cargo and tank vessels in ocean and coastwise voyages,presently equipped with open lifeboats and gravity davits, be fitted withenclosed lifeboats and launching systems that meet SOLAS 74/83 no laterthan July 1, 2001.'' (3) In combination with the proposed requirement for launching appliancesdiscussed in preceding section (f.), this proposed requirement would makesure that antiquated lifesaving equipment is not perpetuated on vesselsthat will continue in service well into the 21st century. It is also consistentwith the NTSB recommendation discussed in paragraph (e.)(5) to establisha service life after which all lifesaving equipment on U.S. merchant vesselsshould be upgraded to meet current vessel standards. On the other hand,the period provided for compliance will permit vessel operators to completethe retrofit at a time that is most economical to do so. Many existingvessels will undergo an extensive overhaul, repair, or refitting in a shipyardwithin this time period, which would be a good time to complete this work.Others will have to replace lifeboats due to damage, loss at sea, or deterioration.For those vessels, the cost of the proposed requirement would be limitedto the difference in cost between an open lifeboat and an enclosed lifeboat.Other vessels will undoubtedly wait until the deadline to complete theretrofit. (4) The ten-year difference between the proposed 1991 deadline to meetthe gravity davit requirement, and the 2001 deadline to meet the totallyenclosed lifeboat requirement will allow owners of vessels with a limitedremaining service life in 1991 to rectify the launching problems on a vesselwith mechanical davits, without going to the expense of replacing the lifeboat.Other vessels affected by the proposed gravity davit requirement, thathave a service life projected beyond 2001, will probably fit the totallyenclosed lifeboat at the same time as the new davit, as anticipated inthe Commandant's response to the MARINE ELECTRIC casualty quoted in paragraph(e.)(2). (5) One comment suggested that Great Lakes vessels be exempted from a lifeboatretrofit requirement. The proposed retrofit requirement for totally enclosedlifeboats extends to vessels in Great Lakes service since very severe seaconditions and cold water temperature can prevail in those waters. Theretrofit requirement is consistent with the recommendations of the CoastGuard Marine Board of Investigation on the sinking of the SS EDMUND FITZGERALDin Lake Superior on November 10, 1975. The board recommended that measuresbe implemented to improve the entire abandon ship system. h. The use of aluminum for the hull or canopy would be prohibited for newlifeboats on an oil tanker, chemical tanker or gas carrier (andSection; 199.15(i)).This is to prevent the boat from being destroyed quickly in a casualtythat results in high temperatures for a short period of time in the vicinityof the boat. i. On or before April 1, 1991, life floats and liferafts which are notdavit-launched would not be permitted to be counted toward the requirementfor davit-launched liferafts on mobile offshore drilling units, with theexception of submersible MODUs. Each mobile offshore drilling unit wouldbe required either to have lifeboats and liferafts that meet proposed andSection;199.605(b), or have the combination of totally enclosed fire-protectedlifeboats and davit-launched liferafts that meets the present regulationsin 46 CFR 108.503 and 108.505 (andSection; 199.15(j)). Open lifeboats installedon board units prior to January 3, 1979 could be used in place of the davit-launchedliferafts.(1) At the time the Coast Guard first published the regulations for mobileoffshore drilling units, it also published Navigation and Vessel InspectionCircular (NVIC) 4-78 covering inspection and certification of units builtprior to the effective date of the regulations. NVIC 4-78 allowed existinglifesaving equipment such as open lifeboats, ``throwover'' liferafts, andlife floats, to be used to meet half of the requirement for survival craftto accommodate 200% of the persons on board the unit. Whenever this existingequipment needed extensive repairs, it had to be replaced with either totallyenclosed lifeboats or davit-launched liferafts. The proposed regulationswould end the acceptance of throwover liferafts and life floats for thispurpose. Open lifeboats could continue to be used as long as they are ingood working order and do not require extensive repairs.(2) The April 1, 1991 deadline date was selected after an extended dialogwith the International Association of Drilling Contractors on the interpretationof NVIC 4-78. The ``existing'' throwover liferafts and life floats installedon a unit over 10 years ago should be nearing the end of their useful lives,and this proposed rule would establish a firm deadline for their replacement.In a February 5, 1988 letter to the International Association of DrillingContractors, the Coast Guard agreed to consider extension of the deadlinefor the few units for which this would create a severe hardship. Ownersrequesting such an extension must address all pertinent safety issues andmust provide technical justification for the extension for each MODU. Inany case, extensions beyond March 31, 1993 would not be considered.j. On or before July 1, 1991, each passenger ferry and each other passengervessel not on ocean, short international voyage, or coastwise service wouldbe required to have sufficient lifeboats, liferafts, and inflatable buoyantapparatus to accommodate everyone on board (andSection; 199.15(k)). Duringthose periods of the year when the water temperature exceeds 15 anddegrees;C(59 anddegrees;F), the number of survival craft on board could be reducedor the number of passengers increased to the point where the vessel hassurvival craft for 10% of the persons on board.(1) Most vessels could meet this proposed regulation by carrying inflatablebuoyant apparatus. This would provide out-of-the-water support for survivorsin the case of a casualty.(2) The vessels affected by this proposed requirement operate in watersrelatively close to shore and now carry only life preservers as survivalequipment. One or two small boats are also carried, but these are intendedprimarily to rescue persons that fall overboard. They can only accommodatea few persons. An accident in cold water that requires those on board toabandon ship would probably result in a number of fatalities due to thecold water alone, if there was no way for survivors to stay out of thewater.k. On or before July 1, 1991, each lifeboat on a vessel would be requiredto be propelled either by motor or by hand-propelling gear if the lifeboathas a capacity of at least 60 persons, but less than 100 persons. A lifeboatwith a capacity of 100 persons or more would be required to be motor propelled(andSection; 199.15(1)).<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note:</T4> Hand-propelled lifeboats are sometimes confused with oar-propelledlifeboats. Oar-propelled lifeboats are maneuvered with oars or sails. Hand-propelledlifeboats are powered by a series of manually-operated levers that drivea propeller through a system of mechanical links and gears.</ITAG>(1) All new Coast Guard approved lifeboats built since 1965 have been requiredto meet these requirements, except for hand-propelled lifeboats over 100persons intended as replacements for previously approved hand-propelledlifeboats. Since 1953, all new lifeboats of at least 60 persons capacityhave been required to be either hand-propelled or motor propelled. Thisproposed regulation would therefore require the upgrading only of largeroar-propelled lifeboats that are 38 years old in 1991, and hand-propelledlifeboats over 100 persons capacity that are, for the most part, 25 yearsold or older on July 1, 1991.(2) For lifeboats that are still in serviceable condition, lifeboat manufacturerscan provide Coast Guard approved engine or hand-propelling gear retrofits.Complete replacement of a lifeboat in good condition would not be necessaryto meet this proposed requirement.l. SOLAS 74/83 regulations III/1.4.4 and 1.4.5 permit lifesaving equipmentinstalled on existing vessels before July 1, 1991 to not comply fully withthe requirements of Chapter III. The regulations proposed in this noticehave a similar provision in andSection; 199.15(m).m. Retroreflective material would be required to be added to lifeboats,rescue boats, and ring life buoys that are not already provided with itby July 1, 1991. Lifejackets and exposure suits are already required tobe fitted with retroreflective material. These requirements are in proposedandSection; 35.40-40(e) and andSection; 35.40-50(f) for tank vessels, andSection;78.47-60(e) and andSection; 78.47-65(f) for passenger vessels, andSection;97.37-37(e) and andSection; 97.37-43(f) for cargo vessels, andSection; 108.645(e)and andSection; 108.649(f) for MODUs, and andSection; 196.37-37(e) and andSection;196.37-43(f) for oceanographic research vessels. Marking under the passengervessel regulations would be required under proposed andSection; 167.55-5(j) and (n) for public nautical school vessels. All of these proposed regulationsreference a draft IMO recommendation on the placement of retroreflectivematerial. The draft is expected to be formally adopted as an IMO resolutionin November 1989. Three comments on the ANPRM supported the proposed requirementfor retroreflective material.<ITAG tagnum="84">Regulatory Evaluation</ITAG>These proposed regulations are considered to be non-major under ExecutiveOrder 12291 and nonsignificant under the DOT regulatory policies and procedures(44 FR 11034; February 26, 1979). A draft regulatory evaluation has beenprepared and placed in the docket. It may be inspected or copied at theOffice of the Marine Safety Council (see section titled ``<T2>ADDRESSES</T2>'').The draft evaluation estimates a total one-time cost by July 1, 1991 of$22.5 M (million) to comply with the retrofit requirements in the proposedrules. About $10 M of the one-time cost, or about 44%, would be requiredto retrofit gravity davits and winches on certain cargo and tank vesselswhich are now equipped with mechanical davits. Just under $5 M or about22% of the one-time cost, arises from the proposal to require passengervessels operating in cold waters in domestic services to have survivalcraft for all persons on board the vessel. This proposal arises in partfrom Congressional direction in the 1984 Coast Guard Authorization Actwhich directs the Secretary to proceed vigorously with efforts to improvelifesaving equipment on passenger ferries. Most of the remainder of thecosts arise directly from SOLAS 74/83 requirements, such as about $2 Mfor cargo and tank vessels to double their float-free liferaft capacityto 100% of the persons on board. Two of the largest cost items arise fromthe new Global Maritime Distress and Safety System (GMDSS), which is expectedto be adopted soon as the third set of amendments to SOLAS 1974. SatelliteEPIRBs would cost just under $2.5 M. Survival craft radar transponders(SARTs) or their equivalent, would cost about $1.2 M.The approximate 1991 retrofit cost for a typical passenger vessel in coldwater, domestic services is estimated to be approximately $50,000, arisingprimarily from the requirement to fit survival craft for all persons onboard. For the purposes of this estimate, the survival craft selected areassumed to be inflatable buoyant apparatus. An oceangoing passenger vesselwould be required to spend an estimated $47,000, primarily for immersionsuits and thermal protective aids. An oceangoing cargo or tank vessel wouldbe required to carry additional liferafts, accounting for most of the $9,000in costs estimated for these vessels. A little over $10 M would be requiredto retrofit gravity davits and winches on certain cargo and tank vesselswhich are now equipped with mechanical davits. The average cost for eachof the approximately 130 vessels affected is estimated to be $80,000.Under the proposed rules, cargo and tank vessels still in service on July1, 2001 and equipped with open lifeboats, would be required to retrofittotally enclosed lifeboats. This would result in an additional one-timecost of $51 M for the estimated 261 vessels that would be affected. Theaverage cost (1988 dollars) for each vessel in ocean or coastwise serviceaffected would be $220,000, and for each vessel in Great Lakes servicewould be $110,000. This cost may be significantly overstated since an unknownnumber of the affected vessels will undoubtedly have to replace or extensivelyrepair their existing open lifeboats sometime before the year 2001. Ifthese lifeboats are replaced at that time with totally enclosed lifeboats,the actual cost of the retrofit requirement would be the difference betweenthe cost of the new lifeboats with installation, and the cost to repairor replace the existing lifeboat.A recurring annual cost of $7.4 M will result from more extensive on-boardtraining requirements, the additional equipment required on newly constructedvessels, as well as the added maintenance costs for the new equipment.The annual added training and maintenance costs would range from approximately$3,500 for a typical large oceangoing vessel to $757 for an offshore supplyvessel operating in the Gulf of Mexico. The approximate added constructioncost for typical vessels of selected types are as follows:<ITAG tagnum="38">MODU (semisubmersible)</ITAG>.....$306,925<ITAG tagnum="38">MODU (jackup)</ITAG>.....$226,925<ITAG tagnum="38">Passenger vessel (ferries, other non-ocean, cold water areas)</ITAG>.....$52,540<ITAG tagnum="38">Passenger vessel (oceangoing)</ITAG>.....$81,745<ITAG tagnum="38">Cargo vessel (ocean, coastwise)</ITAG>.....$28,145<ITAG tagnum="38">Tank vessel (ocean, coastwise)</ITAG>.....$50,045<ITAG tagnum="38">Cargo vessel (Great Lakes)</ITAG>.....$14,245<ITAG tagnum="38">Offshore supply vessel (Gulf of Mexico)</ITAG>.....$1,390Total estimates for the project are $73.8 M total one-time costs spreadover the 15 years from 1986 to 2001 (average annual cost $4.9 M), and $7.4M in recurring annual costs. The year 1986 is considered the base yearsince SOLAS 74/83 came into force then. U.S. vessels on international voyageshad to start complying at that time, even though these implementing regulationswere not in place. The draft evaluation uses a discounting method to determine future costsand benefits. On the basis of this analysis, the evaluation estimates thatthe regulations would cost approximately $915,666 per life saved. Dependingupon the type of vessel, this may vary from as little as $0.4 M per lifesaved, to as much as $2.8 M per life saved. However, as explained in theregulatory evaluation, the costs and benefits are very difficult to identifyaccurately, so there is a significant margin for error in these numbers.The minimum accepted value of a human life is $1 M and values considerablyabove this amount have frequently been used. Therefore, it appears thatthe rule may be cost effective depending upon the changes made in the finalrule, refinements to the draft evaluation, and the assumed value of a humanlife. It should be noted that the draft evaluation makes no attempt toquantify intangible benefits, such as the elimination of some of the presentrepetitive, overlapping and sometimes contradictory regulations, and thepublication of fewer pages in the Code of Federal Regulations and <T4>Federal Register </T4>in the future.Comments are invited on the draft evaluation. In particular, comments areinvited on the assumptions made in the evaluation and the time-phasingproposed in the regulations. Changes in either could greatly affect thecost-benefit analysis. The proposals in this notice are intended to meetthe objectives of lifesaving system improvement in the most cost-effectiveway, however, comments are specifically invited on ways to further reducethe cost of these regulations.The agency certifies that this proposal will not have a significant economicimpact on a substantial number of small entities. Generally, the only smallentities affected would be certain operators of offshore supply vessels,operating primarily in the Gulf of Mexico. These regulations provide fora number of alternative arrangements that minimize the cost impact on theseoperators, including the possibility to use life floats instead of lifeboatsor liferafts. An optional arrangement for recovering persons that falloverboard is also permitted in lieu of the requirement to carry a rescueboat.State and local governments that operate passenger ferry services in coldwaters may be affected by the proposed requirement for survival craft onpassenger vessels. These vessels would have the highest 1991 retrofit costsof all the vessels affected by these proposed rules at an estimated $50,300.Nevertheless, this is only about 0.1% of an estimated $50,000,000 replacementcost of such a vessel. For this reason, these regulations are not consideredto have a significant impact on governments, or any small entity that mayhappen to operate similar vessels.Three primary benefits of the proposed regulations are identified in thedraft evaluation. First, the proposed regulations would resolve numerousoutstanding recommendations made by the National Transportation SafetyBoard and Coast Guard Marine Boards of Investigation, and would resultin the saving of life in future marine casualties where vessels must beabandoned. Second, repetitive, overlapping, and sometimes contradictoryregulations will be eliminated. Third, U.S. registered vessels would notbe subject to penalty or delay in foreign ports because of non-compliancewith SOLAS 74/83.Four comments on the ANPRM were to the effect that the costs identifiedin that notice were too low or that some particular element of the costof the regulations were not taken into account. The draft evaluation includesa cost estimate that is more complete than the rough estimate used in theANPRM. It should also be more accurate since it uses cost information webelieve is more accurate than that used to estimate the cost in the ANPRM.One comment stated that the benefits of the proposed rules were overestimated,and the costs underestimated. Another comment was interested in how thecost estimate is prepared. The draft evaluation contains an analysis ofthe costs and benefits. The draft evaluation is part of the docket andis available for inspection and copying at the Marine Safety Council (see<T2>ADDRESSES </T2>section at the beginning of this notice).One comment noted that the cost of the regulations would put operatorsof self-propelled vessels at a greater disadvantage as compared to uninspectedtug and barge operations. The Coast Guard does not have statutory authorityto require any lifesaving equipment aboard uninspected vessels beyond alife preserver or other lifesaving device for each individual on board(46 U.S.C. 4101(b)). The Coast Guard would recommend that uninspected vesselscomply with the regulations proposed in this notice for the particularsize and service of vessel.<ITAG tagnum="84">Recordkeeping Requirements</ITAG> This proposed rulemaking contains information collection and recordkeepingrequirements. Some provisions are minor revisions of existing sectionsthat have previously been submitted to the Office of Management and Budgetfor review under the Paperwork Reduction Act (Pub. L. 96-511, 44 U.S.C.3501 et seq.). The section numbers of those provisions and the correspondingOMB approval numbers are as follows:<ITAG tagnum="38">a. andSection; 35.07-10</ITAG>.....2115-0071<ITAG tagnum="38">b. andSection; 35.10-1(e)</ITAG>.....2115-0071<ITAG tagnum="38">c. andSection; 35.10-2(e)</ITAG>.....2115-0071<ITAG tagnum="38">d. andSection; 35.10-3(b)</ITAG>.....2115-0071<ITAG tagnum="38">e. andSection; 35.90-70(a)</ITAG>.....2115-0071<ITAG tagnum="38">f. andSection; 35.90-73(c)</ITAG>.....2115-0071<ITAG tagnum="38">g. andSection; 78.17-50(f)</ITAG>.....2115-0071<ITAG tagnum="38">h. andSection; 78.17-55(e)</ITAG>.....2115-0071<ITAG tagnum="38">i. andSection; 78.37-5(b)</ITAG>.....2115-0071<ITAG tagnum="38">j. andSection; 78.95-70(a)</ITAG>.....2115-0071<ITAG tagnum="38">k. andSection; 78.95-73(c)</ITAG>.....2115-0071<ITAG tagnum="38">l. andSection; 97.15-35(e)</ITAG>.....2115-0071<ITAG tagnum="38">m. andSection; 97.15-40(e)</ITAG>.....2115-0071<ITAG tagnum="38">n. andSection; 97.35-5(c)</ITAG>.....2115-0071<ITAG tagnum="38">o. andSection; 97.90-70(a)</ITAG>.....2115-0071<ITAG tagnum="38">p. andSection; 97.90-73(c)</ITAG>.....2115-0071<ITAG tagnum="38">q. andSection; 109.311(a)</ITAG>.....2115-0071<ITAG tagnum="38">r. andSection; 109.313(c)</ITAG>.....2115-0071<ITAG tagnum="38">s. andSection; 109.425</ITAG>.....2115-0007<ITAG tagnum="38">t. andSection; 109.433</ITAG>.....2115-0071<ITAG tagnum="38">u. andSection; 167.55-5</ITAG>.....2115-0071<ITAG tagnum="38">v. andSection; 167.65-2(e)</ITAG>.....2115-0071<ITAG tagnum="38">w. andSection; 196.15-40(e)</ITAG>.....2115-0071<ITAG tagnum="38">x. andSection; 196.35-5</ITAG>.....2115-0071<ITAG tagnum="38">y. andSection; 199.80</ITAG>.....2115-0542Other information collection and recordkeeping requirements are eithernew or have not been approved by OMB. They have been submitted to the Officeof Management and Budget for approval under the provisions of the PaperworkReduction Act (Pub. L. 96-511, 44 U.S.C. 3501 et seq.). Persons desiringto comment on these information collection and recordkeeping requirementsshould submit their comments to: Office of Management and Budget, 726 JacksonPlace NW., Washington, DC 20503, ATTN: Desk Officer, U.S. Coast Guard.Persons submitting comments to OMB are also requested to submit a copyof their comment to the Coast Guard as indicated under ``<T2>ADDRESSES</T2>.'' The section numbers are as follows:<ITAG tagnum="25">a. andSection; 35.10-1(a)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">b. andSection; 35.11-5(d)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">c. andSection; 35.40-19</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">d. andSection; 35.40-40</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">e. andSection; 35.40-43</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">f. andSection; 35.40-45</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">g. andSection; 35.40-48</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">h. andSection; 35.40-50</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">i. andSection; 35.40-55</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">j. andSection; 35.90-30</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">k. andSection; 35.90-40(c)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">l. andSection; 78.14-5(d)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">m. andSection; 78.17-50(a)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">n. andSection; 78.47-60</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">o. andSection; 78.47-62</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">p. andSection; 78.47-63</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">q. andSection; 78.47-64</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">r. andSection; 78.47-65</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">s. andSection; 78.47-72</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">t. andSection; 78.95-30</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">u. andSection; 78.95-40(c)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">v. andSection; 97.14-5(d)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">w. andSection; 97.15-35(a)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">x. andSection; 97.37-37</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">y. andSection; 97.37-39</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">z. andSection; 97.37-40</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">aa. andSection; 97.37-42</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">bb. andSection; 97.37-43</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">cc. andSection; 97.37-55</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">dd. andSection; 97.90-30</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">ee. andSection; 97.90-40(c)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">ff. andSection; 108.645</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">gg. andSection; 108.646</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">hh. andSection; 108.647</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">ii. andSection; 108.649</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">jj. andSection; 108.650</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">kk. andSection; 109.215(a)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">ll. andSection; 109.303</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">mm. andSection; 109.305(c)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">nn. andSection; 109.323(e)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">oo. andSection; 160.040-6</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">pp. andSection; 196.37-37</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">qq. andSection; 196.37-39</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">rr. andSection; 196.37-40</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">ss. andSection; 196.37-42</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">tt. andSection; 196.37-43</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">uu. andSection; 196.37-49</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">vv. andSection; 199.80</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">ww. andSection; 199.90</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">xx. andSection; 199.175(c)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">yy. andSection; 199.175(c)(19)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">zz. andSection; 199.175(c)(40)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">aaa. andSection; 199.175(c)(46)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Federalism</ITAG>This action has been analyzed in accordance with the principles and criteriacontained in Executive Order 12612, and it has been determined that thisnotice of proposed rulemaking does not have sufficient federalism implicationsto warrant the preparation of a Federalism Assessment.<ITAG tagnum="84">Derivation Table </ITAG>The regulations proposed in this notice are based in part on existing regulationsin Title 46 of the Code of Federal Regulations that would be removed orrevised, and also on Chapter III of the 1983 Amendments to the Safety ofLife at Sea Convention, 1974. For the convenience of the user, the followingderivation table shows the relationship of the regulations proposed inthis notice with existing similar regulations and SOLAS 74/83. The right-handcolumn also lists certain resolutions of the International Maritime Organizationthat are related to SOLAS 74/83. These are IMO Res. A.414(XI), Code forthe Construction and Equipment of Mobile Offshore Drilling Units; IMO Res.A.521(13), Recommendation on Testing of Life-Saving Appliances; and IMORes. A.534(13), Code of Safety for Special Purpose Ships. The section numberfollows identification of the resolution. In the case of Resolution A.521,all references are in Part 2 of the resolution, with the part number listedfirst, followed by a ``/'', followed by the section number.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,tp0,i1,s75,r200,xs128 </C>  <H1>Proposed regulation </H1><H1>Existing regulation (CFR, title 46) </H1><H1>SOLAS 74/83 regulation (Ch. III, except as noted)</H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">(effective date)<D> </D><D>1.1 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.5<D>None</D><D>None </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.7<D>None</D><D>None </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.10(a)<D>None</D><D>None </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.10(b) <D>andSection; 33.15-1(a), 75.01-1, 75.10-1, 75.15-1, 75.20-1, 75.25-1, 75.27-1,75.30-1, 75.33-1, 75.40-1, 75.41-1, 75.43-1, 75.45-1, 75.50-1, 75.90-1,78.87-1, 94.10-1(a), 94.10-1(b), 94.15-1, 94.20-1, 94.25-1, 94.30-1, 94.33-1,94.35-1, 94.40-1, 94.43-1, 94.45-1, 94.50-1, 94.90-1, 97.85-1, 192.01-1,192.10-1, 192.15-1, 192.20-1, 192.25-1, 192.30-1, 192.33-1, 192.35-1, 192.40-1,192.43-1, 192.45-1, 192.50-1, 192.60-1, 196.90-1</D><D>1.5, 8.1, 9.1, 21.3.1, 21.4.1</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.10(c) <D>andSection; 30.10-35 </D><D>1.2 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.10(d) <D>None </D><D>1.3 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.10(e) <D>None </D><D>1.1 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.10(f) <D>andSection; 75.05-5, 94.05-5, 108.103, 192.05-5 </D><D>None </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.15<D>andSection; 33.01-5, 33.05-1, 33.05-2, 33.10-10(j), 33.10-15(a)(3), 75.10-90,75.15-90, 75.20-90, 75.25-90, 75.30-90, 75.33-90, 75.40-90, 75.43-90, 75.45-90,75.50-90, 94.10-90, 94.15-90, 94.20-90, 94.25-90, 94.30-90, 94.33-90, 94.40-90,94.43-90, 94.50-5(b), 94.50-90, 192.10-90, 192.15-90, 192.20-90, 192.25-90,192.30-90, 192.33-90, 192.40-90, 192.43-90, 192.45-90, 192.50-5(b), 192.50-90</D><D>1.4.1, 1.4.2</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.15(a) <D>andSection; 33.10-15(b) </D><D>1.4.1, 1.4.2</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.15(b) <D>andSection; 33.01-5 </D><D>1.4.3 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.15(c) <D>None </D><D>1.6, 6.1 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.15(d) <D>None </D><D>1.6, 21.4.1 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.15(e) <D>None </D><D>1.6, 26.3 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.15(f) <D>None </D><D>None </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.15(g) <D>None </D><D>None </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.15(h) <D>None </D><D>None </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.15(i) <D>None </D><D>None </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.15(j) <D>None </D><D>None </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.15(k) <D>None </D><D>None </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.15(l) <D>andSection; 75.l0-5(a)(2), 94.10-5(a)(2), 192.10-5(a)(2) </D><D>None </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.15(m) <D>None </D><D>1.4.4, 1.4.5 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.25 <D>None </D><D>None </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.30 ``Child'' <D>None </D><D>None </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.30 ``Embarkation station'' <D>None </D><D>None </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.30 ``Fleet angle'' <D>andSection; 33.10-l0(k), 75.33-10(d), 94.33-10(d), 108.509(a), 192.33-10(d)</D><D>None </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.30 ``Float-free'' <D>None </D><D>3.4 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.30 ``Free-fall'' <D>None </D><D>3.5 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.30 ``Immersion suit'' <D>andSection; 33.37-5(c) andamp; (d), 94.41-5(c) andamp; (d), 108.513(d), 192.41-5(c)andamp; (d)</D><D>3.6 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.30 ``Inflatable'' <D>None </D><D>3.7  </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.30 ``Inflated'' <D>None </D><D>3.8 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.30 ``Launching appliance'' <D>None </D><D>3.9 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.30 ``Length'' <D>andSection; 42.13-15(a) </D><D>3.10 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.30 ``Molded depth'' <D>andSection; 42.13-15(e) </D><D>3.11 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.30 ``Muster station'' <D>None </D><D>3 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.30 ``Novel'' <D>None </D><D>3.12 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.30 ``Retrieval'' <D>None </D><D>3.14 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.30 ``Seagoing condition'' <D>None </D><D>3 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.30 ``Survival craft'' <D>None </D><D>3.17 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.30 ``Toxic vapor or gas'' <D>None </D><D>3 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.40 <D>andSection; 30.15-1(a), 70.15-1(a), 90.15-1(a), 108.105, 188.15-1(a) </D><D>4.3 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.62 <D>None </D><D>6.2.4 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.64 <D>andSection; 33.60, 75.60, 94.60,108.523,109.307(a), 192.65 </D><D>6.2.3 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.66 <D>andSection; 33.15-25, 75.10-10(a)(4), 75.55-1, 94.55-1, 108.519, 109.321,192.55-1 </D><D>6.2.1, 41.7.8 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.68(a)(1) <D>andSection; 33.45-5, 75.90-5(a), 94.90-5(a), 108.521(a), 192.60-5(a) </D><D>6.3  </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.68(a)(2) <D>andSection; 33.45-1, 75.90-10, 94.90-5(b) </D><D>None </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.68(b) <D>andSection; 94.90-10, 192.60-10(a) </D><D>None </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.68(c) <D>andSection; 94.90-15 </D><D>None </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.68(d)(1) <D>andSection; 33.45-1, 33.45-5, 75.90-5(c), 94.90-5(a), 108.521(b), 192.60-5(a)</D><D>6.3 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.68(d)(2) <D>andSection; 33.01-35, 33.45-10 </D><D>6.3 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.70(a) <D>andSection; 33.40-1(a), 33.40-1(b), 33.40-5(b), 33.40-5(c), 33.40-15,75.43-5(a), 75.43-5(b), 75.43-10(b), 75.43-15, 94.43-5(a), 94.43-5(b),94.43-10(b), 94.43-15, 108.515(b), 108.515(c), 108.515(e), 108.515(f),192.43-5(a), 192.43-5(b), 192.43-10(b), 192.43-15 </D><D>7.1.1.2, 7.1.2, 7.1.3, 31.4  </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.70(b) <D>None </D><D>7.1.1.1 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.70(c) <D>andSection; 33.40-1(c)(1), 75.43-5(c)(1), 75.43-10(c), 94.43-5(c)(1),94.43-10(c), 108.515(d), 192.43-5(c)(1), 192.43-10(c) </D><D>7.1.3 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.70(d) <D>andSection; 33.40-5(d), 75.43-10(d), 94.43-10(d), 192.43-10(d) </D><D>30.2.6 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.72(a) <D>andSection; 33.35-1, 33.35-15, 75.40-5(a), 75.40-10(a), 75.40-10(c), 94.40-5(a),94.40-10(a), 94.40-10(c), 108.514(a), 108.514(c), 192.40-5, 192.40-10(a),192.40-10(b) </D><D>7.2 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.72(b) <D>andSection; 33.35-1(b), 94.40-10(c), 192.40-10(b) </D><D>None </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.72(c) <D>andSection; 94.40-10(b) </D><D>None </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.73 <D>None </D><D>7.3 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.75(a) <D>andSection; 33.38-1, 75.40-30, 94.42-1, 108.513(e), 108.514(e), 192.42-1</D><D>21.3.2, 27.2.2 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.75(b) <D>None </D><D>21.3.1, 27.2.1 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.76 <D>andSection; 33.38-5, 75.40-5(b), 94.42-5, 108.513(f), 108.514(d), 192.42-5</D><D>32.1.6 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.78 <D>andSection; 33.35-5, 33.37-15, 75.40-15(a), 75.40-15(c), 75.40-20, 75.41-10,78.87-5, 94.40-15, 94.41-10, 97.85-5, 108.513(g), 108.514(b), 109.313,109.314, 192.41-10, 196.90-5 </D><D>7.2.2 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.80 <D>andSection; 35.10-1(a), 78.13-1(a), 97.13-1(a), 196.13-1(a) </D><D>8.1, 8.2 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.80(a) <D>andSection; 35.10-1(a), 35.10-1(b), 78.13-1, 78.13-5, 78.13-15, 97.13-5,97.13-10, 109.501, 109.503(a), 109.505, 196.13-5, 196.13-10 </D><D>8.3, 53 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.80(b) <D>andSection; 75.40-25, 78.47-47 </D><D>8.4 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.80(c) <D>andSection; 35.10-9, 78.49-1, 97.39-1, 108.655, 196.39-1</D><D>8.2 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.80(d) <D>andSection; 160.071-15(b)</D><D>8.2 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.90 <D>andSection; 35.10-9(a), 78.49-1(a), 97.39-1(a), 108.655, 196.39-1(a)</D><D>9.2 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.110(a) <D>andSection; 75.15-10(a)(3)</D><D>11.2 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.110(b) <D>andSection; 72.10-40, 92.10-40, 108.165, 190.10-40</D><D>11.3 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.110(c) <D>None </D><D>11.6 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.110(d) <D>None </D><D>None </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.110(e) <D>andSection; 33.20-1(c)(1), 33.20-3, 75.50-5, 75.50-7, 94.50-5, 94.50-7,108.525(a), 108.525(b), 109.341(b), 192.50-5, 192.50-7</D><D>11.7, 48.7.1 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.110(f) <D>andSection; 33.20-1(f), 75.15-10(b)(7), 94.15-10(b)(6), 108.507(a)(4),192.15-10(b)(6)</D><D>11.8,48.6 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.110(g) <D>andSection; 108.508(a)(5) </D><D>11.8, 38.4.1.2 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.120 <D>andSection; 33.20-1(d),  75.15-10(b)(4), 75.15-10(c)(1), 94.15-10(b)(4),192.15-10(1)(4)</D><D>12 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.130(a) <D>None </D><D>11.1 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.130(a)(1) <D>andSection; 33.20-1(e), 75.15-10(b)(2), 75.15-10(b)(6), 75.15-10(c)(1),75.25-5(d), 75.25-5(f), 94.15-10(a)(2), 94.15-10(a)(3), 94.15-10(b)(2),94.25-5(d), 94.25-5(f), 108.511(a), 108.511(c), 192.15-10(a)(2), 192.15-10(a)(3),192.15-10(b)(2), 192.25-5(d), 192.25-5(f)</D><D>13.1 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.130(a)(2) <D>andSection; 33.20-15(c), 75.15-10(b)(5), 75.25-5(c), 75.27-5(c), 94.15-10(b)(5),94.25-5(c), 108.508(d), 192.15-10(b)(5), 192.25-5(c)</D><D>48.6 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.130(a)(3) <D>andSection; 33.10-5(d), 75.30-5(b), 94.30-5(b), 160.015-2(g), 192.30-5(b)</D><D>48.1.9 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.130(b) <D>andSection; 33.05-3(c), 33.05-20(c)</D><D>11.1 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.130(c) <D>andSection; 94.10-40(a) </D><D>None </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.130(d) <D>None </D><D>13.1.2 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.133(a) <D>andSection; 33.05-3(c)(2), 75.15-10(b)(4), 94.15-10(b)(4), 108.511(d),192.15-10(b)(4)</D><D>13.2 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.133(b) <D>andSection; 33.20-1(a), 75.15-10(b)(1), 94.15-10(b)(1), 192.15-10(b)(1)</D><D>13.3 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.133(c) <D>None </D><D>41.6.11 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.135(a) <D>None </D><D>13.4 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.135(b) <D>None </D><D>38.1.2 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.135(c) <D>None </D><D>None </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.135(d) <D>None </D><D>13.5 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.135(e) <D>None </D><D>39.9.2 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.135(f) <D>andSection;33.20-20, 75.15-10(e), 94.15-10(e), 108.510, 192.15-10(e)</D><D>30.2, 38.6.3 (IMO Res. A.414(XI)-10.5) </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.137 <D>andSection; 33.20-25, 94.15-10(d), 192.15-10(d)</D><D>None </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.140(a) <D>andSection; 75.10-10(a)(3) </D><D>14 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.140(b) <D>None </D><D>41.6.11 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.140(c) <D>None </D><D>47.3.11 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.150(a) <D>andSection; 33.10-5(b), 33.20-1(a), 75.30-10(a), 94.30-10(a), 108.506(c),192.30-10(a)</D><D>15.1 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.150(b) <D>andSection; 33.10-10(d), 75.15-10(a)(4), 75.27-5(b), 75.33-5(b), 94.15-10(a)(4),94.33-5(b), 192.15-10(a)(4), 192.33-5(b)</D><D>48.1.1 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.150(c) <D>andSection; 33.10-1(b), 33.10-1(c), 75.25-5(c), 75.25-10(a), 75.25-15(a),94.25-5(c), 94.25-10(a), 94.25-15(a), 108.508(d), 192.25-5(c), 192.25-10(a)</D><D>48.1.3 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.150(d) <D>andSection; 75.27-5(b) </D><D>48.1.8 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.150(e) <D>andSection; 33.10-20(b), 75.10-5(a)(6)(ii), 94.10-5(a)(4)(ii), 192.10-5(a)(4)(ii)</D><D>15.4 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.150(f) <D>andSection; 75.15-10(a)(2), 94.15-10(a)(2), 192.15-10(a)(2)</D><D>15.5 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.150(g) <D>andSection; 75.15-10(a)(3), 94.15-10(a)(3), 192.15-10(a)(3)</D><D>38.4.2, 38.4.3, 41.3.1, 41.3.2 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.150(h) <D>andSection; 33.10-5(e), 75.30-15(a), 94.30-15(a), 108.507(b), 108.507(d),108.508(b), 108.508(c), 192.30-15(a)</D><D>15.3, 48.1.4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.150(i) <D>andSection; 33.20-1(c)(4), 75.15-10(b)(10), 75.15-10(c)(2), 94.15-10(b)(8),108.511(d), 192.15-10(b)(8) </D><D>15.8</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.150(j) <D>None </D><D>15.9</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.153(a) <D>andSection; 33.10-1(a), 33.10-1(d), 33.10-5(c), 33.10-10(g), 33.10-10(i),75.25-5(a), 75.27-5(a), 75.27-5(d), 75.30-5(a), 75.30-10(b), 75.30-15(b),94.25-5(a), 94.30-5(a), 94.30-10(b), 94.30-15(b), 108.507(a)(2), 108.507(a)(3),108.508(a)(1), 108.508(a)(2), 108.508(a)(3), 108.508(a)(4), 108.508(a)(6),192.25-5(a), 192.30-5(a), 192.30-10(b), 192.30-15(b)</D><D>30.2, 48.2</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.153(b) <D>andSection; 33.10-5(a), 33.10-10(a), 33.10-10(b), 33.10-10(c), 75.30-5(c),75.33-5(a), 75.33-10(a), 75.33-10(b), 94.30-5(c), 94.33-5(a), 94.33-10(a),108.507(a)(5), 108.507(a)(6), 192.30-5(c), 192.33-5(a), 192.33-10(a)</D><D>48.1.8, 48.2.1</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.153(c) <D>andSection; 33.10-10(b), 75.33-10(c), 94.33-10(c), 192.33-10(c) </D><D>None</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.153(d) <D>andSection; 33.10-10(d), 75.33-5(b), 94.33-5(b), 108.506(a), 192.33-5(b)</D><D>15.6</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.153(e) <D>andSection; 33.10-10(g), 75.33-5(d), 94.33-5(d), 108.507(a)(6), 160.015-2(h),192.33-5(d) </D><D>48.2.2</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.153(f) <D>andSection; 33.10-10(k), 75.33-10(d), 94.33-10(d), 108.509(b), 192.33-10(d)</D><D>48.2.2</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.153(g) <D>andSection; 33.10-10(k), 75.33-10(d), 94.33-10(d), 108.509(b), 192.33-10(d)</D><D>48.2.2</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.153(h) <D>andSection; 75.33-5(c), 94.33-5(c), 108.507(c), 160.015-2(i), 192.33-5(c)</D><D>None</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.153(i) <D>None </D><D>48.2.6</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.153(j) <D>andSection; 33.10-5(f)(1)(iii),  75.35-5(b)(4)(iii), 94.35-5(b)(4)(iii),192.35-5(b)(4)(iii) </D><D>None</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.153(k) <D>andSection; 33.10-5(f)(1)(iii), 75.35-5(1)(4)(iii), 94.35-5(b)(4)(iii),192.35-5(b)(4)(iii) </D><D>48.2.7</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.153(l) <D>andSection; 160.015-3(k)(2) </D><D>48.2.5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.155 <D>None </D><D>48.5.1</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.157(a) <D>None </D><D>28.2</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.157(b) <D>andSection; 160.015-2(f) </D><D>15.2, 48.1.10</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.157(c) <D>None </D><D>15.3</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.157(d) <D>andSection; 33.20-1(c)(2), 75.25-10(b), 75.25-15(b), 94.25-10(b), 94.25-15(b),192.25-10(b) </D><D>15.10</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.160 <D>andSection; 33.20-1(g), 75.25-5(g), 94.10-55(b)(2)(iii), 94.25-5(g), 192.10-55(b)(2)(iii),192.25-5(g) </D><D>16.1</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.160(a) <D>None </D><D>16.2</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.160(b) <D>None </D><D>None</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.160(c) <D>andSection; 75.30-10(d) </D><D>16.3</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.160(d) <D>andSection; 75.30-10(d) </D><D>16.4, 48.2.3, 48.2.8</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.170(a) <D>andSection; 33.55-1(a), 33.55-1(b), 75.45-5(a), 75.45-10, 94.45-5(a),94.45-10, 108.517(a), 192.45-5(a), 192.45-10 </D><D>17</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.170(b) <D>andSection; 33.55-1(a), 33.55-1(c), 75.45-5(b), 75.45-10, 94.45-5(b),94.45-10, 108.517(b), 192.45-5(b), 192.45-10 </D><D>None</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.170(c) <D>andSection; 33.55-10(a), 33.55-10(b), 75.45-15, 94.45-15, 192.45-15 </D><D>49.1</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.170(d) <D>andSection; 33.55-10(a), 33.55-10(b), 75.45-15(a)(6), 75.45-15(b)(6),94.45-15(a)(6), 94.45-15(b)(6), 192.45-15(a)(6), 192.45-15(b)(6) </D><D>None</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.170(e) <D>andSection; 33.55-5, 109.320(a) </D><D>None </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(a) <D>andSection; 33.15-1(b), 33.15-1(d), 33.15-1(e), 75.20-5(a), 75.20-5(c),75.20-5(d), 94.20-5(a), 94.20-5(c), 94.20-5(d), 108.503(f), 192.20-5(a),192.20-5(c), 192.20-5(d) </D><D>41.8 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(b) <D>andSection; 33.15-16 </D><D>38.5, 39.10 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c) <D>andSection; 33.15-5, 33.15-15, 75.20-10, 75.20-20, 94.20-10, 94.20-20,108.503(d), 108.503(e), 108.503(f), 192.20-10, 192.20-20 </D><D>38.5.2, 38.5.3, 41.8.32, 47.2.1 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(1) <D>(Reserved) </D><D>None </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(2) <D>andSection; 33.15-10(a), 75.20-15(a), 94.20-15(a), 192.20-15(a) </D><D>38.5.1.3, 41.8.3, 47.2.2.2 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(3) <D>andSection; 33.15-10(b), 75.20-15(b), 94.20-15(b), 192.20-15(b) </D><D>41.7.12, 41.8.25, 42.2</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(4) <D>andSection; 33.15-10(c), 33.15-20(a), 75.20-15(c), 75.20-25(a), 94.20-15(c),94.20-25(a), 192.20-15(c), 192.20-25(a) </D><D>41.8.2, 47.2.3.1, 47.2.4.5 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(5) <D>andSection; 33.15-10(d), 75.20-15(d), 94.20-15(d), 192.20-15(d) </D><D>41.8.3, 47.2.3.2 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(6) <D>andSection; 160.051-8(c)(13) </D><D>38.5.1.7, 41.8.23 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(7) <D>andSection; 33.15-10(e), 75.20-15(e), 94.20-15(e), 192.20-15(e) </D><D>41.8.5, 47.2.2.3 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(8) <D>andSection; 33.15-10(mm), 75.20-15(oo), 94.20-15(mm), 192.20-15(mm) </D><D>42.3 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(9) <D>None </D><D>41.8.10 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(10) <D>andSection; 33.15-10(f), 75.20-15(f), 94.20-15(f), 192.20-15(f) </D><D>None </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(11) <D>andSection; 33.15-10(g), 75.20-15(g), 75.20-25(b), 94.20-15(g), 94.20-25(b),192.20-15(g), 192.20-25(b) </D><D>38.5.1.20, 41.8.11 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(12) <D>None </D><D>6.2.3 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(13) <D>andSection; 33.15-10(h), 75.20-15(h), 94.20-15(h), 192.20-15(h) </D><D>41.8.28 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(14) <D>andSection; 33.15-10(i), 75.20-15(i), 94.20-15(i), 192.20-15(i) </D><D>38.5.1.8, 41.8.20, 47.2.2.9 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(15) <D>andSection; 33.15-10(11), 75.20-15(nn), 94.20-15(11), 192.20-15(11) </D><D>38.5.1.17, 41.8.26  </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(16) <D>andSection; 33.15-10(j), 75.20-15(j), 94.20-15(j), 192.20-15(j) </D><D>38.5.1.13, 41.8.16, 47.2.2.7 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(17) <D>andSection; 33.15-10(k), 75.20-15(k), 94.20-15(k), 192.20-15(k), </D><D>41.8.8 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(18) <D>andSection; 33.15-10(1), 75.20-15(1), 94.20-15(1), 192.20-15(1) </D><D>38.5.1.1, 41.8.24, 47.2.2.10  </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(19) <D>andSection; 160.051-8(b)(13) </D><D>38.5.1.23 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(20) <D>andSection; 33.15-10(m), 75.20-15(m), 75.20-25(c), 94.20-15(m), 94.20-25(c),192.20-15(m), 192.20-25(c) </D><D>41.8.22 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(21) <D>None </D><D>38.5.1.2, 47.2.3.3, 47.2.4.1 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(22) <D>andSection; 33.15-10(n), 75.20-15(n), 94.20-15(n), 192.20-15(n) </D><D>41.3.3 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(23) <D>andSection; 33.15-10(o), 75.20-15(o), 94.20-15(o), 192.20-15(o) </D><D>41.7.11 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(24) <D>andSection; 33.15-10(q), 75.20-15(q), 94.20-15(q), 192.20-15(q) </D><D>None </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(25) <D>andSection; 33.15-10(s), 75.20-15(s), 94.20-15(s), 192.20-15(s) </D><D>None  </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(26) <D>andSection; 33.15-10(t), 33.15-20(c), 75.20-15(t), 75.20-25(e), 94.20-15(t),94.20-25(e), 192.20-15(t), 192.20-25(e) </D><D>None </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(27) <D>andSection; 33.15-10(v), 75.20-15(v), 75.20-25(f), 94.20-15(v), 94.20-25(f),192.20-15(v), 192.20-25(f) </D><D>38.5.1.15, 41.8.17 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(28) <D>andSection; 33.15-10(w), 33.15-10(cc), 33.15-20(d), 33.15-20(g), 75.20-15(w),75.20-15(dd), 75.20-25(g), 75.20-25(k), 94.20-15(w), 94.20-15(cc), 94.20-25(g),192.20-15(w), 192.20-25(g) </D><D>41.8.1, 47.2.2.1 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(29) <D>andSection; 33.15-10(x), 75.20-15(x), 94.20-15(x), 192.20-15(x) </D><D>None </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(30) <D>andSection; 160.051-8(b)(7) </D><D>38.5.1.6 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(31)(i) <D>andSection; 33.15-10(z), 75.20-15(z), 94.20-15(z), 192.20-15(z) </D><D>41.8.7 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(31)(ii) <D>None </D><D>47.2.2.5 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(31)(iii) <D>andSection; 33.15-20(f), 75.20-25(i), 94.20-25(i), 192.20-25(i) </D><D>38.3.3, 40.6.1</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(32) <D>andSection; 33.15-10(bb), 75.20-15(bb), 75.20-25(j), 94.20-15(bb), 94.20-25(j),192.20-15(bb), 192.20-25(j) </D><D>38.5.1.18, 41.8.12</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(33) <D>andSection; 160.051-8(b)(9) </D><D>47.2.4.3</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(34) <D>None </D><D>38.5.1.14, 41.8.30, 47.2.2.12</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(35) <D>None </D><D>None</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(36) <D>andSection; 160.051-8(c)(7) </D><D>47.2.4.4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(37) <D>andSection; 33.15-10(dd), 75.20-15(ee), 94.20-15(dd), 192.20-15(dd) </D><D>None</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(38) <D>andSection; 33.15-10(ee), 33.15-20(h), 75.20-15(ff), 75.20-25(l), 94.20-15(ee),94.20-25(l), 192.20-15(ee), 192.20-25(l) </D><D>38.5.1.5, 41.8.6, 47.2.2.4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(39) <D>andSection; 75.20-15(gg) </D><D>41.8.29, 47.2.2.11</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(40) <D>andSection; 160.051-8(c)(15) </D><D>38.5.1.21, 41.8.21</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(41) <D>andSection; 33.15-10(ff) 75.20-15(hh), 75.20-25(m), 94.20-15(ff), 94.20-25(m),192.20-15(ff), 192.20-25(m) </D><D>38.5.1.12, 41.8.15</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(42) <D>andSection; 33.15-10(gg), 33.15-20(i), 75.20-15(ii), 75.20-25(m), 94.20-15(gg),94.20-25(m), 192.20-15(gg), 192.20-25(m) </D><D>38.5.1.11, 41.8.14</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(43) <D>andSection; 33.15-10(hh), 33.15-20(i), 75.20-15(jj), 94.20-15(hh), 192.20-15(hh)</D><D>38.5.1.10, 41.8.13</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(44) <D>andSection; 33.20-1(c)(5), 75.15-10(b)(8), 94.15-10(b)(7), 192.15-10(b)(7)</D><D>41.7.9</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(45) <D>andSection; 160.051-8(c)(9) </D><D>38.5.1.4, 47.2.4.2</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(46) <D>andSection; 160.051-8(b)(3) </D><D>38.5.1.21, 41.8.4</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(47) <D>andSection; 33.15-10(nn), 75.20-15(pp), 94.20-15(nn), 192.20-15(nn) </D><D>38.5.1.16, 41.8.18</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(48) <D>None </D><D>38.5.1.24, 41.8.31, 47.2.2.13</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(49) <D>andSection; 33.15-10(ii), 75.20-15(kk), 94.20-15(ii), 192.20-15(ii) </D><D>41.8.27</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(50) <D>None </D><D>47.2.2.6</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(51) <D>andSection; 33.15-10(jj), 33.15-10(oo), 75.20-15(ll), 75.20-15(qq), 75.20-25(n),94.20-15(jj), 94.20-15(oo), 94.20-25(n), 192.20-15(oo), 192.20-25(n) </D><D>38.5.1.19, 41.8.9</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(c)(52) <D>andSection; 33.15-10(kk), 75.20-15(mm), 94.20-15(kk), 192.20-15(kk)</D><D> 38.5.1.9, 41.8.19, 47.2.2.8</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(d) <D>andSection; 33.15-15, 94.20-30, 192.20-30 </D><D>None</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(d)(1) <D>andSection; 33.15-20(a), 94.20-35(a), 192.20-35(a) </D><D>None</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(d)(2) <D>andSection; 33.15-20(b), 94.20-35(b), 192.20-35(b) </D><D>None</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(d)(3) <D>andSection; 33.15-20(d), 94.20-35(c), 192.20-35(c) </D><D>None</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(d)(4) <D>andSection; 33.15-20(f), 94.20-35(d), 192.20-35(d) </D><D>None</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.175(d)(5) <D>andSection; 33.15-20(j), 94.20-35(e), 192.20-35(e) </D><D>None</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.200 <D>None </D><D>None</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.201(a) <D>andSection; 75.05-1, 192.05-1 </D><D>None</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.201(a)(1) <D>andSection; 75.10-5(a)(1), 192.10-5(a)(1) </D><D>None</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.201(a)(2) <D>None </D><D>30.2, 41, 42</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.201(a)(3) <D>None </D><D>30.2, 41, 44</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.201(a)(4) <D>andSection; 75.10-5(b)(3), 75.10-5(b)(4), 192.10-5(b)(2), 192.10-5(b)(3)</D><D>30.2, 38, 38.2.1, 39</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.201(a)(5) <D>andSection; 75.10-5(b)(1), 192.10-5(b)(1) </D><D>30.2, 38, 38.2.1, 40</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.201(a)(6) <D>None </D><D>None</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.201(b)(1) <D>andSection; 75.10-10(a)(1), 75.10-10(a)(5), 192.10-10(f) </D><D>20.1.1.1</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.201(b)(2)(i) <D>andSection; 75.15-10(c)(1), 75.27-5(g) </D><D>20.1.1.1</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.201(b)(2)(ii) <D>andSection; 75.10-10(b)(1), 75.10-10(c)(3), 75.15-10(c)(4), 192.10-10(f)</D><D>13.6, 20.1.1.2</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.201(c) <D>andSection; 75.10-10(a)(6), 75.10-15(a) </D><D>20.1.3</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.201(c)(1) <D>andSection; 75.10-10(a)(6) </D><D>20.1.2.1</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.201(c)(2)(i) <D>andSection; 75.10-10(a)(6), 75.15-10(c)(1), 75.27-5(g) </D><D>20.1.2.1</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.201(c)(2)(ii) <D>andSection; 75.10-10(a)(6), 75.10-10(b)(2), 75.15-10(c)(3), 75.15-10(c)(4)</D><D>13.6, 20.1.2.2 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.201(d) <D>andSection; 75.10-20(a) </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.201(d)(1) <D>andSection; 75.10-20(a) </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.201(d)(2) <D>andSection; 75.10-20(a), 75.15-10(c)(1), 75.15-10(c)(4), 75.27-5(g) </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.201(e)(1) <D>andSection; 75.10-20(a), 75.10-20(c) </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.201(e)(2) <D>andSection; 75.10-20(a), 75.10-20(c), 75.15-10(c)(1), 75.15-10(c)(4),75.27-5(g) </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.201(f) <D>andSection; 75.10-10(a)(8), 75.10-10(b)(4), 75.10-15(b), 75.10-15(c),75.10-20(a)(2), 75.10-20(a)(3), 75.10-20(a)(4), 75.10-25, 75.15-10(c)(3)</D><D>20.1.5. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.201(g) <D>andSection; 75.10-20(a)(3), 75.10-20(b) </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.201(h) <D>andSection; 75.10-20(a)(2), 75.10-20(a)(3), 75.10-20(b) </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.201(i) <D>andSection; 75.10-20(a)(2), 75.10-20(a)(3) </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.202(a) <D>andSection; 75.10-5(e)(1), 75.10-10(a)(3), 75.10-25(b)(2), 75.10-25(b)(3),192.10-5(e) </D><D>20.2.1.  </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.202(b) <D>andSection; 75.10-5(e)(1), 75.10-10(a)(3), 75.10-25(b)(1)(iii), 192.10-5(e)</D><D>20.2.2. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.202(c) <D>None </D><D>20.2.3 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.202(d) <D>andSection; 75.10-5(e)(2), 192.10-5(e) </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.203 <D>andSection; 75.27-5(f) </D><D>20.3. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.211 <D>andSection; 75.43-10(a) </D><D>21.1. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.212 <D>andSection; 75.40-10(b), 75.40-15(b) </D><D>21.2. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.213 <D>andSection; 75.40-30(a) </D><D>21.3.2. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.214 <D>andSection; 75.41-5 </D><D>21.4.2. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.217(a) <D>None </D><D>53.7. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.217(b) <D>andSection; 78.13-15(a) </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.220 <D>None </D><D>22. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.230(a) <D>andSection; 75.15-10(b)(4), 192.15-10(b)(4) </D><D>13.2. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.230(b) <D>andSection; 75.15-10(c)(8), 192.15-10(c)(3) </D><D>23, 38.6.1, 48.3. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.240 <D>None </D><D>24. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.245(a) <D>andSection; 75.15-10(a)(1), 192.15-10(a)(1) </D><D>38.4.2. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.245(b) <D>andSection; 75.15-10(b)(3), 75.27-5(f), 192.15-10(b)(3) </D><D>20.1.4. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.250 <D>andSection; 75.20-15(cc) </D><D>6.2.2. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.260 <D>None </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.261(a) <D>andSection; 33.01-5, 94.05-1, 192.05-1 </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.261(a)(1) <D>andSection; 94.10-5(a), 192.10-5(a) </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.261(a)(2) <D>andSection; 33.05-3(e), 33.10-15(a), 33.10-20(a), 94.10-5(a), 192.10-5(a)</D><D>30.2, 41, 44. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.261(a)(3) <D>andSection; 33.01-30(f), 94.10-5(b)(2), 192.10-5(b)(2) </D><D>30.2, 38, 38.2.1, 39. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.261(a)(4) <D>andSection; 33.01-30(d), 94.10-5(b)(1), 192.10-5(b)(1) </D><D>38.2.1. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.261(a)(5) <D>andSection; 33.01-30(e), 94.10-5(c), 192.10-5(c) </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.261(a)(6) <D>None </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.261(b)(1) <D>andSection; 33.05-3(a), 33.05-5(a), 33.05-15(a), 94.10-10(a), 94.10-10(d),94.10-15(a), 192.10-10(a), 192.10-15(a) </D><D>26.1.1.1. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.261(b)(2) <D>andSection; 33.05-3(f), 33.20-15(b), 94.10-10(e), 192.10-10(d) </D><D>13.6, 26.1.1.2. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.261(c) <D>None </D><D>26.1.2. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.261(d) <D>andSection; 33.05-3(g), 33.05-5(c), 33.05-15(c), 33.07-1, 33.07-10(b),94.10-10(b), 94.10-10(f), 94.10-15(b), 94.10-20(d), 94.10-55, 192.10-10(e),192.10-15(b), 192.10-55 </D><D>13.6, 26.1.3. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.261(e)(1) <D>andSection; 33.05-20(a), 33.05-25(a), 94.10-40(a), 94.10-45(a), 94.10-45(b),192.10-40(a) </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.261(e)(2) <D>andSection; 33.05-20(c), 94.10-40(a), 94.10-45(a), 94.10-45(b), 192.10-40(a)</D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.261(f) <D>andSection; 33.05-20(d), 33.05-25(d), 33.07-1, 33.07-10(b), 94.10-40(b),94.10-45(d), 94.10-55, 192.10-40(b), 192.10-55 </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.261(g) <D>andSection; 33.05-25(a), 94.10-40(a), 192.10-40(a) </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.261(h) <D>andSection; 33.05-3(f), 94.10-10(e), 94.10-15(c), 192.10-10(d) </D><D>26.1.4. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.261(i) <D>andSection; 75.10-10(a)(7), 94.10-20(b)(5)</D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.261(j) <D>andSection; 94.10-40(a) </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.262(a) <D>andSection; 33.01-30(a), 33.07-10(c), 94.10-5(e)(1), 94.10-55(b)(1)(iii),94.10-55(b)(2)(i), 94.10-55(b)(3)(i), 192.10-5(e)(1), 192.10-55(b)(1)(iii),192.10-55(b)(2)(i), 192.10-55(b)(3)(i)</D><D>26.2. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.262(b) <D>andSection; 33.01-30(a), andSection; 33.07-10(c), 94.10-5(e)(1), 94.10-20(b)(1),94.10-20(b)(2), 94.10-20(b)(3), 94.10-20(b)(4), 94.10-45(c), 94.10-55(b)(1)(iii),94.10-55(b)(2)(i), 94.10-55(b)(3)(i),192.10-5(e)(1), 192.10-55(b)(1)(iii),192.10-55(b)(2)(i), 192.10-55(b)(3)(i) </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.262(c) <D>andSection; 33.01-30(a), 33.07-10(c), 94.10-5(e)(1), 94.10-45(c), 94.10-55(b)(1)(iii),94.10-55(b)(2)(i), 94.10-55(b)(3)(i), 192.10-5(e)(1), 192.10-55(b)(1)(iii),192.10-55(b)(2)(i), 192.10-55(b)(3)(i)</D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.262(d) <D>andSection; 33.01-30(a), 33.07-10(c), 94.10-5(e)(2), 94.10-45(c), 94.10-55(b)(1)(iii),94.l0-55(b)(2)(i), 94.10-55(b)(3)(i), 192.10-5(e)(2), 192.10-55(b)(1)(iii),192.10-55(b)(2)(i), 192.10-55(b)(3)(i)</D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.262(e) <D>andSection; 94.10-55(b)(1)(iv) </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.262(f) <D>None </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.271(a) <D>andSection; 33.40-5(a), 94.43-lC(a), 192.43-10(a)</D><D>27.1.1. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.271(b) <D>andSection; 33.40-10 </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.271(c) <D>andSection; 94.43-10(a), 192.43-10(a)</D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.272 <D>andSection; 33.35-5, 94.40-15(a), 192.40-15(a)</D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.273(a) <D>andSection; 33.37-1, 94.41-1, 192.41-1</D><D>27.3.2.3, 27.3.3.3. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.273(b) <D>andSection; 33.37-5(a), 94.41-5(a), 97.85-10, 192.41-5(a), 196.90-10</D><D>27.3.2, 27.3.3. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.273(c) <D>andSection; 33.37-5(b), 94.41-5(b), 192.41-5(b)</D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.273(d) <D>None </D><D>27.3.4. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.280(a) <D>None </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.280(b) <D>None </D><D>28.1. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.280(c) <D>None </D><D>28.1. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.280(d) <D>andSection; 33.20-15(a), 94.15-l0(b)(3), 192.15-10(b)(3)</D><D>38.4.3, 41.3.2, 48.1.11. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.280(e) <D>andSection; 33.20-15(a), 94.15-l0(a)(1), 192.15-10(a)(1)</D><D>26.1.5. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.290(a) <D>andSection; 33.05-3(c)(2), 94.15-10(b)(4), 192.15-10(b)(4)</D><D>13.2. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.290(b) <D>andSection; 33.20-15(d), 94.15-l0(c)(3), 94.15-10(c)(4), 192.15-10(c)(3)</D><D>29, 38.6.1, 48.3. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.300 <D>None </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.310(a) <D>andSection; 33.0l-5, 33.01-30(b)</D><D>26.1.6. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.310(b) <D>None </D><D>26.1.7. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.310(c) <D>andSection; 33.07-1, 33.07-10(a)</D><D>26.1.3. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.310(d) <D>None </D><D>13.1.5. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.320 <D>andSection; 154.1445 </D><D>48.1.2. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.400 <D>None </D><D>(IMO Res. A.534(13)). </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.405 <D>None </D><D>(IMO Res. A.534(13)). </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.410 <D>None </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.500 <D>None </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.505 <D>andSection; 167.35 </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.600 <D>None </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.605(a) <D>andSection; 108.50(b), l08.503(c), I08.505(b)</D><D>(IMO Res. A.414(XI)-10.1). </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.605(b) <D>andSection; 108.503(a), 108.505(a), 108.505(c), 108.511(b)</D><D>(IMO Res. A.414(XI)-10.1). </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.605(c) <D>andSection; 108.503(a), 108.505(a) </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.610 <D>None </D><D>(IMO Res. A.414(XI)-10.2). </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.630(a) <D>andSection; 108.515(a) </D><D>(IMO Res. A.414(XI)-10.4). </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.630(b) <D>andSection; 108.515(d)(2) </D><D>(IMO Res. A.414(XI)-10.4). </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.640 <D>andSection; 108.513(a), 108.513(b), 108.513(c)</D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.645 <D>None </D><D>(IMO Res. A.414(XI)-10.6). </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.650(a) <D>None </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.650(b) <D>None </D><D>(IMO Res. A.414(XI)-10.5.2). </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.650(c) <D>andSection; 108.511(e) </D><D>(IMO Res. A.414(XI)-10.5.2). </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.650(d) <D>l08.506(a), 108.506(b), 108.511(d)</D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.650(e) <D>None </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.650(f) <D>None </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.650(g) <D>andSection; 108.525(c), 108.525(d), 108.525(e) </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 199.650(h) <D>andSection; 108.527 </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 30.05-1 <D>None </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 30.35-1 <D>None </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 31.01-1(a) <D>andSection; 31.01-1(a) </D><D>Chap. I, Reg. 8.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 31.01-5(c) <D>andSection; 33.01-1 </D><D>Chap. I, Reg. 8.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 31.01-5(c)(1) <D>andSection; 33.01-27, 33.10-5(f) </D><D>(IMO Res. A.521(13)-2/5.3.1, 6.1.2, 6.1.3, 6.1.4, 6.2.1, 6.2.2, 6.2.4).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 31.01-5(c)(2) <D>None </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 31.01-5(c)(3) <D>None </D><D>(IMO Res. A.521(13)-2/5.3.2).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 31.01-5(c)(4) <D>None </D><D>(IMO Res. A.521(13)-2/6.2.3).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 31.01-5(c)(5) <D>None </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 31.01-5(c)(6) <D>andSection; 31.01-5(a) </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 31.01-5(c)(7) <D>None </D><D>(IMO Res. A.521(13)-2/3.1).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 31.05-1(a) <D>andSection; 31.05-1(a) </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 31.10-15(d) <D>andSection; 33.01-1 </D><D>Chap. I, Reg. 8.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 31.10-15(d)(1) <D>andSection; 33.25-20(c) </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 31.10-15(d)(2) <D>andSection; 33.01-27 </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 31.10-15(d)(3) <D>andSection; 33.01-27 </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 31.10-15(d)(4) <D>andSection; 31.10-15(b) </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 31.10-15(d)(5) <D>andSection; 31.10-15(b) </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 31.10-15(d)(6) <D>andSection; 31.10-15(b) </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 31.10-15(d)(7) <D>andSection; 31.10-15(b) </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 31.10-15(d)(8) <D>andSection; 31.10-15(b) </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 31.10-15(d)(9) <D>andSection; 31.10-15(b) </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 31.10-15(d)(10) <D>andSection; 31.10-15(b) </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 31.10-15(d)(11) <D>andSection; 33.35-10, 33.37-10 </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 31.10-15(d)(12) <D>andSection; 31.10-15(b) </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 31.10-15(d)(13) <D>andSection; 31.10-15(b) </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 31.10-15(d)(14) <D>andSection; 31.10-15(b) </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 31.10-15(d)(15) <D>andSection; 33.40-1(c)(2), 33.45-1, 33.45-5, 33.55-1(d) </D><D>30.3</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 31.10-15(d)(16) <D>andSection; 35.10-5(h) </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.07-10(b) <D>andSection; 35.07-10(b) </D><D>18.5.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.10-1(a) <D>None </D><D>18.2, 51.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.10-1(b) <D>andSection; 35.10-5(d), 35.10-5(e) </D><D>18.3.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.10-1(c) <D>andSection; 35.10-6 </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.10-1(d) <D>None </D><D>18.4.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.10-1(e) <D>andSection; 35.10-5(f) </D><D>18.5.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.10-2 <D>andSection; 35.10-5(d), 35.10-5(e) </D><D>18.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.10-3 <D>andSection; 35.10-1(c) </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.10-4 <D>andSection; 35.10-3 </D><D>None..</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.10-5 <D>andSection; 35.10-5(a), 35.10-5(b), 35.10-5(c) </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.11-1 <D>None </D><D>3.1.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.11-5 <D>andSection; 33.30 </D><D>10.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.40-19 <D>andSection; 35.40-40(a) </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.40-40(a) <D>andSection; 33.25-5(a), 33.25-5(b), 35.40-40 </D><D>41.9.2.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.40-40(b) <D>andSection; 33.25-5(b) </D><D>41.9.1.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.40-40(c) <D>andSection; 33.25-5(a), 33.25-5(b) </D><D>41.9.3.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.40-40(d) <D>None </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.40-40(e) <D>None </D><D>1.6, 30.1.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.40-43 <D>andSection; 33.25-10(a), 35.40-40 </D><D>40.7.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.40-45 <D>andSection; 33.25-10(b) </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.40-48 <D>andSection; 35.40-40 </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.40-50(a) <D>andSection; 35.40-40(a) </D><D>7.1.4.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.40-50(b) <D>None </D><D>7.2.2.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.40-50(c) <D>andSection; 35.40-40(b) </D><D>7.1.4.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.40-50(d) <D>andSection; 33.40-15(a) </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.40-50(e) <D>andSection; 33.35-25 </D><D>1.6, 30.2.7.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.40-50(f) <D>None </D><D>1.6, 30.1.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.40-55 <D>andSection; 35.40-40(a) </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.90-20 <D>andSection; 33.01-15, 33.15-1(c), 33.20-10, 33.25-20 </D><D>19.2.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.90-30(a) <D>None </D><D>19.3.1.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.90-30(b) <D>None </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.90-30(c) <D>None </D><D>19.1.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.90-30(d) <D>None </D><D>19.3.2.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.90-30(e) <D>andSection; 33.25-15(b) </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.90-30(f) <D>andSection; 33.01-20 </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.90-30(g) <D>andSection; 33.01-20 </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.90-30(h) <D>andSection; 33.01-20 </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.90-40 <D>andSection; 33.25-20(d) </D><D>19.4.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.90-50 <D>None </D><D>19.5.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.90-60(a) <D>andSection; 35.10-5(d) </D><D>19.6.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.90-60(b) <D>andSection; 35.10-5(e)(3) </D><D>19.6.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.90-60(c) <D>None </D><D>19.6.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.90-60(d) <D>andSection; 35.10-20(a) </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.90-60(e) <D>andSection; 35.10-20(b) </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.90-70(a) <D>andSection; 35.10-5(d) </D><D>19.7.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.90-70(b) <D>andSection; 35.10-25(a) </D><D>19.7.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.90-73 <D>andSection; 35.10-7 </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.90-75(a) <D>andSection; 33.25-15(a) </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.90-75(b) <D>andSection; 33.25-15(c) </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.90-75(c) <D>andSection; 33.15-10(ff), 33.15-10(gg), 33.15-10(hh), 33.15-10(jj), 33.15-20(i),33.40-1(c)(2), 33.45-1, 33.45-5, 33.55-1(d), 35.10-30</D><D>30.3. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.90-75(d) <D>andSection; 35.10-25(b), 35.10-30(b) </D><D>30.3.  </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.90-75(e) <D>andSection; 33.15-10(j) </D><D>30.3. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.90-75(f) <D>None </D><D>19.2. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.90-80 <D>andSection; 33.25-15(d) </D><D>19.8. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 35.90-90 <D>andSection; 33.25-15(e) </D><D>19.9. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 70.03-1 <D>None </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 70.10-43 <D>andSection; 70.10-43 </D><D>3.16. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 70.27-1 <D>None </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 71.20-20(a)(1) <D>andSection; 71.20-20(a)(1), 75.35-5(a), 75.37-5(a), 192.35-5(a) </D><D>Chap. I, Reg. 7. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 71.20-20(a)(1)(i) <D>andSection; 75.35-5(b), 75.37-5(b), 75.37-5(c), 192.35-5(b). </D><D>(IMO Res. A.521(13)-2/5.3.1, 6.1.2, 6.1.3, 6.1.4, 6.2.1, 6.2.2, 6.2.4).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 71.20-20(a)(1)(ii) <D>None </D><D>(IMO Res. A.521(13)-2/5.3.2). </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 71.20-20(a)(1)(iii) <D>None </D><D>(IMO Res. A.521(13)-2/6.2.3). </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 71.20-20(a)(1)(iv) <D>None </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 71.20-20(a)(1)(v) <D>None </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 71.20-20(a)(1)(vi) <D>None </D><D> (IMO Res. A.521(13)-2/3.1). </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 71.25-15(a) <D>andSection; 71.25-15(a) </D><D>Chap. I, Reg. 7. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 71.25-15(a)(1) <D>andSection; 71.25-15(a)(1)</D><D>None . </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 71.25-15(a)(2) <D>andSection; 71.25-15(a)(5), 71.25-15(a)(7)</D><D>None . </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 71.25-15(a)(3) <D>andSection; 71.25-15(a)(2)</D><D>None . </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 71.25-15(a)(4) <D>andSection; 75.37-5(b)</D><D>None . </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 71.25-15(a)(5) <D>andSection; 71.25-15(a)(3), 71.25-15(b)</D><D>None . </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 71.25-15(a)(6) <D>andSection; 71.25-15(a)(4)</D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 71.25-15(a)(7) <D>None</D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 71.25-15(a)(8) <D>andSection; 71.25-15(a)(9)</D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 71.25-15(a)(9) <D>andSection; 71.25-15(a)(8), 75.20-15(hh), 75.20-15(ii), 75.20-15(jj),75.20-15(ll), 75.20-25(m), 75.20-25(n), 75.43-5(c)(2), 75.45-5(a), 75.90-5(d),75.90-10(a), 78.17-85(b), 78.17-90, 192.20-25(m), 192.20-25(n), 192.43-5(c)(2),192.45-5(a), 192.60-5(b), 192.60-10(b), 196.15-65(b), 196.15-70</D><D>30.3.  </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 71.25-15(a)(10) <D>None </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 78.13-1 <D>andSection; 78.13-10, 196.13-10 </D><D>None.  </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 78.14-1 <D>None </D><D>3.1. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 78.14-5 <D>andSection; 78.14, 196.14</D><D>10.  </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 78.17-50(a) <D>None </D><D>18.2, 51. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 78.17-50(b) <D>andSection; 78.17-50(a), 78.17-50(b), 78.17-50(c), 196.15-35(a), 196.15-35(b)</D><D>18.3, 25. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 78.17-50(c) <D>andSection; 78.17-52 </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 78.17-50(d) <D>None </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 78.17-50(e) <D>andSection; 78.13-20, 196.13-20</D><D>18.4. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 78.17-50(f) <D>andSection; 78.17-50(d), 196.15-35(c)</D><D>18.5. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 78.17-55 <D>andSection; 78.17-50(a), 78.17-50(b), 78.17-50(d)</D><D>18. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 78.37-5(a) <D>andSection; 78.37-5(a) </D><D>18.5. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 78.47-60(a) <D>andSection; 75.15-15, 78.47-60(a), 78.47-60(b), 192.15-15 </D><D>41.9.2. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 78.47-60(b) <D>andSection; 78.47-60(c) </D><D>41.9.1. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 78.47-60(c) <D>andSection; 78.47-60(c) </D><D>41.9.3. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 78.47-60(d) <D>andSection; 78.47-60(d) </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 78.47-60(e) <D>None </D><D>1.6, 30.1. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 78.47-62 <D>andSection; 75.15-15, 78.47-63(a), 78.47-63(b),</D><D>40.7.  </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 78.47-63 <D>andSection; 75.15-15, 78.47-63(c)</D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 78.47-64 <D>75.15-15, 78.47-63(a), 78.47-63(b)</D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 78.47-65(a) <D>andSection; 78.47-65 </D><D>7.1.4. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 78.47-65(b) <D>andSection; 78.47-50, 78.47-51</D><D>7.2.2. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 78.47-65(c) <D>andSection; 78.47-65 </D><D>7.1.4. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 78.47-65(d) <D>andSection; 75.43-15(a) </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 78.47-65(e) <D>andSection; 75.40-35, 192.40-25</D><D>1.6, 30.2.7. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 78.47-65(f) <D>None </D><D>1.6, 30.1. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 78.47-72 <D>andSection; 78.47-72 </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 78.95-20 <D>andSection; 75.15-5, 75.20-5(b), 75.45-20, 78.17-60(a), 192.15-5, 192.20-5(b),192.45-20, 196.15-45(a)</D><D>19.2. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 78.95-30 <D>None </D><D>19.3. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 78.95-40 <D>None </D><D>19.4. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 78.95-50 <D>None </D><D>19.5. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 78.95-60(a) <D>andSection; 78.17-50(b)(7) </D><D>19.6. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 78.95-60(b) <D>andSection; 78.17-60(b), 196.15-45(b)</D><D>19.6. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 78.95-60(c) <D>None </D><D>19.6. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 78.95-60(d) <D>andSection; 78.17-70(a), 196.15-50(a)</D><D>None.  </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 78.95-60(e) <D>andSection; 78.17-70(b), 196.15-50(b) </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 78.95-70(a) <D>None </D><D>19.7. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 78.95-70(b) <D>andSection; 78.17-85(a), 196.15-65(a) </D><D>19.7. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 78.95-73 <D>andSection; 78.17-55, 196.15-40 </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 78.95-75(a) <D>andSection; 78.17-60(c), 78.17-60(d), 78.17-60(e), 196.15-45(c), 196.15-45(d)</D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 78.95-75(b) <D>None </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 78.95-75(c) <D>andSection; 75.20-15(hh), 75.20-15(ii), 75.20-15(jj), 75.20-15(ll), 75.20-25(m),75.20-25(n), 75.43-5(c)(2), 75.45-5(a), 75.90-5(d), 75.90-10(a), 78.17-90(a),192.20-25(m), 192.20-25(n), 192.43-5(c)(2), 192.45-5(a), 192.60-5(b), 192.60-10(b),196.15-70(a) </D><D>30.3. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 78.95-75(d) <D>andSection; 78.17-85(b), 78.17-90(b), 196.15-65(b) </D><D>30.3. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 78.95-75(e) <D>andSection; 75.20-15(j) </D><D>30.3. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 78.95-75(f) <D>None </D><D>19.2. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 78.95-80 <D>andSection; 71.25-15(a)(6), 78.17-60(f), 196.15-45(f) </D><D>19.8. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 78.95-90 <D>andSection; 71.25-15(a)(9) </D><D>19.9. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 90.03-1 <D>None </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 90.27-1 <D>None </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 91.20-20(a)(1) <D>andSection; 91.20-20(a)(1), 94.35-5(a), 192.35-5(a) </D><D>Chap. I, Reg. 8. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 91.20-20(a)(1)(i) <D>andSection; 94.35-5(b), 192.35-5(b) </D><D>(IMO Res. A.521(13)-2/5.3.1, 6.1.2, 6.1.3, 6.1.4, 6.2.1, 6.2.2, 6.2.4).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 91.20-20(a)(1)(ii) <D>None </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 91.20-20(a)(1)(iii) <D>None </D><D>(IMO Res. A.521(13)-2/5.3.2). </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 91.20-20(a)(1)(iv) <D>None </D><D>(IMO Res. A.521(13)-2/6.2.3). </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 91.20-20(a)(1)(v) <D>None </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 91.20-20(a)(1)(vi) <D>None </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 91.20-20(a)(1)(vii) <D>None </D><D>(IMO Res. A.521(13)-2/3.1). </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 91.25-15(a) <D>andSection; 91.25-15, 189.25-15 </D><D>Chap. I, Reg. 8. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 91.25-15(a)(1) <D>andSection; 91.25-15(a)(1), 189.25-15(a)(1) </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 91.25-15(a)(2) <D>andSection; 91.25-15(a)(5), 189.25-15(a)(5) </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 91.25-15(a)(3) <D>andSection; 91.25-15(a)(2), 189.25-15(a)(2) </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 91.25-15(a)(4) <D>None </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 91.25-15(a)(5) <D>None </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 91.25-15(a)(6) <D>None </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 91.25-15(a)(7) <D>None </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 91.25-15(a)(8) <D>None </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 91.25-15(a)(9) <D>andSection; 91.25-15(a)(3), 91.25-15(b), 189.25-15(a)(3), 189.25-15(b)</D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 91.25-15(a)(10) <D>andSection; 91.25-15(a)(4), 189.25-15(a)(4) </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 91.25-15(a)(11) <D>andSection; 91.25-15(a)(6), 189.25-15(a)(6) </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 91.25-15(a)(12) <D>andSection; 91.25-15(a)(8), 189.25-15(a)(8) </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 91.25-15(a)(13) <D>andSection; 91.25-15(a)(7), 94.20-15(ff), 94.20-15(gg), 94.20-15(hh),94.20-15(jj), 94.20-25(m), 94.20-25(n), 94.43-5(c)(2), 94.45-5(a), 94.90-5,94.90-10, 94.45-5(a), 192.20-25(m), 192.20-25(n), 192.43-5(c)(2), 192.45-5(a),192.60-5(b), 192.60-10(b) </D><D>30.3. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 91.25-15(a)(14) <D>None </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 97.13-1 <D>andSection; 97.13-15, 196.13-15 </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 97.14-1 <D>None </D><D>3.1. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 97.14-5 <D>andSection; 97.14, 196.14 </D><D>10. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 97.15-35(a) <D>None </D><D>18.2, 51. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 97.15-35(b) <D>andSection; 97.15-35(a), 97.15-35(b), 196.15-35(a), 196.15-35(b) </D><D>18.3. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 97.15-35(c) <D>andSection; 97.15-37, 196.15-37 </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 97.15-35(d) <D>andSection; 97.13-20, 196.13-20 </D><D>18.4. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 97.15-35(e) <D>andSection; 97.15-35(c), 196.15-35(c) </D><D>18.5. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 97.15-40 <D>andSection; 97.15-35(a), 97.15-35(b), 97.15-35(c) </D><D>18. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 97.35-5(a) <D>andSection; 97.35-5(a) </D><D>18.5. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 97.37-37(a) <D>andSection; 94.15-15, 97.37-37(a), 97.37-37(b), 192.15-15 </D><D>41.9.2. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 97.37-37(b) <D>andSection; 97.37-37(c) </D><D>41.9.1. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 97.37-37(c) <D>andSection; 97.37-37(c) </D><D>41.9.3. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 97.37-37(d) <D>andSection; 97.37-37(d) </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 97.37-37(e) <D>None </D><D>1.6, 30.1. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 97.37-39 <D>andSection; 94.15-15, 97.37-40(a), 97.37-40(b) </D><D>40.7. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 97.37-40 <D>andSection; 97.37-40(c) </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 97.37-42 <D>andSection; 94.15-15, 97.37-40(a), 97.37-40(b)</D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 97.37-43(a) <D>andSection; 97.37-43(a) </D><D>7.1.4. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 97.37-43(b) <D>andSection; 94.40-15(b) </D><D>7.2.2. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 97.37-43(c) <D>andSection; 97.37-43(b) </D><D>7.1.4. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 97.37-43(d) <D>andSection; 94.43-15(a) </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 97.37-43(e) <D>andSection; 94.40-25, 192.40-25</D><D>1.6, 30.2.7. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 97.37-43(f) <D>None </D><D>1.6, 30.1. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 97.37-55 <D>andSection; 97.37-55 </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 97.90-20 <D>andSection; 94.15-5, 94.20-5(b), 94.45-20, 97.15-45(a), 192.15-5, 192.20-5(b),192.45-20, 196.15-45(a) </D><D>19.2. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 97.90-30 <D>andSection; 97.15-45(e), 196.15-45(e)</D><D>19.3. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 97.90-40 <D>None </D><D>19.4. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 97.90-50 <D>None </D><D>19.5. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 97.90-60(a) <D>andSection; 97.15-35(b)(7), 196.15-35(b)(6)</D><D>19.6. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 97.90-60(b) <D>andSection; 97.15-45(b), 196.15-45(b)</D><D>19.6. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 97.90-60(c) <D>None </D><D>19.6. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 97.90-60(d) <D>andSection; 97.15-50(a), 196.15-50(a)</D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 97.90-60(e) <D>andSection; 97.15-50(b), 196.15-50(b)</D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 97.90-70(a) <D>andSection; 97.15-35(b)(9), 196.15-35(b)(8)</D><D>19.7. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 97.90-70(b) <D>andSection; 97.15-65(a), 196.15-65(a)</D><D>19.7. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 97.90-73 <D>andSection; 97.15-40, 196.15-40</D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 97.90-75(a) <D>andSection; 97.15-45(c), 97.15-45(d), 196.15-45(c), 196.15-45(d)</D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 97.90-75(b) <D>None </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 97.90-75(c) <D>andSection; 94.20-15(ff), 94.20-15(gg), 94.20-15(hh), 94.20-15(jj), 94.20-25(m),94.20-25(n), 94.43-5(c)(2), 94.45-5(a), 94.90-5, 94.90-10, 97.15-70(a),192.20-25(m), 192.20-25(n), 192.43-5(c)(2), 192.45-5(a), 192.60-5(b), 192.60-10(b),196.15-70(a)</D><D>30.3. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 97.90-75(d) <D>andSection; 97.15-65(b), 97.15-70(b), 196.15-65(b), 196.15-70(b)</D><D>30.3. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 97.90-75(e) <D>andSection; 94.20-15(j)</D><D>30.3. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 97.90-75(f) <D>None </D><D>19.2. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 97.90-80 <D>andSection; 91.25-15(a)(6), 97.15-45(f), 196.15-45(f)</D><D>19.8. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 97.90-90 <D>andSection; 91.25-15(a)(8) </D><D>19.9. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 107.115 <D>andSection; 107.115 </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 107.231(a) <D>andSection; 107.231(a) </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 107.231(b) <D>andSection; 107.231(b), 107.231(g), 107.231(i)</D><D>(IMO Res. A.414(XI)-1.6). </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 107.231(b)(1) <D>None </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 107.231(b)(2) <D>andSection; 107.231(h) </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 107.231(b)(3) <D>None </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 107.231(b)(4) <D>andSection; 109.225, 109.307(b), 109.317, 109.320(b)</D><D>30.3. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 107.231(e) <D>andSection; 107.231(e) </D><D>19.8.1. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 107.231(f) <D>andSection; 107.231(f) </D><D>19.9. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 107.231(g) <D>None </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 107.231(y) <D>andSection; 107.231(y), 107.231(z)</D><D>(IMO Res. A.414(XI)-1.6). </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 107.231(z) <D>None </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 107.239(a) <D>andSection; 107.239(a), 107.239(b), 107.239(d)</D><D>(IMO Res. A.414(XI)-1.6). </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 107.239(b) <D>andSection; 107.239(a) </D><D>(IMO Res. A.414(XI)-1.6). </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 107.239(c) <D>None </D><D>(IMO Res. A.414(XI)-1.6). </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 107.239(d) <D>None </D><D>(IMO Res. A.414(XI)-1.6). </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 107.239(e) <D>andSection; 107.239(c) </D><D>(IMO Res. A.414(XI)-1.6). </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 107.305(bb) <D>andSection; 107.305(bb) </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 107.305(cc) <D>andSection; 107.305(cc) </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 108.501 <D>None </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 108.645(a) <D>andSection; 108.645(a) </D><D>41.9.2. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 108.645(b) <D>andSection; 108.645(a) </D><D>41.9.1. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 108.645(c) <D>None </D><D>41.9.3. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 108.645(d) <D>None </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 108.645(e) <D>None </D><D>1.6, 30.1. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 108.646 <D>None </D><D>40.7. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 108.647 <D>andSection; 108.647 </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 108.649(a) <D>andSection; 108.649(a), 108.649(c)</D><D>7.1.4. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 108.649(b) <D>andSection; 108.649(b) </D><D>7.2.2. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 108.649(c) <D>andSection; 108.649(c) </D><D>7.1.4. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 108.649(d) <D>None </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 108.649(e) <D>andSection; 108.514(f) </D><D>1.6, 30.2.7. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 108.649(f) <D>None </D><D>1.6, 30.1. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 108.650 <D>None </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 109.207(c) <D>andSection; 109.320(c) </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 109.213 <D>andSection; 109.213 </D><D>18. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 109.215(a) <D>andSection; 108.503(g) </D><D>18.2, 51. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 109.215(b) <D>andSection; 109.215, 109.215(a), 109.215(b), 109.215(c), 109.217(a) </D><D>18.3.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 109.215(c) <D>andSection; 109.215(e) </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 109.215(d) <D>andSection; 109.215(d), 109.505(e) </D><D>18.4.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 109.301 <D>andSection; 109.217(b), 109.301, 109.305, 109.341(a) </D><D>19.2.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 109.303 <D>andSection; 108.503(g), 109.425 </D><D>19.3.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 109.305 <D>None </D><D>19.4.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 109.307 <D>None </D><D>19.5.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 109.309 <D>andSection; 109.217(c), 109.217(f), 109.217(g) </D><D>19.6.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 109.311(a) <D>None </D><D>19.7.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 109.311(b) <D>andSection; 109.208 </D><D>19.7.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 109.313 <D>andSection; 109.221 </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 109.315(a) <D>andSection; 109.217(d), 109.217(e) </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 109.315(b) <D>None </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 109.315(c) <D>andSection; 109.225(a), 109.317, 109.320(b) </D><D>30.3.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 109.315(d) <D>andSection; 109.225(b), 109.307(b) </D><D>30.3.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 109.315(e) <D>None </D><D>30.3.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 109.315(f) <D>None </D><D>19.2.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 109.317 <D>andSection; 109.219 </D><D>19.8.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 109.319 <D>andSection; 107.231(f) </D><D>19.9.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 109.323 <D>andSection; 109.323, 109.325 </D><D>10.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 109.425 <D>andSection; 109.425 </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 109.433(d) <D>andSection; 109.433(d) </D><D>18.5.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 109.433(e) <D>andSection; 109.433(e) </D><D>18.5.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 109.503(c)(2) <D>andSection; 109.503(c)(2) </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 112.15-1(c) <D>andSection; 112.15-1(c) </D><D>11.5.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 112.15-1(g) <D>andSection; 33.20-1(c)(3), 75.50-10, 75.50-15, 94.50-10, 94.50-15, 112.15-1(g),192.50-10, 192.50-15 </D><D>11.4, 15.7.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 112.15-5(u) <D>None </D><D>15.9.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 160.040-6(a) <D>andSection; 160.040-6(a) </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 160.040-6(b) <D>andSection; 160.040-6(a) </D><D>30.3.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 160.040-6(c) <D>andSection; 160.040-6(a) </D><D>30.3.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 160.040-6(d) <D>andSection; 160.040-6(b) </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 160.040-6(e) <D>andSection; 160.040-6(b) </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 167.03-1 <D>None </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 167.35-1 <D>andSection; 167.35-1 </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 167.65-2 <D>andSection; 167.65-1(c), 167.65-1(d) </D><D>18.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 168.05-5 <D>andSection; 168.05-5 </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 188.03-1 <D>None </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 188.27-1 <D>None </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 189.20-20(a)(1) <D>andSection; 189.20-20(a)(1) </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 196.15-40 <D>andSection; 196.15-35(a), 196.15-35(b), 196.15-35(c) </D><D>18.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 196.35-5(a) <D>andSection; 196.35-5(a) </D><D>18.5.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 196.37-37(a) <D>andSection; 196.37-37(a), 196.37-37(b) </D><D>41.9.2.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 196.37-37(b) <D>andSection; 196.37-37(c) </D><D>41.9.1.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 196.37-37(c) <D>andSection; 196.37-37(c) </D><D>41.9.3.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 196.37-37(d) <D>andSection; 196.37-37(d) </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 196.37-37(e) <D>None </D><D>1.6, 30.1.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 196.37-39 <D>andSection; 196.37-40(a), 196.37-40(b) </D><D>40.7.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 196.37-40 <D>andSection; 196.37-40(c) </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 196.37-42 <D>andSection; 196.37-40(a), 196.37-40(b) </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 196.37-43(a) <D>andSection; 196.37-43(a) </D><D>7.1.4.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 196.37-43(b) <D>None </D><D>7.2.2.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 196.37-43(c) <D>andSection; 196.37-43(b) </D><D>7.1.4.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 196.37-43(d) <D>andSection; 192.43-15(a) </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 196.37-43(e) <D>andSection; 194.40-25 </D><D>1.6, 30.2.7.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 196.37-43(f) <D>None </D><D>1.6, 30.1.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 196.37-49 <D>andSection; 196.37-49 </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">(None required) <D>None </D><D>1.4.4, 1.4.5, 2.2, 4.6, 21.4.3, 27.3.1, 27.3.2.1, 27.3.2.2, 27.3.3.1,27.3.3.2, 27.3.5, 43.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">(No change) <D>andSection; 2.75 </D><D>4.4.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>andSection; 30.01-6(d), 70.05-10(d), 90.05-10(d), 188.05-10(d) </D><D>2.1.</D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>andSection; 111.75-16 </D><D>11.4, 15.7.</D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>andSection; 112.15-1(c) </D><D>11.5.</D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>andSection; 33.40-1, 161.010 </D><D>27.1.2.</D><ITAG tagnum="1">(Separate NPRM) <D>andSection; 113.25 </D><D>6.4.2.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>andSection; 113.30 </D><D>6.4.1.</D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>andSection; 113.50 </D><D>6.4.2, 50.</D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>andSection; 160 </D><D>4.1, 4.2, 4.5, 5, 30.2, 51, 52.</D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>andSection; 160.002 </D><D>32.</D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>andSection; 160.005 </D><D>32.</D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>andSection; 160.015 </D><D>48.</D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>andSection; 160.017 </D><D>48.7.</D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>andSection; 160.018 </D><D>38, 40.</D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>andSection; 160.022 </D><D>37.</D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>andSection; 160.032 </D><D>48.</D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>andSection; 160.033 </D><D>41.7.6.</D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>andSection; 160.035 </D><D>41, 42, 44, 45, 46.</D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>andSection; 160.036 </D><D>35.</D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>andSection; 160.040 </D><D>49.</D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>andSection; 160.050 </D><D>31.</D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>andSection; 160.051 </D><D>38, 40.</D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>andSection; 160.055 </D><D>32.</D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>andSection; 160.062 </D><D>38.6.3.</D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>(andSection; 160.063) </D><D>48.</D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>(andSection; 160.069) </D><D>47.</D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>(andSection; 160.070) </D><D>48.</D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>andSection; 160.071 </D><D>33.</D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>(andSection; 160.074) </D><D>34.</D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>(andSection; 160.078) </D><D>36.</D></ITAG>The existing regulations listed below are to be deleted. No new regulationsare proposed and there is no corresponding regulation in SOLAS 74/83.<ITAG tagnum="42">andSection; 33.01-25 </ITAG><P>33.01-30(a) </P><P>33.01-30(c) </P><P>33.01-30(e) </P><P>33.05-3(b) </P><P>33.05-3(d) </P><P>33.05-5(b) </P><P>33.05-15(b) </P><P>33.05-20(b) </P><P>33.05-25(b) </P><P>33.05-25(c) </P><P>33.05-25(e) </P><P>33.05-30 </P><P>33.05-35 </P><P>33.07-5 </P><P>33.07-10(d) </P><P>33.07-15 </P><P>33.07-20 </P><P>33.07-25 </P><P>33.10-1(e) </P><P>33.10-10(e) </P><P>33.10-10(f) </P><P>33.10-10(h) </P><P>33.15-10(p) </P><P>33.15-10(r) </P><P>33.15-10(u) </P><P>33.15-10(y) </P><P>33.15-10(aa) </P><P>33.15-20(e) </P><P>33.15-90 </P><P>33.20-1(b) </P><P>33.20-5 </P><P>33.25-5(d) </P><P>33.25-5(e) </P><P>33.25-20(e) </P><P>33.50 </P><P>33.55-10(c) </P><P>33.55-15 </P><P>35.10-5(g) </P><P>35.10-5(i) </P><P>75.05-10 </P><P>75.10-5(b)(2) </P><P>75.10-5(c) </P><P>75.10-5(d) </P><P>75.10-5(a)(3) </P><P>75.10-5(a)(4) </P><P>75.10-5(a)(5) </P><P>75.10-5(a)(6) </P><P>75.10-10(a)(2) </P><P>75.10-10(a)(4) </P><P>75.10-10(b)(3) </P><P>75.10-15(d) </P><P>75.10-20(a)(5) </P><P>75.15-10(b)(9) </P><P>75.15-10(c)(5) </P><P>75.15-10(c)(6) </P><P>75.15-10(c)(7) </P><P>75.15-10(d) </P><P>75.20-15(p) </P><P>75.20-15(r) </P><P>75.20-15(u) </P><P>75.20-15(y) </P><P>75.20-15(aa) </P><P>75.20-25(d) </P><P>75.20-25(h) </P><P>75.20-25(o) </P><P>75.20-30 </P><P>75.20-35 </P><P>75.25-5(e) </P><P>75.27-5(e) </P><P>75.30-10(c) </P><P>75.33-5(e) </P><P>75.33-10(e) </P><P>75.33-15 </P><P>75.35-1 </P><P>75.37-1 </P><P>75.45-25 </P><P>78.14-1 </P><P>78.17-40(a)(3) </P><P>78.17-50(e) </P><P>78.47-60(e) </P><P>78.47-60(f) </P><P>78.87-10 </P><P>94.01-1</P><P>94.05-10 </P><P>94.10-1(c) </P><P>94.10-1(d) </P><P>94.10-5(a)(3) </P><P>94.10-5(a)(4) </P><P>94.10-5(c) </P><P>94.10-5(d) </P><P>94.10-10(c) </P><P>94.10-20(a) </P><P>94.10-20(c) </P><P>94.10-25 </P><P>94.10-40(c) </P><P>94.10-50 </P><P>94.15-10(c)(1) </P><P>94.15-10(c)(2) </P><P>94.20-15(p) </P><P>94.20-15(r) </P><P>94.20-15(u) </P><P>94.20-15(y) </P><P>94.20-15(aa) </P><P>94.20-25(d) </P><P>94.20-25(h) </P><P>94.20-25(o) </P><P>94.25-5(e) </P><P>94.30-10(c) </P><P>94.33-5(e) </P><P>94.33-10(e) </P><P>94.33-15 </P><P>94.45-25 </P><P>94.45-90 </P><P>97.15-25(a)(3) </P><P>97.15-35(d) </P><P>97.37-37(e) </P><P>97.37-37(f) </P><P>108.501 </P><P>108.507(a)(1) </P><P>108.508(e) </P><P>108.645(b) </P><P>108.645(c) </P><P>167.35-2 </P><P>167.35-3 </P><P>167.35-5 </P><P>167.35-10 </P><P>167.35-15 </P><P>167.35-20 </P><P>167.35-25 </P><P>167.35-30 </P><P>167.35-35 </P><P>167.35-40 </P><P>167.35-45 </P><P>167.35-50 </P><P>167.35-60 </P><P>167.35-65 </P><P>167.35-70 </P><P>167.35-72 </P><P>167.35-75 </P><P>167.35-80 </P><P>167.35-85 </P><P>167.35-90 </P><P>167.55-5(j) </P><P>167.65-1 </P><P>167.65-50 </P><P>167.65-55 </P><P>189.25-15 </P><P>192.05-10 </P><P>192.10-5(a)(3) </P><P>192.10-5(a)(4) </P><P>192.10-5(c) </P><P>192.10-5(d) </P><P>192.10-10(c) </P><P>192.10-40(c) </P><P>192.15-10(c)(1) </P><P>192.15-10(c)(2) </P><P>192.20-15(p) </P><P>192.20-15(r) </P><P>192.20-15(u) </P><P>192.20-15(y) </P><P>192.20-15(aa) </P><P>192.20-25(d) </P><P>192.20-25(h) </P><P>192.20-25(o) </P><P>192.25-5(e) </P><P>192.30-10(c) </P><P>192.33-5(e) </P><P>192.33-10(e) </P><P>192.33-15 </P><P>192.45-25 </P><P>192.45-90 </P><P>196.15-25(a)(3) </P><P>196.15-35(d) </P><P>196.37-37(e) </P><P>196.37-37(f)</P><ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects </ITAG>46 CFR Part 30 Cargo vessels, Foreign relations, Hazardous materials transportation, Penalties,Reporting and recordkeeping requirements, Seamen. 46 CFR Part 31 Cargo vessels, Marine safety, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements.46 CFR Part 33 Cargo vessels, Marine safety, Occupational safety and health, Seamen. 46 CFR Part 35 Cargo vessels, Marine safety, Navigation (water), Occupational safety andhealth, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements, Seamen. 46 CFR Part 70 Marine safety, Passenger vessels, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements.46 CFR Part 71 Marine safety, Passenger vessels, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements.46 CFR Part 75 Marine safety, Passenger vessels. 46 CFR Part 78 Marine safety, Navigation (water), Passenger vessels, Penalties, Reportingand recordkeeping requirements. 46 CFR Part 90 Cargo vessels, Marine safety.  46 CFR Part 91 Cargo vessels, Marine safety, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements.46 CFR Part 94 Cargo vessels, Marine safety. 46 CFR Part 97 Cargo vessels, Marine safety, Navigation (water), Reporting and recordkeepingrequirements. 46 CFR Part 107 Marine safety, Oil and gas exploration, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements,Vessels. 46 CFR Part 108 Fire prevention, Marine safety, Occupational safety and health, Oil andgas exploration, Vessels. 46 CFR Part 109 Marine safety, Occupational safety and health, Oil and gas exploration,Reporting and recordkeeping requirements, Vessels. 46 CFR Part 112 Vessels. 46 CFR Part 154 Cargo vessels, Gases, Hazardous materials transportation, Marine safety,Reporting and recordkeeping requirements. 46 CFR Part 160 Marine safety, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements.46 CFR Part 161Fire prevention, Marine safety, Incorporation by reference, Reporting andrecordkeeping requirements.46 CFR Part 167 Fire prevention, Marine safety, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements,Schools, Seamen, Vessels. 46 CFR Part 168 Occupational safety and health, Schools, Seamen, Vessels. 46 CFR Part 188 Marine safety, Oceanographic research vessels. 46 CFR Part 189 Marine safety, Oceanographic research vessels, Reporting and recordkeepingrequirements. 46 CFR Part 192 Marine safety, Oceanographic research vessels. 46 CFR Part 196 Marine safety, Oceanographic research vessels, Reporting and recordkeepingrequirements. 46 CFR Part 199 Cargo vessels, Marine safety, Oil and gas exploration, Passenger vessels,Reporting and recordkeeping requirements, Vessels.In consideration of the foregoing, it is proposed that Chapter I, Title46, Code of Federal Regulations be amended as follows: 1. By adding Subchapter W to read as follows:  <ITAG tagnum="72">SUBCHAPTER W_LIFESAVING APPLIANCES AND ARRANGEMENTS </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 199_LIFESAVING SYSTEMS FOR CERTAIN INSPECTED VESSELS </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart A_General</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.5 Incorporation by reference. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.7 Transitional provisions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.10 Application. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.15 Requirements for vessels built before July 1, 1986. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.25 Additional requirements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.30 Definitions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.40 Equivalent and novel lifesaving appliances and arrangements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart B_Requirements for All Vessels </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.62 Survival craft portable two way radiotelephone equipment: ocean,short international voyage, coastwise, or Great Lakes services. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.64 Emergency Position Indicating Radiobeacons (EPIRB) and Searchand Rescue Transponders (SART). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.66 Portable radio apparatus for survival craft: internationalvoyage. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.68 Distress flares. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.70 Ring life buoys. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.72 Lifejackets. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.73 Rescue boat immersion suits: ocean, short international voyage,coastwise, or Great Lakes service. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.75 Lights for lifejackets and immersion suits: ocean, short internationalvoyage, coastwise, or Great Lakes service. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.76 Whistles for lifejackets and immersion suits: ocean or shortinternational voyage service. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.78 Stowage of lifejackets and immersion suits. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.80 Station bill (muster list) and emergency instructions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.90 Operating instructions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.110 Survival craft muster and embarkation arrangements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.120 Launching stations. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.130 Stowage of survival craft. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.133 Stowage of lifeboats. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.135 Stowage of liferafts and inflatable buoyant apparatus. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.137 Stowage of life floats and buoyant apparatus. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.140 Stowage of rescue boats. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.150 Survival craft launching and recovery arrangements: general.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.153 Survival craft launching and recovery arrangements using fallsand a winch. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.155 Survival craft launching and recovery arrangements: otherdevices. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.157 Lifeboat launching and recovery arrangements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.160 Rescue boat embarkation, launching and recovery arrangements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.170 Line-throwing appliance: ocean, short international voyage,or coastwise service. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.175 Survival craft and rescue boat equipment. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart C_Additional Requirements for Passenger Vessels </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.200 General. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.201 Survival craft. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.202 Rescue boats. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.203 Marshalling of liferafts. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.211 Ring life buoys. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.212 Lifejackets: ocean or short international voyage service.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.213 Lifejacket lights; ferries. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.214 Immersion suits and thermal protective aids; ocean, shortinternational voyage, coastwise, or Great Lakes service. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.217 Station bill (muster list.) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.220 Survival craft and rescue boat embarkation arrangements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.230 Stowage of survival craft. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.240 Muster stations. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.245 Survival craft embarkation and launching arrangements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.250 Fixed radio installation for lifeboats: international voyage.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart D_Additional Requirements for Cargo Vessels </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.260 General. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.261 Survival craft. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.262 Rescue boats. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.271 Ring life buoys. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.272 Lifejackets </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.273 Immersion suits: ocean, coastwise, or Great Lakes service.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.280 Survival craft embarkation and launching arrangements: ocean,coastwise, or Great Lakes service. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.290 Stowage of survival craft. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart E_Additional Requirements for Tank Vessels </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.300 General. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.310 Survival craft. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.320 Survival craft embarkation and launching arrangements: ocean,coastwise, or Great Lakes service. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart F_Additional Requirements for Special Purpose Ships </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.400 General </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.405 Lifesaving appliance requirements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.410 Rescue boats: special purpose ships operating on the continentalshelf of the United States. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart G_Additional Requirements for Nautical School Ships </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.500 General. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.505 Lifesaving appliance requirements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="76">Subpart H_Additional Requirements for Mobile Offshore Drilling Units</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.600 General </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.605 Survival craft. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.610 Rescue boats. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.630 Ring life buoys. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.640 Immersion suits. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.645 Station bill. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">199.650 Survival craft embarkation and launching arrangements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>46 U.S.C. 3306, 3703; 49 CFR 1.46.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart A_General </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.5</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Incorporation by reference. </ITAG>(a) Certain materials are incorporated by reference into this part withthe approval of the Director of the Federal Register in accordance with5 U.S.C. 552(a). To enforce any edition other than the one listed in paragraph(b) of this section, notice of change must be published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>and the material made available to the public.All approved material is on file at the Office of the Federal Register,1100 L Street, NW., Washington, DC, and at the U.S. Coast Guard, MerchantVessel Inspection Division (G-MVI), 2100 Second Street, SW., Washington,DC 20593--0001, and is available from the sources indicated in paragraph(b) of this section. (b) The material approved for incorporation by reference in this part,and the sections affected are: <ITAG tagnum="73">American Society for Testing and Materials </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="38">1916 Race St., Philadelphia, PA 19103 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="38">ASTM F1003, Standard Specification for Searchlights on Motor Lifeboats,1986. </ITAG>.....199.175 <ITAG tagnum="38">ASTM F1014, Standard Specification for Flashlights on Vessels, 1986.</ITAG>.....199.175 <ITAG tagnum="73">International Maritime Organization (IMO) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="38">Publications Section, 4 Albert Embankment, London SE1 7SR, England</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="38">Resolution A.181(VI), ``Instructions on Survival in Liferafts'', October28, 1969. </ITAG>.....199.175 <ITAG tagnum="38">Resolution A.216(VII), ``Instructions for Action in Survival Craft'',October 12, 1971. </ITAG>.....199.175  <ITAG tagnum="38">Resolution A.520(13), ``Code of Practice for the Evaluation, Testingand Acceptance of Prototype Novel Life-saving Appliances and Arrangements'',November 1983. </ITAG>.....199.40 <ITAG tagnum="38">Resolution A.603(15), ``Symbols Related to Life-saving Appliancesand Arrangements'', November 1987. </ITAG>.....199.90 <ITAG tagnum="38">Resolution A.604(15), ``Performance Standards for Survival Craft RadarTransponder for Use in Search and Rescue Operations'', November 1987. </ITAG>.....199.64<ITAG tagnum="38">Resolution A.605(15), ``Performance Standards for Survival Craft Two-wayVHF Radiotelephone Apparatus'', November 1987. </ITAG>.....199.62 <ITAG tagnum="38">1983 Amendments to the International Convention for the Safety ofLife at Sea, 1974 (SOLAS 74/83) </ITAG>.....199.7; 199.30; 199.68; 199.70;199.72; 199.75; 199.110; 199.135; 199.150; 199.153; 199.175; 199.201; 199.202;199.261; 199.262; 199.310; 199.605; 199.610 <ITAG tagnum="38">Resolution MSC.4(48), ``International Code for the Construction andEquipment of Ships carrying Dangerous Chemicals in Bulk'' (IBC Code), 1983.</ITAG>.....199.320 <ITAG tagnum="38">Resolution MSC.5(48), ``International Code for the Construction andEquipment of Ships carrying Liquefied Gases in Bulk'' (IGC Code), 1983.</ITAG>.....199.320 <ITAG tagnum="38">International Convention for the Prevention of Pollution from Ships,1973, as modified by the 1978 Protocol related thereto (MARPOL 73/78).</ITAG>.....199.320 <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.7</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Transitional provisions. </ITAG>This subchapter is based in part on Chapter III, ``Life-saving Appliancesand Arrangements'' of SOLAS 74/83. The Coast Guard approves some lifesavingappliances under subparts of Subchapter Q of this chapter that have notbeen revised to meet SOLAS 74/83. This subchapter requires those appliancesto meet both Subchapter Q and SOLAS 74/83. Where the requirements conflict,SOLAS 74/83 takes precedence. Until revisions to Subchapter Q are published,the Commandant (G-MVI) will provide guidance on the approval requirementsfor these appliances. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Application. </ITAG>(a) A nonself-propelled vessel without accommodations or work stationson board is not required to carry lifesaving appliances meeting this subchapter.This subchapter contains requirements for lifesaving appliances and arrangementson the following self-propelled vessels and nonself-propelled vessels withaccommodations or work stations: (1) Each tank vessel required to meet Subchapter D of this chapter. (2) Each cargo and miscellaneous vessel required to meet Subchapter I ofthis chapter. For the purposes of this subchapter, the term ``cargo vessel''also includes each miscellaneous vessel under Subchapter I. (3) Each mobile offshore drilling unit required to meet Subchapter I-Aof this chapter. (4) Each passenger vessel required to meet Subchapter H of this chapter.(5) Each offshore supply vessel required to meet Subchapter L of this chapter(proposed, 48 FR 6636). (6) Each nautical school ship required to meet Subchapter R of this chapter.(7) Each oceanographic research vessel required to meet Subchapter U ofthis chapter. (b) Each section of this subchapter applies to each vessel in each servicelisted in this paragraph unless otherwise stated in the section. Each vesselthat complies with the lifesaving requirements in a section of this subchapterfor a particular service is considered to meet the requirements for eachservice that follows it in the following list. The services are: (1) Ocean (including international voyage). (2) Short international voyage (passenger vessels only). (3) Coastwise. (4) Great Lakes. (5) Lakes, bays, and sounds. (6) Rivers. (c) For the purposes of this subchapter_ (1) ``similar stage of construction'' means the stage at which_ (i) construction identifiable with a specific vessel begins; and (ii) assembly of that vessel comprising at least 50 metric tons (55.1 U.S.tons) or 1% of the estimated mass of all structural material, whicheveris less, has been achieved; and (2) ``vessel constructed'' means ``vessel the keel of which is laid orwhich is at a similar stage of construction''. (d) For the purposes of this subchapter, a vessel converted to a passengervessel must be treated as a passenger vessel constructed on the date whenthe conversion begins. (e) Subject to andSection; 199.15, each vessel constructed before July 1,1986 must meet this subchapter except for_ (1) The number, type, and arrangement of lifeboats, lifeboat davits, winches,inflatable liferafts, liferaft launching equipment, rescue boats, lifefloats, and buoyant apparatus; (2) Two-way radiotelephone apparatus under andSection; 199.62; (3) Emergency Position Indicating Radio Beacons (EPIRB) and Search andRescue Transponders (SART) for survival craft under andSection; 199.64(b)and andSection; 199.175(c)(12); and (4) Immersion suits under andSection; 199.214 for a vessel required to meetSubpart C of this subchapter. (f) Each item of lifesaving equipment carried on board the vessel in additionto equipment of the type required under this part, must_ (1) Be approved by the Commandant (G-MVI); or (2) Be acceptable to the cognizant Officer in Charge of Marine Inspection(OCMI) for use on the vessel. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.15</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Requirements for vessels built before July 1, 1986. </ITAG>This section applies to each vessel built before July 1, 1986 that doesnot meet the applicable requirements in Subparts B through H of this subchapter.(a) The number, type, and arrangement of lifeboats, lifeboat davits, winches,inflatable liferafts, liferaft launching equipment, rescue boats, lifefloats, and buoyant apparatus must be as required for the vessel on June30, 1986, as long as the arrangement or equipment is continued in use onthe vessel. (b) When any lifesaving appliance or arrangement on a vessel is replacedor a vessel undergoes repairs, alterations or modifications of a majorcharacter involving replacement of, or any addition to, the existing lifesavingappliances or arrangements, each new lifesaving appliance and arrangementmust meet this subchapter, unless the vessel can not accommodate the newappliance or arrangement.(1) A survival craft is not required to meet this subchapter if it is replacedwithout replacing its davit and winch. (2) A davit and its winch are not required to meet this subchapter if oneor both are replaced without replacing the survival craft. (c) On or before July 1, 1991, each vessel in ocean, short internationalvoyage, coastwise, or Great Lakes service, must have survival craft portabletwo-way radiotelephone apparatus meeting andSection; 199.62. (d) On or before July 1, 1991, each vessel of a type required to meet SubpartC of this subchapter in ocean, short international voyage, coastwise, orGreat Lakes service, must have immersion suits and thermal protective aidsmeeting andSection; 199.214. (e) On or before July 1, 1991, each vessel of a type required to meet SubpartD of this subchapter in ocean or coastwise service, must have liferaftsmeeting andSection; 199.261(b)(2), andSection; 199.261(h), and andSection; 199.290(b).(f) On or before July 1, 1991, each vessel equipped with a liferaft notserved by a launching appliance, and each vessel equipped with an inflatablebuoyant apparatus, must have rail or bulwark openings or mounting arrangementsmeeting andSection; 199.135(c). (g) On or before July 1, 1991, each set of lifeboat davits on a vesselof a type required to meet Subpart D of this subchapter in ocean, coastwise,or Great Lakes service, must be gravity type davits with a winch. For openlifeboats, boarding of the lifeboat in the stowed position is not required.(h) On or before July 1, 2001, each lifeboat on a vessel of a type requiredto meet Subpart D of this subchapter in ocean, coastwise, or Great Lakesservice, must be a totally enclosed lifeboat. (i) After July 1, 1991, each new lifeboat for a tank ship certificatedto carry crude, product, chemicals, or liquified gases; having a flashpointless than 60anddegrees; C (closed cup test), must not be of aluminum constructionin the hull or canopy. (j) On or before April 1, 1991, each mobile offshore drilling unit (MODU)required to meet Subpart H of this subchapter must either have_(1) Lifeboats and liferafts that meet andSection; 199.605(b); or (2) Totally enclosed fire-protected lifeboats of sufficient capacity toaccommodate 100% of the persons permitted on board, plus additional totallyenclosed lifeboats or davit-launched liferafts of sufficient capacity toaccommodate 100% of the persons permitted on board the unit. (i) An open lifeboat may be used instead of davit-launched liferafts aslong as it is in good working order. An open lifeboat requiring extensiverepairs must be replaced with either a totally enclosed fire-protectedlifeboat, or davit-launched liferafts. (ii) A submersible MODU constructed before January 3, 1979 may continueto use the lifesaving arrangements described on its Certificate of Inspectionin effect on [insert effective date]. (k) On or before July 1, 1991, each passenger ferry, and each other passengervessel on ocean, short international voyage, or coastwise service, musthave the number of lifeboats, liferafts, and inflatable buoyant apparatusmeeting andSection; 199.201. (l) On or before July 1, 1991, each lifeboat on a vessel must be propelled_(1) Either by motor or by a hand-propelling gear meeting Subpart 160.034of this chapter if the lifeboat has a capacity of at least 60 persons,but less than 100 persons; or (2) By motor if the lifeboat has a capacity of 100 persons or more. (m) A lifesaving appliance required under this section and in use on avessel before July 1, 1991 is not required to comply fully with this subchapteras long as it_(1) Is Coast Guard approved; (2) Meets the requirements for the vessel in effect before [insert effectivedate]; and (3) Is maintained in good and serviceable condition. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.25</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Additional requirements. </ITAG>The Officer in Charge, Marine Inspection (OCMI) may require a vessel tocarry specialized or additional lifesaving equipment if,_(a) the OCMI determines the conditions of the voyage render the requirementsof this subchapter inadequate; or (b) the vessel is operated in Arctic, Antarctic, or other severe conditionsnot covered under this subchapter. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.30</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions. </ITAG>Each term defined elsewhere in this chapter for a particular class of vesselapplies to this subchapter unless a different definition is given in thissection. ``Accommodation'' means a cabin or other covered or enclosed place intendedto carry persons. Each place where passengers are carried is consideredan accommodation, whether or not it is covered or enclosed. ``Embarkation station'' means the place where a survival craft is boarded.``Fleet angle'' for a wire rope leading to a winch drum means the angleincluded between an imaginary line from the lead sheave perpendicular tothe axis of the drum and the line formed by the wire rope when led fromthe lead sheave to either extremity of the drum. ``Float-free'' launching means that method of launching a lifesaving appliancewhereby the appliance is automatically released from a sinking vessel andis ready for use. In the case of an inflatable lifesaving appliance, inflationtakes place automatically. ``Free-fall'' launching means that method of launching a survival craftwhereby the craft with its complement of persons and equipment on boardis released and allowed to fall into the water without any restrainingapparatus. ``Immersion suit'' means a device approved by the Commandant (G-MVI) underSubpart 160.171 of this chapter. Except for a vessel on an internationalvoyage constructed on or after July 1, 1986,_ (a) An exposure suit approved under former Subpart 160.071 of this chapteris an immersion suit for the purposes of this subchapter, and (b) An unapproved suit in use on the vessel before November 1, 1980 isaccepted for use on that vessel in place of an immersion suit if_ (1) It is similar or identical to an approved suit; and (2) It is in serviceable condition. ``Inflatable'' appliance means one that depends upon non-rigid, gas filledchambers for buoyancy and that is normally kept uninflated until readyfor use. ``Inflated'' appliance means one that depends upon non-rigid, gas filledchambers for buoyancy and that is kept inflated and ready for use at alltimes. ``Launching appliance'' or ``launching arrangement'' means a device ordevices for safely transferring a survival craft or rescue boat from itsstowed position to the water. For a launching arrangement using a davit,the term includes the davit, winch and falls. ``Length'' means the load line length defined in andSection; 42.13-15(a)of this chapter. ``Lifejacket'', for the purposes of this subchapter, means a flotationdevice approved by the Commandant (G-MVI) as_ (a) A ``life preserver''; or (b) As meeting Regulations III/30.2 and III/32.1 of SOLAS 74/83. ``Marine escape slide'' means a device which includes an inflatable escapeslide and an inflatable boarding platform. The device allows survivorsto abandon the ship by sliding from the embarkation deck down to the boardingplatform floating on the water. Survival craft are then boarded from theboarding platform. Although it does not transfer a survival craft fromthe stowed position to the water, a marine escape slide is considered tobe a ``launching appliance'' for the purposes of this subchapter. ``Molded depth'' is defined in andSection; 42.13-15(e) of this chapter.``Muster station'' means the place where the crew and passengers assemblebefore boarding a survival craft.``Novel'' lifesaving appliance or arrangement means one that has new featuresnot fully covered by the provisions of this subchapter but providing anequal or higher standard of safety.``Retrieval'' means the safe recovery of survivors.``Seagoing condition'' means the operating condition of the vessel withthe personnel, equipment, fluids and ballast necessary for safe operationon the waters where the vessel operates. For bottom-bearing mobile offshoredrilling units, the term also applies in the bottom-bearing mode, but the``lightest seagoing condition'' is considered to be the highest anticipatedoperating condition.``Survival craft'' means a craft capable of sustaining the lives of personsin distress after abandoning the vessel on which they were carried. Theterm includes lifeboats, liferafts, buoyant apparatus, and life floats,but does not include rescue boats.``Toxic vapor or gas'' means a product for which emergency escape respiratoryprotection is required under subchapter 17 of the International Code forthe Construction and Equipment of Ships carrying Dangerous Chemicals inBulk (IBC Code), and in subchapter 19 of the International Code for theConstruction and Equipment of Ships carrying Liquefied Gases in Bulk (IGCCode).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.40</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Equivalent and novel lifesaving appliances and arrangements.</ITAG>(a) Where this subchapter requires a particular lifesaving appliance orarrangement, the Commandant (G-MVI) may accept any other appliance or arrangementthat is at least as effective as that specified. If necessary, the Commandant(G-MVI) may require engineering evaluations and tests to demonstrate theequivalence of the substitute appliance or arrangement.(b) The Commandant (G-MVI) may approve a novel lifesaving appliance orarrangement, if it has performance characteristics at least equivalentto the appliance or arrangement required under this subchapter, and_(1) Is evaluated and tested under IMO Resolution A.520(13), ``Code of Practicefor the Evaluation, Testing and Acceptance of Prototype Novel Life-savingAppliances and Arrangements''; or(2) Has successfully undergone evaluation and tests that are substantiallyequivalent to those recommendations.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart B_Requirements for All Vessels</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.62</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Survival craft portable two-way radiotelephone equipment: ocean, shortinternational voyage, coastwise, or Great Lakes services.</ITAG>This section applies to each vessel in ocean, short international voyage,coastwise, or Great Lakes service, which is equipped with lifeboats, liferafts,or inflatable buoyant apparatus.(a) Each vessel must have survival craft portable two-way radiotelephoneequipment meeting the regulations of the Federal Communications Commissionat 47 CFR 80.271 and IMO Resolution A.605(15). Each radio must operateon 156.3 MHz (channel 6), and 156.8 MHz (channel 16).(b) A radio for each survival craft is not required; however, at leastthree such radios must be on each vessel.(c) Other transceivers used on board the vessel that are not incompatiblewith the appropriate requirements of the Federal Communications Commissionare acceptable to meet this requirement.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.64</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Emergency Position Indicating Radiobeacons (EPIRB) and Search andRescue Transponders (SART).</ITAG>(a)<T3> Ocean, short international voyage, coastwise, or Great Lakes services.</T3>Each vessel in ocean, short international voyage, coastwise, or Great Lakesservice, except as provided under paragraph (c), (d), or (e) of this section,must have on each side of the vessel, a Category 1, float-free, automaticallyactivated, 406 MHz Satellite Emergency Position Indicating Radio Beacon(EPIRB) meeting Federal Communications Commission (FCC) regulations at47 CFR 80.1061 (See 53 FR 37308 of September 26, 1988), stowed where it_(1) Is readily accessible for testing and use; and(2) Will not be obstructed when it floats free of the vessel.(b)<T3> Ocean, short international voyage, or coastwise services.</T3> (1)Unless each liferaft on the vessel is equipped with a Class S EPIRB, aCategory 2 Satellite EPIRB, or a Search and Rescue Transponder (SART),each vessel in ocean, short international voyage, or coastwise service,must have(i) Two Class S EPIRBs which meet the FCC regulations at 47 CFR 80.1059,(ii) Two Category 1 or Category 2 Satellite EPIRBs which meet FCC regulationsat 47 CFR 80.1061, or (See 53 FR 37308, of September 26, 1988)(iii) Two SARTs which meet the FCC regulations at 47 CFR 80.375(e) andIMO Resolution A.604(15).(2) Each EPIRB or SART must be installed_(i) In a weathertight enclosure;(ii) One on each side of the vessel;(iii) In a readily accessible location;(iv) If the vessel has two or more widely separated deckhouses, at separatedeckhouses; and(v) At or near a liferaft embarkation station.(3) The Category 1 Satellite EPIRBs required under paragraph (a) of thissection may be considered to meet the requirement in paragraph (b)(1) ofthis section, if their installation meets paragraphs (b)(2)(iii), (b)(2)(iv),and (b)(2)(v) of this section.(c)<T3> Alternative: nonself-propelled vessels.</T3> An EPIRB is not requiredon a nonself-propelled vessel if the vessel is normally_(1) under tow;(2) moored to or alongside a mobile offshore drilling unit or self-propelledvessel; or(3) moored to shore.(d)<T3> Alternative: Class A EPIRBs installed on or before [insert effectivedate].</T3> Until [insert date 6 years after effective date], a Coast Guardapproved Class A EPIRB may be used to meet the requirement for an EPIRBunder paragraph (a) of this section. Each Class A EPIRB carried under thisparagraph must have been installed on the vessel on or before [insert effectivedate]. Each Class A EPIRB replaced after [insert effective date] must bereplaced with an EPIRB meeting andSection; 199.64(a).(e)<T3> Alternative: Class C EPIRBs installed on Great Lakes vessels on orbefore [insert effective date].</T3> Until [insert date 6 years after effectivedate], two Class C EPIRBs may be used to meet the requirement for an EPIRBon vessels in Great Lakes service under paragraph (a) of this section.Each Class C EPIRB carried under this paragraph must have been installedon the vessel on or before [insert effective date]. Each Class C EPIRBreplaced after [insert effective date] must be replaced with an EPIRB meetingandSection; 199.64(a). Class C EPIRBs carried under this paragraph must beinstalled_(1) Each in a weathertight enclosure;(2) Each in a readily accessible location;(3) One on each side of the vessel;(4) If the vessel has two or more widely separated deckhouses, at separatedeckhouses; and(5) Each at or near a principal embarkation station.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.66</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Portable radio apparatus for survival craft: international voyage.</ITAG>Except as specified under paragraphs (a) and (b) of this section, eachvessel on an international voyage carrying a Class A EPIRB as an alternativeto a Category 1, 406 MHz Satellite EPIRB, must have a portable radio apparatusType Approved by the FCC. (a) The portable radio apparatus is not required if a fixed radio installationmeeting the regulations of the Federal Communications Commission is fittedin a lifeboat on each side of the vessel or in a stern-launched lifeboatunder andSection; 199.261(c). (b) The OCMI may exempt a vessel from the requirement to carry a portableradio apparatus on voyages of such duration that the apparatus is unnecessary.(c) The portable radio apparatus must be stowed_(1) in a protected and easily accessible position ready to be moved toany survival craft in an emergency; or (2) in the case of a vessel with lifeboats in widely separated positionsfore and aft, the portable radio apparatus must be stowed in the vicinityof the lifeboats farthest away from the vessel's main transmitter. (d) Each totally enclosed lifeboat on a vessel carrying a portable radioapparatus must be equipped with a collapsible rod antenna meeting the regulationsof the Federal Communications Commission at 47 CFR 80.265(e)(2). The boatmust also have mounting arrangements to hold the antenna in its operatingposition. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.68</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Distress flares. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Ocean, short international voyage, or coastwise service. </T3>Thisparagraph applies to each vessel in ocean, short international voyage,or coastwise service, except for vessels of less than 150 tons gross tonnageand not carrying passengers, persons in addition to the crew, or offshoreworkers. (1) Each vessel must carry not less than 12 rocket parachute flares approvedby the Commandant (G-MVI) as meeting Subpart 160.036 of this Chapter, RegulationIII/30.2 of SOLAS 74/83, and Regulation III/35 of SOLAS 74/83. (2) A vessel less than 150 tons gross tonnage that is not a passenger vessel,but carries passengers, persons in addition to the crew, or offshore workers,is not required to meet paragraph (a)(1) of this section if it carriessix hand red flare distress signals approved under Subpart 160.021 of thischapter, and six hand orange smoke distress signals approved under Subpart160.037 of this chapter. (b) <T3>Great Lakes service. </T3>Each vessel of 150 tons gross tonnage andover in Great Lakes service must carry not less than 12 hand red flaredistress signals approved under Subpart 160.021 of this chapter. (c) <T3>Exemption: vessels on short runs. </T3>Vessels operating on short runslimited to approximately 30 minutes away from the dock are not requiredto carry distress flares under this section. (d) <T3>Stowage. </T3>Each flare carried to meet this section must be stowedin one of the following: (1) A portable watertight container carried within the pilothouse or onthe navigating bridge. An acceptable watertight container is describedin andSection; 160.021-6 of this chapter. (2) A portable magazine chest secured above the freeboard deck, away fromheat, in the vicinity of the pilothouse or navigating bridge. An acceptablemagazine chest is described in Subpart 160.038 of this chapter. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.70</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Ring life buoys. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>Each vessel must have two or more ring life buoys. (1) Each ring life buoy on a vessel must_ (i) Be approved under Subpart 160.050 of this chapter; (ii) Be of the 800 mm (30 in.) size; (iii) Be readily accessible; (iv) Be stowed in a way that it can be rapidly cast loose; and (v) Not be permanently secured in any way. (2) At least one ring life buoy on each side of the vessel must be fittedwith a buoyant lifeline. The lifeline must_ (i) Be at least as long as twice the height where it is stowed above thewaterline in the lightest seagoing condition, or 30 m (100 ft.), whicheveris the greater; (ii) Be non-kinking; (iii) Have a diameter of not less than 8 mm (5/16 in.); (iv) Have a breaking strength of not less than 5 kN (1,124 lb.); and (v) Be of a dark color if synthetic, or of a type certified to be resistantto deterioration from ultraviolet light. (3) Not less than one-half of the total number of ring life buoys, butat least two, must each have a water light approved by the Commandant (G-MVI)as meeting Subpart 161.010 of this Chapter, Regulation III/30.2 of SOLAS74/83, and Regulation III/31.2 of SOLAS 74/83. The ring life buoys witha water light, including any with a self-activating smoke signal underparagraph (c) of this section_ (i) Must have a lanyard between 1 m (39 in.) and 2 m (78 in.) long securingthe water light to the ring life buoy; (ii) Must be equally distributed on both sides of the vessel; and (iii) Unless the vessel carries less than four ring life buoys, must notbe the ring life buoys with lifelines under paragraph (a)(2) of this section.(b) <T3>Self-propelled vessels: all services. </T3>On each self-propelled vessel,one or more ring life buoys must be readily available_ (1) On each side of the vessel; (2) As far as practicable, on each open deck extending to the side of thevessel; and (3) Near the stern. (c) <T3>Ocean or short international voyage service. </T3>On each vessel inocean or short international voyage service, not less than two of the ringlife buoys with water lights must each have a self-activating smoke signalapproved by the Commandant (G-MVI) as meeting Subpart 160.057 of this Chapter,Regulation III/30.2 of SOLAS 74/83, and Regulation III/31.3 of SOLAS 74/83.Each of these ring life buoys must be capable of quick release from thenavigating bridge. (d) <T3>Ocean, short international voyage, or coastwise service. </T3>Eachring life buoy on a vessel in ocean, short international voyage, or coastwiseservice must be orange. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.72</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Lifejackets. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>A lifejacket must be provided for each person permittedon board the vessel. Each lifejacket must be approved by the Commandant(G-MVI) as meeting Subpart 160.002, Subpart 160.005, or Subpart 160.055of this Chapter. On each vessel in ocean, short international voyage, orcoastwise service, each lifejacket must also be approved by the Commandantas meeting Regulations III/30.2 and III/32.1 of SOLAS 74/83. (1) In addition,_ (i) A number of child-size lifejackets equal to at least 10% of the numberof passengers permitted on board must be provided or such greater numberas necessary to provide a lifejacket for each person smaller than the lowersize limit of the adult lifejackets provided to meet this section; and(ii) The engineroom, pilothouse, bow lookout, and each work station andindustrial work site remotely located from the lifejackets carried underparagraph (a) of this section, must have enough lifejackets to equal thenumber of persons normally on watch in, or assigned to, the station atone time. (2) Where, due to the particular arrangements of the vessel, the lifejacketsunder paragraph (a)(1) of this section could become inaccessible, the OCMImay require an increase in the number of lifejackets to be carried, orsuitable alternative arrangements. (b) <T3>Services other than ocean or short international voyage. </T3>Notwithstandingthe requirements of paragraph (a) of this section, on a vessel not in oceanor short international voyage service_(1) A lifejacket is not required at a watch or work station for a personwhose cabin, stateroom, or berthing area (and the lifejackets stowed inthat location) is readily accessible to the watch or work station; and(2) Child-size lifejackets are not required if the vessel does not  carrypersons smaller than the lower size limit of the adult lifejackets. (c) <T3>Great Lakes service. </T3>Each vessel of 3000 tons gross tonnage andover in Great Lakes service, having forward berthing or working spaceswidely separated from messing or recreational spaces aft, must carry lifejacketsin addition to those required under paragraph (a) of this section, sufficientfor 50 percent of the number of persons permitted on board. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.73</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Rescue boat immersion suits: ocean, short international voyage, coastwise,or Great Lakes service. </ITAG>On each vessel with a rescue boat in ocean, short international voyage,coastwise, or Great Lakes service, an immersion suit of appropriate sizemust be provided for each person assigned to the rescue boat crew. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.75</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Lights for lifejackets and immersion suits: ocean, short internationalvoyage, coastwise, or Great Lakes service. </ITAG>(a) Each lifejacket and each immersion suit carried on a vessel engagedin ocean, short international voyage, coastwise, or Great Lakes service,must have a lifejacket light securely attached to the front shoulder areaof the lifejacket or immersion suit. The lifejacket light must be approvedby the Commandant (G-MVI) as meeting_ (1) For a vessel in ocean service, Subpart 161.012 of this Chapter, RegulationIII/30.2 of SOLAS 74/83, and Regulation III/32.3 of SOLAS 74/83; or (2) For a vessel in short international voyage, coastwise, or Great Lakesservice, Subpart 161.012 of this Chapter. (b) Until July 1, 1991, a lifejacket light on a vessel in ocean servicebuilt before July 1, 1986 is not required to be approved by the Commandant(G-MVI) as meeting Regulations III/30.2 and III/32.3 of SOLAS 74/83, ifthe light is approved under Subpart 161.012 of this chapter, and is ingood and serviceable condition. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.76</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Whistles for lifejackets and immersion suits: ocean or short internationalvoyage service. </ITAG>Each lifejacket and each immersion suit carried on a vessel engaged inocean or short international voyage service must have a whistle of theball type or multi-tone type, of corrosion-resistant construction, andin good working order. (a) The whistle must be attached to the lifejacket or immersion suit bya lanyard without hooks, snaps, clips, etc. The lanyard must be long enoughto permit the whistle to reach the mouth of the wearer. (b) If the lanyard allows the whistle to hang below the waist of the wearer,the whistle must be stowed in a pocket on the lifejacket or immersion suit,or be stowed with the lanyard coiled and stopped off. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.78</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Stowage of lifejackets and immersion suits. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>Unless otherwise stated in this section, lifejacketsand immersion suits must be distributed throughout the cabins, staterooms,berthings, and other places convenient for each person permitted on board.(1) Each stowage container for lifejackets or immersion suits must notbe capable of being locked. (2) Each lifejacket and immersion suit kept in a stowage container mustbe readily available. (3) Each lifejacket and immersion suit stowed overhead must be supportedin a manner that allows quick release for distribution. (4) If lifejackets or immersion suits are stowed more than 2.1 m (7 ft.)above the deck, a means for quick release must be provided and must becapable of operation by a person standing on the deck. (5) Each child size lifejacket and child size immersion suit must be stowedin a location which is appropriately marked and separated from adult sizedevices, so that child size devices are not mistaken for adult size devices.(b) <T3>Rescue boat immersion suits: ocean, short international voyage, coastwise,or Great Lakes service. </T3>The immersion suits required under andSection;199.73 must be stowed near the rescue boat, or in some other location readilyaccessible to the rescue boat crew. (c) <T3>Lifejackets for engineroom, pilothouse, bow lookout, and work stationsand industrial work sites. </T3>The additional lifejackets required underandSection; 199.72(a)(1)(ii) must be stowed in places readily accessibleto the locations specified in that section. (d) <T3>Great Lakes service. </T3>The lifejackets required under andSection;199.72(c) must be stowed in the vicinity of the muster or embarkation stations.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.80</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Station bill (muster list) and emergency instructions. </ITAG>This section applies to each passenger vessel and each other vessel 500tons gross tonnage and over. Clear instructions to be followed in the eventof an emergency must be provided for each person on board. (a) Identical station bills (muster lists) must be exhibited in conspicuousplaces throughout the vessel including the navigating bridge, engineroomand crew accommodation spaces. The station bill must be prepared and postedbefore the vessel begins its voyage. After the station bill has been prepared,if any change takes place that necessitates an alteration in the stationbill, the master must either revise the station bill or prepare a new one.Each station bill must_ (1) Give instructions for operating the general alarm system required underSubpart 113.25 of this chapter; (2) Identify the emergency signals; (3) Specify the action to be taken by crew and passengers when each signalis sounded; (4) Specify how the order to abandon the vessel will be given; (5) Specify the survival craft each person on board is assigned to; (6) Specify the officers that are assigned to make sure that lifesavingand fire fighting appliances are maintained in good condition and are readyfor immediate use; (7) Show the duties assigned to the different members of the crew including_(i) Persons in command and the chain of command; (ii) Closing of the watertight doors, fire doors, valves, scuppers, sidescuttles,skylights, portholes and other similar openings in the vessel's hull; (iii) The stopping of fans and ventilating systems; (iv) Equipping the survival craft and other lifesaving appliances; (v) Preparation and launching of survival craft; (vi) General preparations of other lifesaving appliances; (vii) Muster of passengers and other persons in addition to the crew; (viii) Use of communication equipment; (ix) Responsibility for the portable radio apparatus; (x) Manning of the rescue boats for rescuing persons overboard and otheremergencies requiring the use of the rescue boat; (xi) Manning of emergency squad assigned to deal with fires and other emergencies;(xii) Administration of first-aid; (xiii) Special duties assigned with respect to the use of fire-fightingequipment and installations; and (xiv) Such other duties as are necessary for the proper handling of thevessel in an emergency; (8) Show the duties assigned to members of the crew, generally from thesteward's department, in relation to passengers in case of emergency, including_(i) Warning the passengers; (ii) Seeing that passengers are suitably dressed and have donned theirlifejackets or immersion suits correctly; (iii) Assembling passengers at muster stations; (iv) Keeping order in the passageways and on the stairways and generallycontrolling the movements of the passengers; (v) Making sure that a supply of blankets is taken to the survival craft;(9) Specify substitutes for key persons if they are disabled, taking intoaccount that different emergencies require different actions; and (10) Be at least poster size [600 mm (24 in.) x 750 mm (30 in.)]. (b) Illustrations and instructions in English and any other appropriatelanguage must be posted in each passenger cabin and be conspicuously displayedat each muster station and other passenger spaces to inform passengersof_ (1) The fire and emergency signal; (2) The abandon-ship signal; (3) Their muster station; (4) The essential actions they must take in an emergency; (5) The location of lifejackets, including child size lifejackets; (6) Fully illustrated instructions on the method of donning lifejackets;(7) If immersion suits are provided for passengers, the location of theimmersion suits, including child size immersion suits; and (8) If immersion suits are provided for passengers, fully illustrated instructionson the method of donning immersion suits.(c) Each vessel equipped with inflatable liferafts must have the manufacturer'sapproved launching and inflating instruction placards posted in conspicuousplaces readily available to the crew and passengers. The number and locationof the placards must be accepted by the OCMI.(d) Each vessel equipped with immersion suits must have the manufacturer'sapproved donning and use instruction placards posted in conspicuous placesreadily available to the crew. The number and location of the placardsmust be accepted by the OCMI.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.90</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Operating instructions.</ITAG>Posters or signs must be on or in the vicinity of each survival craft andits launching controls and must_(a) Illustrate the purpose of controls;(b) Illustrate the procedures for operating the launching device;(c) Give relevant instructions or warnings;(d) Be easily seen under emergency lighting conditions; and(e) Use symbols in accordance with IMO recommendation A.603(15).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.110</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Survival craft muster and embarkation arrangements.</ITAG>(a) One or more muster stations must be close to each embarkation station.Each muster station must have sufficient space to accommodate all personsassigned to muster at that station. An embarkation station may serve asa muster station if there is sufficient space to accommodate all personsassigned to muster at that station.(b) Each muster station and embarkation station must be readily accessiblefrom accommodation and work areas.(c) Each muster station and embarkation station for a survival craft whichis boarded before it is launched, must be arranged to enable stretchercases to be placed in the survival craft.(d) Each embarkation station must be located where it is not necessaryto climb up more than three steps on stairs or a ladder, or climb overobstructions to_(1) Reach the embarkation station from the adjacent deck house; and(2) Board the survival craft from the embarkation station.(e) An embarkation ladder must be at each launching station or at eachtwo adjacent launching stations. Each embarkation ladder must be approvedby the Commandant (G-MVI) as meeting Subpart 160.017 of this Chapter, RegulationIII/30.2 of SOLAS 74/83, and Regulation III/48.7 of SOLAS 74/83.(1) Each ladder must extend in a single length, from the deck to the waterlinein the lightest seagoing condition under unfavorable conditions of trimand with the vessel listed up to 15anddegrees; either way.(2) Each ladder must be secured to the deck and stowed ready to be putover the side and used.(3) Handholds must be provided to allow safe passage between the deck andthe head of the ladder.(4) The OCMI may permit an embarkation ladder to be replaced by a deviceapproved by the Commandant (G-MVI) to provide safe and rapid access tosurvival craft in the water, provided that there is at least one embarkationladder on each side of the vessel.(5) The OCMI may permit other safe and effective means of embarkation fora liferaft required under andSection; 199.261(h).(6) An embarkation ladder is not required if_(i) The distance from the embarkation deck to the vessel's lightest operatingwaterline is less than 3 m (10 ft.); and(ii) The vessel is not in ocean or short international voyage service.(f) Means must be provided for bringing each davit-launched survival craftagainst the side of the vessel and holding it alongside to allow personsto be_(1) Safely embarked in the case of a survival craft intended to be boardedover the edge of the deck; and(2) Safely disembarked after a drill in the case of a survival craft notintended to be moved to the stowed position with a full complement of personson board.(g) Each davit-launched liferaft launching arrangement must have a meansto hold the liferaft in the embarkation position that_(1) Will hold the liferaft securely in high winds;(2) Can be rapidly engaged by hooks, clips, or a similar arrangement thatdoes not require lashing, tying, adjustment, or separate tools; and(3) Can be rapidly released for launching by one person from within theloaded liferaft in not more than two separate motions.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.120</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Launching stations.</ITAG>(a) Each launching station must be positioned to ensure safe launchingconsidering in particular clearance from_(1) The propeller; and(2) Steeply overhanging portions of the hull.(b) As far as possible, survival craft must be launched down the straightside of the vessel, except for survival craft for free-fall launching.(c) Each launching station in the forward part of the vessel must_(1) Be located aft of the collision bulkhead in a sheltered position; and(2) Have a launching appliance approved by the Commandant (G-MVI) as beingof sufficient strength for forward installation.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.130</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Stowage of survival craft.</ITAG>(a)<T3> General.</T3> Each survival craft required to have a launching appliance,must be stowed as close to accommodation and service spaces as possible.(1) Each survival craft must be stowed_(i) In a way that neither the survival craft nor its stowage arrangementswill interfere with the embarkation and operation of any other survivalcraft or rescue boat at any other launching station;(ii) As near the water surface as is safe and practicable, except as providedin paragraphs (a)(1)(iii) and (d) of this section;(iii) Where the survival craft in the embarkation position is above thewaterline with the vessel_(A) In the fully loaded condition;(B) Under unfavorable conditions of trim; and(C) Listed up to 20anddegrees; either way, or to the angle where the vessel'sweatherdeck edge becomes submerged, whichever is less;(iv) In a way that the crew can gain access to prepare the survival craftfor launching;(v) Sufficiently ready for use so that two crew members can complete preparationsfor embarkation and launching in less than 5 min;(vi) Fully equipped as required under this subchapter; and(vii) As far as practicable, in a secure and sheltered position and protectedfrom damage by fire and explosion.(2) With the exception of survival craft not over 185 kg (407.8 lb.), asurvival craft must not require lifting from its stowed position in orderto launch.(i) If lifting is required for a survival craft not over 185 kg, it mustnot be greater than 300 mm (1 ft.).(ii) The prohibition on lifting does not apply to a davit-launched liferaftlifted by a manually powered winch from its stowed position to its embarkationposition.(3) Each vessel operating in an area where icing is likely to be encountered,must provide each exposed winch mechanism with a fabric cover, or equivalent,so that ice may be readily broken away to operate the winch.(b)<T3> Stowage position: ocean, short international voyage, or coastwiseservice.</T3> Each vessel in ocean, short international voyage or coastwiseservice having widely separated accommodation and service spaces, musthave survival craft of each type required on the vessel as close as possibleto each such space to serve those persons normally in that space. The capacityand arrangement of the survival craft for each such space must be as ifeach space were a separate vessel.(c)<T3> Stowage position: Great Lakes; lakes, bays, and sounds; or river service.</T3>Each vessel in Great Lakes; lakes, bays, and sounds; or river service havingwidely separated accommodation and service spaces, must either have_(1) Survival craft arranged as required under paragraph (b) of this section,or(2) Survival craft stowed as close as possible to the accommodation andservice space that normally holds the greatest number of persons, withliferafts stowed as close as possible to each other accommodation and servicespace of sufficient capacity to accommodate 50% of the persons permittedon board.(d)<T3> Stowage and embarkation position: ocean, short international voyage,coastwise, or Great Lakes services.</T3> On each vessel in ocean, shortinternational voyage, coastwise, or Great Lakes services, each survivalcraft served by a launching appliance must be stowed in a position wherethe survival craft in the embarkation position is not less than 2 m (79in.) above the waterline under the conditions described under paragraph(a)(1)(iii) of this section.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.133</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Stowage of lifeboats.</ITAG>In addition to meeting andSection; 199.130, each lifeboat must be stowedas required under this section.(a) Each lifeboat for lowering down the side of the vessel must be stowedas far forward of the propeller as practicable. The vessel must be arrangedso each lifeboat, in its stowed position, is protected from damage by heavyseas.(b) Each lifeboat must be stowed attached to its launching appliance.(c) Means must be provided for recharging lifeboat batteries from the vessel'spower supply at a supply voltage not exceeding 55 V. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.135</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Stowage of liferafts and inflatable buoyant apparatus. </ITAG>In addition to meeting andSection; 199.130, each liferaft and inflatablebuoyant apparatus must be stowed as required under this section. (a) Each liferaft and inflatable buoyant apparatus must be stowed to permitmanual release from its securing arrangements, and to permit it to be droppedinto the water from the deck on which it is stowed. (b) Each liferaft and inflatable buoyant apparatus must be stowed at aheight above the waterline in the lightest seagoing condition not greaterthan the maximum stowage height indicated on the liferaft, or on the containerof an inflatable liferaft or inflatable buoyant apparatus. Each liferaftand inflatable buoyant apparatus without an indicated maximum stowage heightmust be stowed no more than 18 m (59 ft.) above the waterline in the lightestseagoing condition. (c) A gate or other suitable opening must be provided in the rail or bulwarkadjacent to the stowage location of each liferaft and inflatable buoyantapparatus, not served by a launching appliance. Alternatively, the liferaftor inflatable buoyant apparatus may be mounted on stanchions or a platformadjacent to the rail or bulwark to allow the liferaft or inflatable buoyantapparatus to be pushed directly overboard. (1) Each gate or opening must be large enough to allow the liferaft orinflatable buoyant apparatus to be pushed overboard. (2) If the liferaft or inflatable buoyant apparatus is intended to be availablefor use on either side of the vessel, a gate or opening must be providedon each side. (d) Each davit-launched liferaft must be stowed within reach of its liftinghook, unless some means of transfer is provided that is not rendered inoperable_(1) Within the limits of trim and list under andSection; 199.130(a)(1); (2) By vessel motion; or (3) By power failure. (e) Each rigid container for an inflatable liferaft to be launched by alaunching appliance must be secured in a way that the container or partsof it are prevented from falling into the sea during and after inflationand launching of the contained liferaft. (f) Each liferaft and inflatable buoyant apparatus arranged for float-freelaunching must use a hydrostatic release unit approved by the Commandant(G-MVI) as meeting Subpart 160.062 of this Chapter, Regulation III/30.2of SOLAS 74/83, and Regulation III/38.6.3 of SOLAS 74/83. The hydrostaticrelease unit must be arranged so that_ (1) The liferaft or inflatable buoyant apparatus, and its painter are securedto the vessel by the hydrostatic release unit; (2) When the liferaft or inflatable buoyant apparatus is manually released,the painter remains secured to the vessel through the hydrostatic releaseunit; and (3) When the hydrostatic release unit opens in the water under hydrostaticpressure, the painter remains secured to the vessel through its weak link.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.137</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Stowage of life floats and buoyant apparatus. </ITAG>In addition to meeting andSection; 199.130, each life float and buoyant apparatusmust be stowed as required under this section. Each life float and buoyantapparatus must be secured to the vessel by a painter and a float-free link.(a) The float-free link must be_ (1) Certified to meet Subpart 160.073 of this chapter; (2) Of proper strength for the size of the life float or buoyant apparatusas indicated on its identification tag; and (3) Secured to the painter at one end and to the vessel on the other end.(b) The means used to attach the float-free link to the vessel must_ (1) Have a breaking strength of at least the breaking strength of the painter;(2) If synthetic, be of a dark color or of a type certified to be resistantto deterioration from ultraviolet light; and (3) If metal, be corrosion resistant. (c) If the life float or buoyant apparatus does not have a painter attachmentfitting, a means for attaching the painter must be provided by a wire orline that_ (1) Encircles the body of the device; (2) Will not slip off; (3) Has a breaking strength that is at least the strength of the painter;and (4) If synthetic, is of a dark color or is of a type certified to be resistantto deterioration from ultraviolet light. (d) The float-free link described under paragraphs (a) and (b) of thissection is not required if the waters in which the vessel is certificatedto operate are not as deep as the length of the painter. (e) If the vessel carries more than one life float or buoyant apparatusin a group with each group secured by a single painter,_ (1) The combined weight of each group of life floats and buoyant apparatusmust not exceed 185 kg (407.8 lb.); (2) Each life float and buoyant apparatus must be individually attachedto the painter by a line meeting andSection; 199.175(d)(4) and long enoughthat each life float or buoyant apparatus can float without contactingany other life float or buoyant apparatus in the group; and (3) The strength of the float-free link under paragraph (a)(2) of thissection and the strength of the painter under andSection; 199.175(d)(4)(ii)must be determined by the combined capacity of the group of life floatsand buoyant apparatus. (f) Life floats and buoyant apparatus must not be secured to the vesselexcept by the painter and by lashings that can be easily released or bya hydrostatic release unit approved under Subpart 160.062 of this chapter.They must not be stowed in more than four tiers. When stowed in tiers,the separate units must be kept apart by spacers. (g) There must be means to prevent shifting. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.140</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Stowage of rescue boats. </ITAG>(a) Each rescue boat must be stowed_ (1) Ready for launching in not more than 5 min; (2) In a position suitable for launching and recovery; (3) In a way that neither the rescue boat nor its stowage arrangementswill interfere with the operation of any survival craft at any other launchingstation; and(4) If it is also a lifeboat, in compliance with andSection;andSection; 199.130and 199.133. (b) Means must be provided for recharging rescue boat batteries from thevessel's power supply at a supply voltage not exceeding 55 V. (c) Each inflated rescue boat must be kept fully inflated at all times.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.150</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Survival craft launching and recovery arrangements: general. </ITAG>(a) A launching appliance approved by the Commandant (G-MVI) as meetingRegulation III/30.2 of SOLAS 74/83, Regulation III/48.1 of SOLAS 74/83,and either Regulation III/48.2, III/48.4, III/48.5, or III/48.6 of SOLAS74/83, must be provided for each survival craft except that a launchingappliance is not required for the following: (1) A survival craft boarded from a position on deck less than 4.5 m (14ft., 9 in.) above the waterline in the lightest seagoing condition andthat either_ (i) has a mass of not more than 185 kg (407.8 lb.); or (ii) is stowed for launching directly from the stowed position under unfavorableconditions of trim of up to 10anddegrees; and with the vessel listed up to20anddegrees; either way. (2) A survival craft having a mass of not more than 185 kg (407.8 lb.)and carried in excess of the survival craft for 200% of the total numberof persons permitted on board the vessel. (b) Each launching appliance together with all its lowering and recoverygear must be arranged in a way that the fully equipped survival craft itserves can be safely lowered when loaded with its full complement of persons,and also without persons, against a trim of up to 10anddegrees; and_ (1) A list of up to 20anddegrees; on the high side; and (2) A list of up to 20anddegrees; or the degree of list where the survivalcraft becomes waterborne, whichever is the greater, on the low side. (c) A launching appliance must not depend on any means other than gravityor stored mechanical power independent of the vessel's power supplies tolaunch the survival craft it serves in the fully loaded and equipped conditionand also in the light condition. (d) The ultimate strength of each structural attachment to the vessel ofa davit, winch, or other launching appliance, must be at least 4.5 timesthe load imparted on the attachment by the launching appliance and itsfully loaded survival craft under the most adverse combination of listand trim under paragraph (b) of this section. (e) The same type of release mechanism must be used for each similar survivalcraft carried on board the vessel. For the purpose of this requirement,a release mechanism is of the same type as another release mechanism ifboth are operated in the same way. (f) Preparation and handling of survival craft at any one launching stationmust not interfere with the prompt preparation and handling of any othersurvival craft at any other station. (g) The arrangement of each launching appliance must enable safe, rapidboarding of the survival craft. (h) Each launching mechanism must be arranged so it may be actuated byone person from a position on the vessel's deck, and also from a positionwithin the survival craft. Each launching and recovery arrangement mustallow the operator on the deck to observe the survival craft at all timesduring launching. (i) Means must be provided outside the machinery space to prevent any dischargeof fluids onto survival craft during abandonment. Acceptable means include_(1) Baffles to deflect fluid down the vessel's side; (2) Reach rods or other means to close the discharge openings; or (3) Remote means for stopping the pumps. (j) If there is a danger of the survival craft being damaged by the vessel'sstabilizer wings, the stabilizer wings must be able to be brought inboardusing power from the emergency power system required under Part 112 ofthis chapter. Indicators operated by the emergency power system must beon the navigating bridge to show the position of the stabilizer wings.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.153</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Survival craft launching and recovery arrangements using falls anda winch. </ITAG>(a) Each launching appliance using falls and a winch must be approved bythe Commandant (G-MVI) as meeting Regulations III/30.2, III/48.1, and III/48.2of SOLAS 74/83; and either_ (1) For a lifeboat, Subparts 160.015 and 160.032 of this chapter; or (2) For a davit-launched liferaft, Subpart 160.063 of this chapter withan automatic disengaging apparatus meeting Subpart 160.070 of this chapter.(b) Each fall wire used in a launching appliance must be of rotation-resistant,corrosion-resistant, pre-lubricated steel wire rope. (1) For the purposes of this requirement, galvanized wire rope is consideredto be corrosion-resistant. (2) The breaking strength of each fall wire and each attachment used onthe fall must be at least six times the load imparted on the fall by thefully-loaded survival craft. (3) Each replacement fall wire must be the same as that approved for usewith the launching appliance. (c) Each fall must be in a single-part arrangement. (d) Each fall must be long enough for the survival craft to reach the waterwith the vessel in its lightest seagoing condition, under unfavorable conditionsof trim and with the vessel listed up to 20anddegrees; either way. (e) Each fall must be arranged to lead fair in each davit position. Fallsmust not lead past any operating position of the winch, such as hand cranks,pay-out wheels, and brake levers. (f) The lead sheave to each winch drum must be located to result in a maximumfleet angle of not more than 8anddegrees;. (g) Each winch drum must be arranged so the fall wire winds onto the drumin a level wrap. (1) The winch drum of a launching appliance must be of such size that therewill be no more than two layers of wire on the drum, provided that themaximum fleet angle is not more than 4anddegrees;. (2) Each winch drum of a launching appliance that has a maximum fleet angleof more than 4anddegrees; must be of such size that there will be no morethan one layer of wire on the drum. (h) Each fall, where exposed to damage or fouling, must have guards orequivalent protection. Each fall which leads along a deck must be coveredwith a guard which is not more than 300 mm (1 ft.) above the deck. (i) The lowering speed for a fully loaded survival craft must be not lessthan that obtained from the formula;<ITAG tagnum="26">S=0.4+(0.02 H);</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">where S is the speed of lowering in meters per second, and H is theheight in meters from davit head to the waterline at the lightest seagoingcondition. For the purposes of this calculation, H shall not be greaterthan 30, regardless of the lowering height. (In English units, the formulais S=79+(1.2 H), where S is in ft./min. and H is in ft., with H not greaterthan 99.) (j) The lowering speed for a survival craft loaded with all of its equipment,but only one person, must be not less than 70% of the speed required underparagraph (i) of this section. (k) The lowering speed for a fully loaded survival craft must be not morethan 1.3 m/sec. (256 ft./min.).(l) If a survival craft is recovered by electric power, the electricalinstallation must meet Part 111 of chapter, including the requirementsin Subpart 111.95 on electric power-operated boat winches. If a survivalcraft is recovered by any means of power, including a portable power source,a limit switch or equivalent safety device must be provided on each fallthat_ (1) Is located in either the power or control circuit; (2) Is connected in series which each other switch or equivalent deviceon the launching appliance; (3) Automatically cuts off all power in the circuit in which the switchor equivalent device is located before the survival craft reaches the fullystowed position; (4) Stops recovery of the survival craft under power at least 300 mm (12in.) from the final stowed position; and (5) Keeps power disconnected as the survival craft is manually broughtto the stowed position. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.155</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Survival craft launching and recovery arrangements: other devices</ITAG>Each marine escape slide must be capable of being deployed by one personat the embarkation station. Notwithstanding the requirements under andSection;199.150(h), a marine escape slide is not required to be actuated from aposition within the survival craft. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.157</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Lifeboat launching and recovery arrangements. </ITAG>(a) Each lifeboat must be capable of being launched with the vessel makingheadway of 5 knots in calm water. A painter may be used to meet this requirement.(b) Each lifeboat launching appliance must be capable of recovering thelifeboat with its crew. (c) Each launching and recovery arrangement must allow the operator onthe vessel to observe the lifeboat at all times during recovery.(d) For each open lifeboat and partially enclosed lifeboat, a davit spanmust be provided with not less than two lifelines of sufficient lengthto reach the water with the vessel in its lightest seagoing condition,under unfavorable conditions of trim and with the vessel listed up to 20anddegrees;either way. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.160</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Rescue boat embarkation, launching and recovery arrangements. </ITAG>Each rescue boat embarkation and launching arrangement must permit therescue boat to be boarded and launched in the shortest possible time. (a) If the rescue boat is one of the vessel's survival craft, the embarkationarrangements and launching station must meet andSection;andSection; 199.110and 199.120. (b) If a workboat or launch is used in place of a rescue boat, the stowage,embarkation, launching, and recovery arrangements must meet the requirementsof this section. (c) The rescue boat launching arrangements must meet the requirements forlifeboat launching arrangements in andSection; 199.150 and andSection; 199.157,and if the launching arrangement uses falls and a winch, andSection; 199.153.If the launching arrangement uses a single fall, the release mechanismmay be an automatic disengaging apparatus approved by the Commandant (G-MVI)as meeting Subpart 160.070 of this chapter, instead of a lifeboat releasemechanism. (d) Rapid recovery of the rescue boat must be possible when loaded withits full complement of persons and equipment. If the rescue boat is alsoa lifeboat, rapid recovery must be possible when loaded with its lifeboatequipment and an approved rescue boat complement of at least six persons.Each rescue boat launching appliance must be capable of hoisting the rescueboat when loaded with its full rescue boat complement of persons and equipmentat a rate of not less than 0.3 m/sec. (59 ft./min.). <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.170</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Line-throwing appliance: ocean, short international voyage, or coastwiseservice. </ITAG>(a) Each of the following vessels must carry a line-throwing applianceapproved under Subpart 160.040 of this chapter: (1) Each passenger vessel in ocean or short international voyage service.(2) Each vessel 500 tons gross tonnage and over, other than a passengervessel, in ocean service. (b) Each vessel in ocean or coastwise service, not covered under paragraph(a) of this section, must carry either_ (1) A line-throwing appliance approved under Subpart 160.040 of this chapter;or (2) A line-throwing appliance approved under Subpart 160.031 of this chapter.(c) Each line throwing appliance required to be carried under this section,must also have the equipment on the list provided with the approved appliance.(d) Each line throwing appliance required to be carried under this section,must also have an auxiliary line that_ (1) If manila, is 75 mm (3 in.) or more in circumference; (2) If other than manila, has a breaking strength of at least 40 kN (9,000lb.); (3) If other than manila, is of a dark color or of a type certified tobe resistant to deterioration from ultraviolet light; (4) If provided for a line throwing appliance approved under Subpart 160.040of this chapter, is at least 450 m (1,500 ft.) long; and (5) If provided for a line throwing appliance approved under Subpart 160.031of this chapter, is at least 150 m (500 ft.) long. (e) The line throwing appliance and its equipment must be readily accessiblefor use, stowed in_ (1) Its container carried within the pilothouse or on the navigating bridge;or (2) The portable magazine chest under andSection; 199.68(d)(2) of this chapter.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.175</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Survival craft and rescue boat equipment. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>Each item of survival craft and rescue boat equipmentmust be good quality, and suitable for the purpose it is intended to serve.Unless otherwise stated in this section, each item of equipment carried,whether required under this section or not, must be secured by lashings,stored in lockers, compartments, brackets, or have equivalent mountingor storage arrangements that do not_ (1) Reduce seating capacity; (2) Interfere with launching, recovery, or rescue operations; (3) Adversely affect seaworthiness of the survival craft or rescue boat;or (4) Overload the launching appliance. (b) <T3>Inflatable liferafts. </T3>Each inflatable liferaft must have one ofthe following equipment packs as shown by the markings on its container:(1) ``SOLAS A Pack'' on a vessel in ocean service. (2) Either ``SOLAS A Pack'' or ``SOLAS B Pack'' on a vessel in short internationalvoyage service or coastwise service. (3) ``SOLAS A Pack'', ``SOLAS B Pack'', or ``Limited Service'' on a vesselin a service other than ocean, short international voyage, or coastwiseservice. (c) <T3>Lifeboats, rigid liferafts, and rescue boats. </T3>Unless otherwisestated in this paragraph, each lifeboat, each rigid liferaft, and eachrescue boat must carry the equipment specified for it in Table 199.175(c)under the vessel's category of service. A lifeboat that is also a rescueboat must carry the equipment in the ``lifeboat'' column. Each rigid liferaftequipped as required under the ``Ocean'' column must be permanently marked``SOLAS A Pack'' in block letters at least 25 mm (1 in.) high. Each rigidliferaft equipped as required under the ``Short International Voyage andCoastwise'' column must be permanently marked ``SOLAS B Pack'' in blockletters at least 25 mm (1 in.) high. Each item in the table is describedbelow along with any exceptions or limitations, with the paragraph numbercorresponding to the item number in the table. (1) [Reserved] (2) <T3>Bailer. </T3>The bailer must be buoyant, except for a bailer with alanyard used in the lifeboat or rescue boat before July 1, 1986 and continuedin use thereafter. (3) <T3>Bilge pump. </T3>The bilge pump must be approved under Subpart 160.044of this chapter and must be installed in the lifeboat in a ready-to-usecondition. (i) The bilge pump for a lifeboat approved for less than 70 persons mustbe either size 2 or size 3, except for a size 1 bilge pump used in a lifeboatof less than 330 cubic foot capacity before July 1, 1986 and continuedin use thereafter. (ii) The bilge pump for a lifeboat approved for 70 persons or more mustbe size 3. (4) <T3>Boathook. </T3>Each boathook must be kept free and ready for use atall times. Each boathook in a lifeboat and a rigid rescue boat must havea single hook and ball-point. The boathook in an inflated or rigid/inflatedrescue boat must be a type designed to minimize the possibility of damageto the fabric portions of the hull. The handle of each boathook must be_(i) Of clear-grained white ash or the equivalent; (ii) At least 38 mm (1\1/2\ in.) in diameter; (iii) At least 2.4 m (8 ft.) long for a boat less than 8.8 m (29 ft.) inlength; and (iv) At least 3.6 m (12 ft.) long for a boat 8.8 m (29 ft.) or more inlength. (5) <T3>Bucket. </T3>Each bucket must be of corrosion-resistant material witha capacity of at least 7.5 liters (2 U.S. gallons). A lanyard of a minimumdiameter of 4 mm (\5/32\ in.) and at least 1.8 m (6 ft.) long must be attachedto the bail. (6) <T3>Can opener. </T3>Each can opener must be suitable for opening the canscarried in the lifeboat or liferaft. The can opener in a jackknife approvedunder Subpart 160.043 of this chapter counts toward this requirement. (7) <T3>Compass. </T3>The compass and its mounting arrangement must be approvedby the Commandant (G-MVI). In a totally enclosed lifeboat and in a rescueboat, the binnacle must be permanently installed at the steering position.In any other lifeboat, either the binnacle must be permanently installedat the steering position, or the mounting base for a removable compassmust be permanently installed in a location where the compass will be insight of the helmsman. (8) <T3>Cover, protecting. </T3>The protecting cover for an open lifeboat mustbe approved by the Commandant (G-MVI). The protecting cover for a partiallyenclosed lifeboat is approved as a component of the lifeboat. (9) <T3>Dipper. </T3>Each dipper must be of corrosion-resistant construction,attached to a lanyard at least 0.9 m (3 ft.) long. The dipper must be suitablefor dipping collected rainwater from the lifeboat's water tanks. (10) <T3>Ditty bag. </T3>The ditty bag must be canvas or equivalent material,and must contain a sailmaker's palm, needles for repairing a sail, sailtwine, marline, and marline spike. (11) <T3>Drinking cup. </T3>The drinking cup must be_ (i) Of corrosion resistant material; (ii) Graduated in ounces or milliliters or both; and (iii) Provided with a lanyard of a minimum diameter of 4 mm (\5/32\ in.)and at least 0.9 m (3 ft.) long. (12) <T3>EPIRB/SART. </T3>A Class S EPIRB, a Category 2 Satellite EPIRB, ora SART must be mounted in a position in the boat where it is ready to beused.(i) The Class S EPIRB must be a type which meets the regulations of theFederal Communications Commission at 47 CFR 80.1059. (ii) The Category 2 Satellite EPIRB must be a type which meets the regulationsof the Federal Communications Commission at 47 CFR 80.1061 (See 53 FR 37308of September 26, 1988). (iii) The SART must be a radar transponder which meets the regulationsof the Federal Communications Commission at 47 CFR 80.375(e) and IMO ResolutionA.604(15). (13) <T3>Fire extinguisher. </T3>Each fire extinguisher must be approved underSubpart 162.028 of this chapter. Each fire extinguisher must be Type B-C,Size I or larger. (14) <T3>First-aid kit. </T3>The first-aid kit in a lifeboat and in a rescueboat must be approved under Subpart 160.041 of this chapter. The first-aidkit in a rigid liferaft must be approved under Subpart 160.054 of thischapter. (15) <T3>Fishing kit. </T3>The fishing kit must be approved under Subpart 160.061of this chapter. (16) <T3>Flashlight. </T3>The flashlight must be a Type I or Type III constructedand marked in accordance with ASTM F1014. Three spare batteries and twospare bulbs, stored in a watertight container, must be provided for eachflashlight. Three-cell size flashlights bearing Coast Guard approval numbersin the 160.018 series may continue to be used as long as they are in aserviceable condition. (17) <T3>Hatchet. </T3>Each hatchet must be approved under Subpart 160.013 ofthis chapter. A lanyard of a minimum diameter of 4 mm (\5/32\ in.) mustsecure each hatchet to the lifeboat. The lanyard must be long enough toallow a hatchet to reach the falls and the painter. (i) Where one hatchet is required, it must be stowed in a bracket neara release hook. (ii) When two hatchets are required and the boat has two release hooks,there must be a hatchet stowed in a bracket near each release hook. (iii) When two hatchets are required and the boat has one release hook,there must be a hatchet stowed in a bracket near the release hook and onestowed in a bracket near the towing point. (18) <T3>Heaving line. </T3>Each heaving line must_ (i) Be buoyant; (ii) Be at least 8 mm (\5\/<T2>16</T2> in.) in diameter; (iii) Be at least 30 m (99 ft.) long; and (iv) Have a buoyant rescue quoit attached to one end. (19) <T3>Instruction card. </T3>The instruction card must be printed on waterproofplastic, and must be suspended from the inside canopy. The instructioncard must contain information on the immediate steps to be taken by survivorsupon entering the liferaft. (20) <T3>Jackknife. </T3>The jackknife must be approved under Subpart 160.043of this chapter, and must be attached to the boat by its lanyard. (21) <T3>Knife. </T3>The knife must be of the non-folding type with a buoyanthandle. (i) The knife for a rigid liferaft must be secured to the raft by a lanyardattached and stowed in a pocket on the exterior of the canopy near thepoint where the painter is attached to the liferaft. The lanyard must belong enough to permit the knife to be used to cut the painter. If an approvedjackknife is substituted for the second knife required on a liferaft equippedfor 13 or more persons, the jackknife must be secured to the liferaft bya lanyard. (ii) The knife in an inflated or rigid/inflated rescue boat must be a typedesigned to minimize the possibility of damage to the fabric portions ofthe hull. (22) <T3>Ladder. </T3>The boarding ladder must be capable of being used on eitherside of the boat to enable persons in the water to board the boat. Theladder must be a permanently installed rigid type or a flexible ladderkept rigged outboard ready for use. Each flexible ladder must meet thefollowing requirements: (i) The ladder must have flat steps with handhold openings in them. (ii) Each step must have a bare wood surface, or have a non-skid surface.(iii) The steps of the ladder must be spaced approximately 0.3 m (12 in.)apart. (iv) Each suspension member must be at least 15 mm (\5\/<T2>8</T2> in.) diameter manila rope, or another material provided it isat least 15 mm in diameter and has a breaking strength of at least 17.6kN (3,960 lb.). Synthetic rope must not be used unless it is ultravioletlight resistant, or is pigmented in a dark color. (v) The lowest step of the ladder must be not less than 0.4 m (15\3\/<T2>4</T2> in.) below the lifeboat's light waterline. (23) <T3>Lantern. </T3>Each open lifeboat must have a lantern containing sufficientoil to burn for at least 9 hours. The lantern must be kept ready for use.Each totally enclosed and partially enclosed lifeboat must have an operatinginterior lighting system that is approved as a component of the lifeboat.(24) <T3>Lifejacket. </T3>Each lifejacket must be approved by the Commandant(G-MVI) as meeting Subpart 160.002, Subpart 160.005, or Subpart 160.055of this Chapter. On each vessel in ocean, short international voyage, orcoastwise service, each lifejacket must also be approved by the Commandantas meeting Regulations III/30.2 and III/32.1 of SOLAS 74/83. (25) <T3>Mast and sail. </T3>The mast and sail unit must consist of one standinglug sail together with the necessary spars, rigging, and cover or storagecontainer. (i) The rigging must be at least 4.75 mm (\3\/<T2>16</T2> in.) in diameter and must be either galvanized or stainlesssteel wire rope. (ii) The sails must be of good quality canvas or other material acceptableto the Commandant (G-MVI), and international orange in color. (26) <T3>Matches. </T3>Each box of matches must consist of at least 100 woodenfriction matches with striking surface, in its own watertight container.(27) <T3>Signalling mirror. </T3>Each signalling mirror must be approved bythe Commandant (G-MVI). (28) <T3>Oars. </T3>Each unit of oars must consist of sufficient buoyant oarsor paddles to make headway in calm seas. An oarlock or equivalent device,either permanently installed or attached to the boat by a lanyard or chain,must be provided for each oar. (i) Each lifeboat and rescue boat built after June 30, 1986 contains informationprovided by the manufacturer on the number, size, and type of oars or paddlesto meet this requirement. (ii) Each lifeboat built before July 1, 1986 that does not contain informationprovided by the manufacturer on the number, size, and type of oars or paddlesrequired to meet this requirement, must have the number, size, and typeof oars as required in the regulations in effect for the vessel on June30, 1986. (iii) Each rescue boat built before July 1, 1986 that does not containinformation provided by the manufacturer on the number, size, and typeof oars or paddles required to meet this requirement, must carry two oars,if it is a rigid hull boat, or two paddles if it is an inflated hull boat.(iv) A rescue boat meeting Subpart 160.056 of this chapter is not requiredto carry oars under paragraphs (c)(28)(i), (c)(28)(ii) or (c)(28)(iii)of this section, if the boat is equipped with a motor and carries two paddles.(29) <T3>Oil, illuminating. </T3>A quantity of at least 0.94 liter (1 quart)of illuminating oil must be provided in a durable container in additionto the oil provided in the lantern. (30) <T3>Paddle. </T3>Each paddle must be buoyant. (31) <T3>Painter. </T3>If the painter is of synthetic material, it must be ofa dark color or of a type certified to be resistant to deterioration fromultraviolet light. (i) Each painter for a lifeboat and each painter for a rescue boat otherthan a rescue boat meeting Subpart 160.056 of this chapter, must be ofa length equal to not less than three times the distance from the stowageposition of the boat to the waterline in the lightest seagoing condition,or 15 m (50 ft.), whichever is the greater. Each painter must have a breakingstrength of at least 34 kN (7,700 lb.). (A) One painter on a lifeboat must be firmly secured at or near the bowready for use. (B) The painter on a rescue boat, and the second painter on a lifeboat,if one is required; must be attached by a painter release device at theforward end of the boat. The painter release device must be capable ofquickly releasing the painter even when the painter is being used to towthe boat. (ii) Each painter for a rescue boat meeting Subpart 160.056 of this chaptermust be firmly secured at or near the bow ready for use. The painter mustbe_ (A) At least 9 m (30 ft.) long; (B) At least 9.5 mm (3/8 in.) diameter; and (C) Have a breaking strength of at least 5.5 kN (1,220 lb.). (iii) The painter for a rigid liferaft must be of a length equal to notless than two times the distance from the stowage position of the liferaftto the waterline in the lightest seagoing condition or 15 m (50 ft.), whicheveris the greater. (A) The painter must have a breaking strength of not less than 13.3 kN(3,000 lb.) for liferafts approved for nine persons or more, and not lessthan 7.5 kN (1,687 lb.) for any other liferaft. (B) A float-free link meeting Subpart 160.073 of this chapter must be securedto the end of the painter that is attached to the vessel. The breakingstrength of the float-free link must be between 1800 N (400 lb.) and 2400N (536 lb.).(32) <T3>Provisions. </T3>Each unit of provisions must be approved by the Commandant(G-MVI) and must consist of not less than 10,000 kJ (2,390 Calories). (33) <T3>Pump. </T3>The pump or bellows must be manually operated and arrangedto be capable of inflating any part of the inflatable structure of therescue boat. (34) <T3>Radar reflector. </T3>A SART carried under paragraph (c)(12) of thissection meets the requirement for a radar reflector. If the boat does notcarry a SART, it must carry a radar reflector certified by its manufacturerto have an apparent cross sectional area of at least 1 m\2\ (10.8 ft.\2\)over 65% of the horizonal plane, using a radar system operating in the9300-9500 MHz band. The radar reflector must also have mounting provisionsto install it on the boat in its proper orientation. (35) <T3>Rainwater collection device. </T3>The rainwater collection device must_(i) Be arranged to collect falling rain and direct it into the water tanksin the lifeboat; (ii) Have a collection area of at least 1 m\2\ (10.75 sq. ft.); and (iii) Be arranged to function unattended after it has been set up. (36) <T3>Repair kit. </T3>The repair kit for inflated and rigid/inflated rescueboats must contain at least_ (i) Six sealing clamps; (ii) Five 50 mm (2 in.) diameter tube patches; (iii) Roughing tool; and (iv) Cement compatible with the tube fabric. The cement must have an expirationdate on its container that is not more than 24 months after the date ofmanufacture of the cement. (37) <T3>Rudder and tiller. </T3>The rudder and tiller must be as required inthe regulations in effect for the vessel on June 30, 1986. (38) <T3>Sea  anchor.  </T3>Each  sea  anchor must be approved by the Commandant(G-MVI) and have a shock-resistant hawser at least 10 m (33 ft.) long,and a tripping line that provides a firm hand grip when wet. (i) Each open lifeboat required to have a sea anchor must also have atleast 3.75 liters (1 U.S. gal.) of storm oil, consisting of vegetable,fish, or animal oil. The storm oil must be in a container suitable forattachment to the sea anchor and designed to distribute a controlled amountof oil on the water. (ii) On each rigid liferaft, one sea anchor must be permanently attachedto the liferaft in such a way that when the liferaft is waterborne, thesea anchor will cause the liferaft to lie oriented to the wind in the moststable manner. The second sea anchor must be stowed in the rigid liferaftas a spare. Each sea anchor on a rigid liferaft must be fitted with a swivelat each end of the line and must be of a type that is unlikely to turninside-out between its shroud lines. (39) <T3>Searchlight. </T3>Each searchlight must be certified by its manufacturerto meet ASTM F1003. The lifeboat must carry two spare bulbs. (i) The searchlight must be permanently mounted on the canopy, or musthave a stanchion type or collapsible type portable mounting on the canopy.The mounting must be located to enable operation of the searchlight bythe boat operator. (ii) The searchlight's power source must be capable of operating the lightwithout charging or recharging, for not less than_ (A) 3 hours continuous operation; or (B) 6 hours total ``on'' time in cycles consisting of 15 min. on and 5min. off. (iii) If the power source is an engine starting battery, there must besufficient battery capacity to start the engine at the end of either operatingperiod specified in paragraph (c)(39)(ii) of this section. (iv) The power source must be connected to the searchlight using watertightelectrical fittings meeting Subpart 111.75 of this chapter. (40) <T3>Seasickness kit. </T3>Each seasickness kit must be packed in a waterproofpackage and must include one waterproof seasickness bag, anti-seasicknessmedication, and instructions for using the medication. In totally enclosedand partially enclosed lifeboats, each seasickness kit must be stowed withinreach of the seat it is intended for. The anti-seasickness medication mustbe one of the following: (i) Six doses of a combination of 25 mg of promethazine hydrochloride and25 mg of ephedrine sulfate, to be taken at six-hour intervals. (ii) A transdermal patch containing scopolamine suitable for at least 2days use. (41) <T3>Signal, smoke. </T3>Each orange smoke signal must be of the floatingtype approved by the Commandant (G-MVI) as meeting Subpart 160.022 of thisChapter, Regulation III/30.2 of SOLAS 74/83, and Regulation III/37 of SOLAS74/83. (42) <T3>Signal, hand flare. </T3>Each hand flare must be approved by the Commandant(G-MVI) as meeting Subpart 160.021 of this Chapter, Regulation III/30.2of SOLAS 74/83, and Regulation III/36 of SOLAS 74/83. (43) <T3>Signal, rocket parachute flare. </T3>Each rocket parachute flare mustbe approved by the Commandant (G-MVI) as meeting Subpart 160.036 of thisChapter, Regulation III/30.2 of SOLAS 74/83, and Regulation III/35 of SOLAS74/83. (44) <T3>Skates and fenders. </T3>The skates and fenders must be as specifiedby the lifeboat manufacturer to facilitate launching and prevent damageto a lifeboat intended for launching down the side of a vessel. (45) <T3>Sponges. </T3>Each sponge must have a volume of at least 1000 cm\3\(62 in.\3\) when fully expanded. (46) <T3>Survival instructions. </T3>The survival instructions must be in theform of a manual printed on waterproof paper or plastic. The manual mustdescribe the lifeboat or rigid liferaft and its equipment and use. Themanual must contain the relevant information in IMO Resolution A.216. Themanual in the rigid liferaft must also contain the relevant informationin IMO Resolution A.181. (47) <T3>Table of lifesaving signals. </T3>The table of lifesaving signals mustbe those in Regulation V/16 of SOLAS 74/83, printed on a waterproof card.(48) <T3>Thermal protective aid. </T3>Each thermal protective aid must be approvedby the Commandant (G-MVI) under Subpart 160.174 of this chapter. (49) <T3>Tool kit. </T3>The tool kit must contain sufficient tools for minoradjustments to the engine and its accessories. As a minimum, the tool kitmust include: (i) A container large enough to hold all the items in the kit. (ii) One 340 g (12 oz.) ball peen hammer. (iii) One screwdriver with a 150 mm (6 in.) flat blade. (iv) One pair of 200 mm (8 in.) slip-joint pliers. (v) One 200 mm (8 in.) adjustable wrench. (50) <T3>Towline. </T3>The towline for a rescue boat meeting Subpart 160.056of this chapter must be at least the same size and length as its painter.The towline for each other rescue boat and lifeboat must be buoyant, notless than 50 m (164 ft.) in length, and must have a breaking strength ofnot less than 13.3 kN (3,000 lb.). (51) <T3>Water. </T3>At least two-thirds of the water must be emergency drinkingwater approved under Subpart 160.026 of this chapter. The remainder musteither be emergency drinking water approved under Subpart 160.026 of thischapter, or desalting apparatus approved under Subpart 160.058 of thischapter capable of producing the required amount of fresh water in 2 days.(52) <T3>Whistle. </T3>The whistle must be a ball-type or multi-tone whistleof corrosion-resistant construction, attached to a lanyard at least 0.9m (3 ft.) long.<ITAG tagnum="21"> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>17,L2,i1,4,r10,xs20,xs20,xs20,xs20,xs20,xs20,xs20,xs20,xs20,xs20,xs20,xs20,xs20,xs20,xs20</C><T4>Table </T4>199.175<T4>(</T4>c<T4>)</T4><H1>Item No. </H1><H1>Item </H1><H1>Ocean </H1><H2>Lifeboat </H2><H2>Rigid Liferaft </H2><H2>Rescue boat </H2><H1>Short international voyage and coastwise </H1><H2>Lifeboat </H2><H2>Rigid Liferaft </H2><H2>Rescue boat </H2><H1>Great Lakes </H1><H2>Lifeboat </H2><H2>Rigid Liferaft </H2><H2>Rescue boat </H2><H1>Lakes, bays, and sounds </H1><H2>Lifeboat </H2><H2>Rigid Liferaft </H2><H2>Rescue boat </H2><H1>Rivers </H1><H2>Lifeboat </H2><H2>Rigid Liferaft </H2><H2>Rescue boat </H2><ITAG tagnum="1">1 <D>(Reserved) \1\ </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2 <D>Bailer </D><D>1 </D><D>1 \2\ </D><D>1 </D><D>1 </D><D>1 \2\ </D><D>1 </D><D>1 </D><D>1 \2\ </D><D>1 </D><D>1 </D><D>1 \2\ </D><D>1 </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3 <D>Bilge pump </D><D>1 \3\ </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>1 \3\ </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>1 \3\ </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>1 </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4 <D>Boathook </D><D>2 </D><D>None </D><D>1 </D><D>2 </D><D>None </D><D>1 </D><D>1 </D><D>None </D><D>1 </D><D>1 </D><D>None </D><D>1 </D><D>1 </D><D>None </D><D>1 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5 <D>Bucket </D><D>2</D><D>None </D><D>1 \4\ </D><D>2</D><D>None </D><D>1 \4\ </D><D>1</D><D>None </D><D>1 \4\</D><D>1</D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>1</D><D>None </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">6 <D>Can opener </D><D>3 </D><D>3 </D><D>None </D><D>3 </D><D>3 </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7 <D>Compass </D><D>1 </D><D>None </D><D>1 </D><D>1 </D><D>None </D><D>1 </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">8 <D>Cover, protecting </D><D>1 \5\</D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>1 \5\ </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">9 <D>Dipper </D><D>1</D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>1</D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">10<D>Ditty bag</D><D>1 \6\</D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>1 \6\</D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">11<D>Drinking Cup </D><D>1</D><D>1</D><D>None </D><D>1</D><D>1</D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">12 <D>EPIRB/SART</D><D>1</D><D>None </D><D>1</D><D>1</D><D>None </D><D>1</D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">13 <D>Fire extinguisher</D><D>2 \8\</D><D>None </D><D>1 \8\</D><D>2 \8\</D><D>None </D><D>1 \8\</D><D>2 \8\</D><D>None </D><D>1 \8\</D><D>2 \8\</D><D>None </D><D>1 \8\</D><D>2 \8\</D><D>None </D><D>1 \8\</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">14 <D>First-aid kit </D><D>1 </D><D>1 </D><D>1 </D><D>1 </D><D>1 </D><D>1 </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15 <D>Fishing kit </D><D>1 </D><D>1</D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">16 <D>Flashlight </D><D>1 </D><D>1 </D><D>1 </D><D>1 </D><D>1 </D><D>1 </D><D>1 </D><D>1 </D><D>1</D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">17 <D>Hatchet </D><D>2 </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>2</D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>2 </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>1 </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>1</D><D>None </D><D>None. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">18 <D>Heaving line </D><D>2 </D><D>1 </D><D>2 </D><D>2 </D><D>1 </D><D>2 </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">19 <D>Instruction card </D><D>None </D><D>1 </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>1 </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>1 </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>1 </D><D>None </D><D>None</D><D>1 </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">20 <D>Jackknife </D><D>1 </D><D>None </D><D>1 </D><D>1 </D><D>None</D><D>1 </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">21 <D>Knife </D><D>None </D><D>1 \9\ </D><D>1 \10\ </D><D>None </D><D>1 \9\ </D><D>1 \10\ </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">22 <D>Ladder </D><D>1 </D><D>None </D><D>1 </D><D>1 </D><D>None </D><D>1 </D><D>1 </D><D>None </D><D>1 </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">23 <D>Lantern or interior lighting </D><D>1 </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>1 </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>1 </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>1 </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>1 </D><D>None </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">24 <D>Lifejacket </D><D>2 </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>2 </D><D>None </D><D>None</D><D>2 </D><D>None </D><D>None</D><D>2 </D><D>None </D><D>None</D><D>2 </D><D>None </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">25 <D>Mast and sail </D><D>1 \11\ </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>1 \11\ </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">26 <D>Matches (boxes) </D><D>2 \12\ </D><D>None </D><D>None</D><D>2 \12\ </D><D>None </D><D>None</D><D>1 \12\ </D><D>None </D><D>None</D><D>1 \12\ </D><D>None </D><D>None</D><D>1 \12\ </D><D>None </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">27 <D>Mirror, signalling </D><D>2 </D><D>1 </D><D>None </D><D>2 </D><D>1 </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">28 <D>Oars (units) </D><D>1 \13\ </D><D>None </D><D>1 </D><D>1 </D><D>None </D><D>1 </D><D>1 </D><D>None </D><D>1 </D><D>1 </D><D>None </D><D>1 </D><D>1 </D><D>None </D><D>1.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">29 <D>Oil, illuminating (quarts) </D><D>1 \12\ </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>1 \12\ </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">30 <D>Paddles </D><D>None </D><D>2 </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>2 </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>2 </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>2 </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>2 </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">31 <D>Painter </D><D>2 </D><D>1 </D><D>1</D><D>2 </D><D>1 </D><D>1</D><D>2 </D><D>1 </D><D>1 </D><D>1 </D><D>1 </D><D>1 </D><D>1 </D><D>1 </D><D>1.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">32 <D>Provisions (units per person) </D><D>1 \13\ </D><D>1 \13\ </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">33 <D>Pump </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>1 \14\ </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>1 \14\ </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>1 \14\ </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>1 \14\ </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>1.\14\</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">34 <D>Radar Reflector </D><D>1 </D><D>None </D><D>1 </D><D>None </D><D>1 </D><D>1 </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">35 <D>Rainwater collection device </D><D>1 </D>13,15 <D>None </D><D>None</D><D>1 </D>13,15 <D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">36 <D>Repair kit </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>1 \14\ </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>1 \14\ </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>1 \14\ </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>1 \14\ </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>1.\14\ </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">37 <D>Rudder and tiller </D><D>1 \16\ </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>1 \16\ </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>1 \16\ </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">38 <D>Sea anchor </D><D>1 </D><D>2 </D><D>1 </D><D>1 </D><D>2 </D><D>1 </D><D>1 </D><D>2 </D><D>1 </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">39 <D>Searchlight </D><D>1 \17\ </D><D>None </D><D>1 </D><D>1 \17\ </D><D>None </D><D>1 </D><D>1 </D><D>None </D><D>1 </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">40 <D>Seasickness kit (kits per person) </D><D>1 </D><D>1 </D><D>None </D><D>1 </D><D>1 </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">41 <D>Signal, orange smoke </D><D>2 </D><D>2 </D><D>None</D><D>2 </D><D>1 </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">42 <D>Signal, red hand flare </D><D>12 </D><D>12 </D><D>None</D><D>12 </D><D>6 </D><D>None</D><D>6 </D><D>6 </D><D>None</D><D>6</D><D>6 </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">43 <D>Signal, red parachute flare </D><D>12 </D><D>12 </D><D>None </D><D>12 </D><D>6 </D><D>None</D><D>6 </D><D>6 </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">44 <D>Skates and fenders (set) </D><D>1 \18\ </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>1 \18\ </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>1 \18\ </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>1 \18\ </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>1 \18\ </D><D>None </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">45 <D>Sponge </D><D>None </D><D>2 </D><D>2 \14\ </D><D>None </D><D>2 </D><D>2 \14\ </D><D>None </D><D>2 </D><D>2 \14\ </D><D>None </D><D>2 </D><D>2 \14\ </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">46 <D>Survival Instructions </D><D>1 </D><D>1 </D><D>None </D><D>1 </D><D>1 </D><D>None </D><D>1 </D><D>1 </D><D>None </D><D>1 </D><D>1 </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">47 <D>Table of lifesaving signals </D><D>1 </D><D>1 </D><D>None </D><D>1 </D><D>1 </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">48 <D>Thermal protective aid (percent of persons) </D><D>10% \19\ </D><D>10% \19\ </D><D>10% \19\ </D><D>10% \19\ </D><D>10% \19\ </D><D>10% \19\ </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">49 <D>Tool kit </D><D>1 \8\ </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>1 \8\ </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>1 \8\ </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>1 \8\ </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>1 \8\ </D><D>None </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">50 <D>Towline </D><D>1 \20\ </D><D>None </D><D>1 </D><D>1 \20\ </D><D>None </D><D>1 </D><D>1 \20\ </D><D>None </D><D>1 </D><D>1 \20\ </D><D>None </D><D>1 </D><D>1 \20\ </D><D>None </D><D>1.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">51 <D>Water (liters per person) </D><D>3 </D><D>1.5 </D><D>None</D><D>3 </D><D>1 </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">52 <D>Whistle </D><D>1 </D><D>1 </D><D>1 </D><D>1 </D><D>1 </D><D>1 </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None </D><D>None.</D><F>\1\ (Reserved).</F><F>\2\ Each liferaft approved for 13 persons or more must carry an additionalbailer.</F><F>\3\ Each lifeboat approved for 100 persons or more must carry an additionalbilge pump, or be equipped with a powered bilge pump.</F><F>\4\ Not required for inflated or rigid/inflated rescue boats.</F><F>\5\ Not required for totally enclosed lifeboats.</F><F>\6\ Required only for an open lifeboat provided with a mast and sail.</F><F>\7\ (Reserved).</F><F>\8\ Required only for motor-propelled lifeboats and rescue boats.</F><F>\9\ Each liferaft equipped for 13 persons or more must carry an additionalknife, that must either meet the same requirements as the first knife,or must be a jackknife approved under Subpart 160.043 of this chapter.</F><F>\10\ A hatchet counts toward this requirement in rigid rescue boats.</F><F>\11\ Not required for a lifeboat powered by a motor, or a hand-propellinggear approved under Subpart 160.034 of this chapter.</F><F>\12\ Required only if the lifeboat carries an oil lantern under item23.</F><F>\13\ Not required for a lifeboat or liferaft on a mobile offshore drillingunit unless the unit is in international service as defined under andSection;107.111 of this chapter.</F><F>\14\ Not required for a rigid rescue boat.</F><F>\15\ Not required for a lifeboat with a protecting cover (item 8) thatincludes a rainwater collection device.</F><F>\16\ Not required for a lifeboat with a permanently installed steeringsystem.</F><F>\17\ Required only on lifeboats built on or after July 1, 1986, andon Class 2 and Class 3 motor lifeboats built before July 1, 1986.</F><F>\18\ Not required if the launching arrangement is such that skates andfenders are unnecessary.</F><F>\19\ Sufficient thermal protective aids are required for at least 10%of the persons the survival craft is equipped to carry, but not less than2.</F><F>\20\ Required only if the lifeboat is also the rescue boat.</F></ITAG></ITAG>(d)<T3> Buoyant apparatus and life floats.</T3> Unless otherwise stated inthis paragraph, each buoyant apparatus, inflatable buoyant apparatus andlife float must carry the equipment specified for it in Table 199.175(d)under the vessel's category of service. Each item in the table is describedbelow along with any exceptions or limitations, with the paragraph numbercorresponding to the item number in the table.(1)<T3> Boathook.</T3> Each boathook must have a single hook and ball-point.The handle of each boathook must be_(i) Of clear-grained white ash or the equivalent;(ii) At least 38 mm (1\1/2\ in.) in diameter; and(iii) At least 1.8 m (6 ft.) long.(2)<T3> Lifeline and pendants.</T3> The lifeline and pendants must be as furnishedby the manufacturer with the approved life float or buoyant apparatus.Replacement lifelines and pendants must meet the requirements in Subpart160.010 of this chapter.(3)<T3> Paddle.</T3> Each paddle must be at least 1.2 m (4 ft.) long and buoyant.(4)<T3> Painter.</T3> The painter must_(i) Be at least 30 m (100 ft.) long, but not less than 3 times the distancebetween the deck where the life floats and buoyant apparatus are stowedand the light draft of the vessel;(ii) Have a breaking strength of at least 6.7 kN (1500 lb.), except thatif the capacity of the life float or buoyant apparatus is 50 persons ormore, the breaking strength must be at least 13.4 kN (3000 lb.);(iii) Be of a dark color if synthetic, or of a type certified to be resistantto deterioration from ultraviolet light; and(iv) Be stowed in such a way that it runs out freely when the life floator buoyant apparatus floats away from the sinking vessel.(5)<T3> Water light.</T3> The water light must be approved under Subpart 161.010of this chapter, and must be attached to the life float or buoyant apparatusby a 12-thread manila, or equivalent lanyard, at least 5.5 m (18 ft.) long.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>7,L2,i1,10,r150,10,10,10,10,10</C><T4> Table</T4> 199.175(d)<H1> Item No.</H1><H1> Item</H1><H1> Ocean</H1><H1> Short Int'l. Voyage and Coastwise</H1><H1> Great Lakes</H1><H1> Lakes; Bays; and Sounds</H1><H1> Rivers</H1> <ITAG tagnum="1"> 1 <D> Boathook\1\ </D><D> 1 </D><D> 1 </D><D> 1 </D><D> 1 </D><D> 1</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> 2 <D> Lifeline and pendants </D><D> 1 </D><D> 1 </D><D> 1 </D><D> 1 </D><D> 1</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> 3 <D> Paddles\1\ </D><D> 2 </D><D> 2 </D><D> 2 </D><D> 2 </D><D> 2</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> 4 <D> Painter </D><D>1 </D><D> 1 </D><D> 1 </D><D> 1 </D><D> 1</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> 5 <D> Water light\2\ </D><D> 1 </D><D> 1 </D><D> 1 </D><D> None </D><D> None </D><F>\1\ Not required to be carried on buoyant apparatus or inflatable buoyantapparatus.</F><F>\2\ Not required on life floats or buoyant apparatus with a capacityof 24 persons or less.</F></ITAG></ITAG> <ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart C_Additional Requirements for Passenger Vessels</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.200</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General.</ITAG>Each passenger vessel must meet the requirements in this subpart in additionto the requirements in Subparts A and B.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.201</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Survival craft.</ITAG>(a)<T3> General.</T3> Each survival craft on a passenger vessel must be approvedby the Commandant (G-MVI) as follows:(1) Each open lifeboat must meet Subpart 160.035 of this chapter.(2) Each partially enclosed lifeboat must meet Subpart 160.035 of thischapter; and Regulations III/30.2, III/41, and III/42 of SOLAS 74/83.(3) Each totally enclosed lifeboat must meet Subpart 160.035 of this chapter;and Regulations III/30.2, III/41, and III/44 of SOLAS 74/83.(4) Each inflatable liferaft must meet Subpart 160.051 of this chapter;and Regulations III/30.2, III/38, and III/39 of SOLAS 74/83. Each inflatableliferaft on a passenger vessel in ocean or short international voyage servicemust have a capacity of 6 persons or more.(5) Each rigid liferaft must meet Subpart 160.018 of this chapter; andRegulations III/30.2, III/38, and III/40 of SOLAS 74/83. Each rigid liferafton a passenger vessel in ocean or short international voyage service musthave a capacity of 6 persons or more.(6) Each inflatable buoyant apparatus must be approved by the Commandant(G-MVI).(b)<T3> Ocean service.</T3> Each passenger vessel in ocean service must carrythe following:(1) Totally enclosed or partially enclosed lifeboats.(i) The lifeboats on each side of the vessel must have an aggregate capacitythat will accommodate not less than 50% of the total number of personspermitted on board.(ii) The OCMI may accept substitution of lifeboats by liferafts of equivalenttotal capacity provided that there are lifeboats on each side of the vesselwith an aggregate capacity that will accommodate not less than 37.5% ofthe total number of persons permitted on board.(2) Liferafts.(i) The liferafts substituted for lifeboats under paragraph (b)(1)(ii)of this section must be served by launching appliances equally distributedon each side of the vessel.(ii) In addition to any liferafts under paragraph (b)(1)(ii) of this section,liferafts must be provided having an aggregate capacity that will accommodateat least 25% of the total number of persons permitted on board.(A) Stowage of these liferafts is not required to meet andSection; 199.135(d).(B) These liferafts must either be readily transferable for launching oneither side of the vessel, or arranged for launching on one side of thevessel, provided that one or more liferafts with the same capacity areon the opposite side of the vessel. The liferaft or liferafts on the oppositeside of the vessel must be in addition to the liferafts required underparagraphs (b)(1)(ii) and (b)(2)(ii) of this section.(C) These liferafts must be served by at least one launching applianceon each side of the vessel. These launching appliances must either be thoseunder paragraph (b)(2)(ii) of this section, or equivalent appliances approvedby the Commandant (G-MVI), capable of being used on both sides of the vessel.(c)<T3> Short international voyage or coastwise service.</T3> Each passengervessel in short international voyage service that meets the special standardsof subdivision in andSection; 171.068 of this chapter, and each passengervessel in coastwise service must carry the following:(1) Totally enclosed or partially enclosed lifeboats.(i) The lifeboats must have an aggregate capacity that will accommodatenot less than 30% of the total number of persons permitted on board.(ii) The lifeboats must be equally distributed, as far as practicable,on each side of the vessel.(2) Liferafts.(i) The liferafts must have an aggregate capacity that, together with thelifeboats, will accommodate the total number of persons permitted on board.These liferafts must be served by launching appliances equally distributedon each side of the vessel.(ii) In addition to the liferafts required under paragraph (c)(2)(i) ofthis section, liferafts must be provided with an aggregate capacity thatwill accommodate at least 25% of the total number of persons permittedon board.(A) Stowage of these liferafts is not required to meet andSection; 199.135(d).(B) These liferafts must either be readily transferable for launching oneither side of the vessel, or arranged for launching on one side of thevessel, provided that one or more liferafts with the same capacity areon the opposite side of the vessel. The liferaft or liferafts on the oppositeside of the vessel must be in addition to the liferafts required underparagraphs (c)(2)(i) and (c)(2)(ii) of this section. (C) These liferafts must be served by at least one launching applianceon each side of the vessel. These launching appliances must be those underparagraph (c)(2)(i) of this section, or equivalent appliances approvedby the Commandant (G-MVI), capable of being used on both sides of the vessel.(d) <T3>Great Lakes service.</T3> Each passenger vessel in Great Lakes servicemust carry the following: (1) Totally enclosed or partially enclosed lifeboats. (i) The lifeboats must have an aggregate capacity that will accommodatenot less than 30% of the total number of persons permitted on board. (ii) The lifeboats must be equally distributed, as far as practicable,on each side of the vessel. (2) Liferafts. (i) The liferafts must have an aggregate capacity that, together with thelifeboats, will accommodate the total number of persons permitted on board.These liferafts must be served by launching appliances equally distributedon each side of the vessel. (ii) In addition to the liferafts required under paragraph (d)(2)(i) ofthis section, liferafts must be provided with an aggregate capacity thatwill accommodate at least 10% of the total number of persons permittedon board, or that will accommodate the capacity of the largest single survivalcraft on the vessel, whichever is the greater. (A) Stowage of these liferafts is not required to meet andSection; 199.135(d).(B) These liferafts must be served by at least one launching applianceon each side of the vessel. The launching appliances must be those underparagraph (d)(2)(i) of this section, or equivalent appliances approvedby the Commandant (G-MVI), capable of being used on both sides of the vessel.(e) <T3>Lakes, bays, and sounds, or river service.</T3> Each passenger vesselin lakes, bays, and sounds service, or in river service must carry thefollowing: (1) Totally enclosed, partially enclosed, or open lifeboats. (i) The lifeboats must have an aggregate capacity that will accommodatenot less than 25% of the total number of persons permitted on board. (ii) The lifeboats must be equally distributed, as far as practicable,on each side of the vessel. (2) Liferafts. The liferafts must have an aggregate capacity that, togetherwith the lifeboats, will accommodate the total number of persons permittedon board. These liferafts must be served by launching appliances equallydistributed on each side of the vessel if the embarkation deck is morethan 3 m (10 ft.) above_ (i) The waterline under normal operating conditions; or (ii) The equilibrium waterline after being subjected to the assumed damageand subdivision requirements in Part 171 of this chapter. (f) <T3>Alternative: small vessels.</T3> A passenger vessel less than 500 tonsgross tonnage where the total number of persons permitted on board is lessthan 200, is not required to meet paragraph (b), (c), (d), or (e) of thissection, if it meets the following: (1) Liferafts must be provided on each side of the vessel with an aggregatecapacity that will accommodate the total number of persons permitted onboard. (2) Unless the liferafts required under paragraph (f)(1) of this sectioncan be readily transferred for launching on either side of the vessel,additional liferafts must be provided to bring the total capacity availableon each side to at least 150% of the total number of persons permittedon board. (3) If the rescue boat required under andSection; 199.202 is also a lifeboat,it is included in the aggregate capacity required under paragraph (f)(1)of this section, provided that paragraph (f)(2) of this section is met.(4) In the event of the largest survival craft on either side of the vesselbeing lost or rendered unserviceable, there must be sufficient survivalcraft available for use on that side to accommodate the total number ofpersons permitted on board. (g) <T3>Alternative: ferries and vessels in lakes, bays, and sounds, or riverservice.</T3> A ferry not in ocean service or short international voyageservice, or a passenger vessel in lakes, bays, and sounds service, or inriver service, is not required to meet paragraph (c), (d), or (e) of thissection, if it meets the following: (1) Inflatable buoyant apparatus must be provided with an aggregate capacitythat will accommodate the total number of persons permitted on board. (2) Additional inflatable buoyant apparatus must be provided with an aggregatecapacity not less than the larger of_ (i) 10% of the total number of persons on board; or (ii) The capacity of the largest inflatable buoyant apparatus on board.(3) Embarkation must be provided on each side of the vessel by at leastone marine escape slide approved by the Commandant (G-MVI), if the embarkationdeck is more than 3 m (10 ft.) above both_ (i) The waterline under normal operating conditions; and (ii) The equilibrium waterline after being subjected to the assumed damageand subdivision requirements in Part 171 of this chapter. (4) If a rescue boat required under andSection; 199.202 is also a lifeboat,it is included in the aggregate capacity required under paragraph (g)(1)of this section. (h) <T3>Alternative: warm water operation; vessels not in ocean, short internationalvoyage, or coastwise service.</T3> During those periods of the year whenthe normal temperature of the water equals or exceeds 15 anddegrees;C (59anddegrees;F) in the area where the vessel operates, a vessel not in ocean,short international voyage, or coastwise service is required to have 10%of the survival craft that would otherwise be required under paragraph(d), (e), (f), or (g) of this section. (i) <T3>Alternative: shallow water operation close to land; vessels not inocean, short international voyage, or coastwise service.</T3> No survivalcraft are required under this section on vessels that_ (1) Are not in ocean, short international voyage, or coastwise service;and (2) Operate not more than 3 miles from land in water where the averagedepth of the channel does not exceed 1 m (39 in.). <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.202</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Rescue boats. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General: vessels 500 tons and over.</T3> Each passenger vessel of 500tons gross tonnage and over must carry at least one rescue boat on eachside of the vessel. Each rescue boat must be approved by the Commandant(G-MVI) as meeting Regulations III/30.2 and III/47 of SOLAS 74/83. (b) <T3>General: vessels less than 500 tons.</T3> Each passenger vessel ofless than 500 tons gross tonnage must carry at least one rescue boat. Therescue boat must be approved by the Commandant (G-MVI) as meeting RegulationsIII/30.2 and III/47 of SOLAS 74/83. (c) <T3>Alternative: use of lifeboat as rescue boat.</T3> A lifeboat is acceptedas a rescue boat if it also meets the requirements for rescue boats asspecified in Regulation III/47 of SOLAS 74/83. (d) <T3>Alternative: vessels operating in harbors, sheltered lakes, or riverservice.</T3> A vessel operating in harbors or sheltered lakes, or operatingin river service is not required to carry a rescue boat approved as meetingRegulations III/30.2 and III/47 of SOLAS 74/83, if it carries a rescueboat meeting Subpart 160.056 of this chapter. The rescue boat must be equippedwith a motor.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.203</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Marshalling of liferafts. </ITAG>(a) To permit efficient marshalling of liferafts, each passenger vesselin ocean, short international voyage, or coastwise service must have alifeboat or rescue boat for each six liferafts when_ (1) Each lifeboat and rescue boat is loaded with its full complement ofpersons; and (2) The minimum number of liferafts necessary to accommodate the remainderof the persons permitted on board have been launched. (b) A passenger vessel in short international voyage or coastwise servicewhich meets the special standards of subdivision in andSection; 171.068 ofthis chapter, is not required to meet paragraph (a) of this section ifit has a lifeboat or rescue boat for each nine liferafts when_ (1) Each lifeboat and rescue boat is loaded with its full complement ofpersons; and (2) The minimum number of liferafts necessary to accommodate the remainderof the persons permitted on board have been launched. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.211</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Ring life buoys. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>The minimum number of ring life buoys carried to meetandSection; 199.70, is prescribed in Table 199.211.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,i1,s250,15,15 </C><T4>Table </T4>199.211  <H1>Length of vessel in meters (feet) </H1><H1>Minimum number of ring life buoys </H1><H2>Ocean and short international voyage service </H2><H2>Other than ocean and short int'l voyage service</H2>  <ITAG tagnum="1">Under 30 (98) <D>8 </D><D>3 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">30 (98) and under 60 (196) <D>8 </D><D>4 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">60 (196) and under 90 (297) <D>12 </D><D>6 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">90 (297) and under 120 (393) <D>12 </D><D>12 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">120 (393) and under 180 (590) <D>18 </D><D>18 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">180 (590) and under 240 (787) <D>24 </D><D>24 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">240 (787) and over <D>30 </D><D>30</D></ITAG></ITAG>  (b) <T3>Small vessels in ocean or short international voyage service. </T3>NotwithstandingandSection; 199.70(a)(3), each passenger vessel under 60 m (196 ft.) in lengthin ocean or short international voyage service, must carry not less thansix ring life buoys with floating electric water lights. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.212</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Lifejackets: ocean or short international voyage service. </ITAG>In addition to the lifejackets required under andSection; 199.72, each passengervessel in ocean or short international voyage service must carry lifejacketsfor not less than 5% of the total number of persons permitted on board.These lifejackets must be stowed in conspicuous places on deck or at musterstations. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.213</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Lifejacket lights; ferries. </ITAG>Notwithstanding the requirements of andSection; 199.75(a), lifejackets onferries are not required to be fitted with lifejacket lights. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.214</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Immersion suits and thermal protective aids; ocean, short internationalvoyage, coastwise, or Great Lakes service. </ITAG>(a) Each passenger vessel in ocean, short international voyage, coastwise,or Great Lakes service must carry an immersion suit for each person_ (1) In command of a survival craft; (2) Second in command of a lifeboat; (3) Assigned to operate a survival craft; and (4) Assigned to operate a survival craft launching appliance. (b) The number of immersion suits for the crew of each lifeboat providedunder paragraph (a) of this section must be at least three. (c) In addition, the vessel must carry a thermal protective aid approvedby the Commandant under Subpart 160.174 of this chapter for each personnot provided with an immersion suit. (d) The immersion suits and thermal protective aids under this sectionare not required if the vessel operates only on routes between 32anddegrees;N and 32anddegrees; S latitude. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.217</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Station bill (muster list). </ITAG>(a) The format of the station bill under andSection; 199.80 used on a passengervessel must be approved by the OCMI. (b) Where the size of the crew permits, the station bill on a passengervessel must include an emergency squad organized by the master to formthe nucleus of a damage control party. This squad consists of persons speciallytrained in the use of the emergency and rescue equipment, and generallyfamiliar with the vessel and fundamentals of damage control. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.220</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Survival craft and rescue boat embarkation arrangements. </ITAG>(a) Survival craft embarkation arrangements must be designed for_ (1) Each lifeboat to be boarded and launched either directly from the stowedposition or from an embarkation deck, but not both; and (2) Davit-launched liferafts to be boarded and launched from a positionimmediately adjacent to the stowed position or from a position to where,under andSection; 199.135(d), the liferaft is transferred before launching.(b) Each rescue boat must be able to be boarded and launched directly fromthe stowed position with the number of persons assigned to crew the rescueboat on board. Notwithstanding paragraph (a)(1) of this section, if therescue boat is also a lifeboat and the other lifeboats are boarded andlaunched from an embarkation deck, the arrangements must be such that therescue boat can also be boarded and launched from the embarkation deck.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.230</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Stowage of survival craft. </ITAG>(a) In order to meet andSection; 199.133(a), each lifeboat on a passengervessel of 80 m (262 ft.) in length and upwards, must be stowed where theafter end of the lifeboat is not less than 1.5 times the length of thelifeboat forward of the propeller. (b) Each liferaft and each inflatable buoyant apparatus must be arrangedfor float-free launching. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.240</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Muster stations. </ITAG>Each passenger vessel must, in addition to meeting andSection; 199.110, havepassenger muster stations that_ (a) Are near the embarkation stations unless in the same location; (b) Permit ready access for the passengers to the embarkation stationsunless in the same location; and (c) Have sufficient room to marshal and instruct the passengers. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.245</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Survival craft embarkation and launching arrangements. </ITAG>(a) Each passenger vessel davit-launched liferaft must be arranged to berapidly boarded by its full complement of persons. (b) All survival craft required for abandonment by the total number ofpersons permitted on board must be capable of being launched with theirfull complement of persons and equipment within a period of 30 min. fromthe time the abandon-ship signal is given. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.250</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Fixed radio installation for lifeboats: international voyage. </ITAG>Each passenger vessel on an international voyage carrying a Class A EPIRBas an alternative to a Category 1, 406 MHz Satellite EPIRB, must have afixed radio installation meeting the regulations of the Federal CommunicationsCommission at 47 CFR 80.267 in_ (a) At least one lifeboat where the total number of persons permitted onboard is more than 199 but less than 1,500; and (b) At least one lifeboat on each side of the vessel where the total numberof persons permitted on board is 1,500 or more.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart D_Additional Requirements for Cargo Vessels </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.260</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General. </ITAG>Each cargo vessel must meet the requirements in this subpart in additionto the requirements in subparts A and B. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.261</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Survival craft. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>Each survival craft on a cargo vessel must be approvedby the Commandant (G-MVI) as follows: (1) Each open lifeboat must meet Subpart 160.035 of this chapter. (2) Each totally enclosed lifeboat must meet Subpart 160.035 of this chapter;and Regulations III/30.2, III/41, and III/44 of SOLAS 74/83. (3) Each inflatable liferaft must meet Subpart 160.051 of this chapter;and Regulations III/30.2, III/38, and III/39 of SOLAS 74/83. Each inflatableliferaft on a cargo vessel in ocean or short international voyage servicemust have a capacity of 6 persons or more. (4) Each rigid liferaft must meet Subpart 160.018 of this chapter; andRegulations III/30.2, III/38, and III/40 of SOLAS 74/83. Each rigid liferafton a cargo vessel in ocean service must have a capacity of 6 persons ormore. (5) Each life float must meet Subpart 160.027 of this chapter. (6) Each inflatable buoyant apparatus must be approved by the Commandant(G-MVI). (b) <T3>Ocean or coastwise service.</T3> Each cargo vessel in ocean or coastwiseservice must carry the following: (1) Totally enclosed lifeboats. The lifeboats on each side of the vesselmust have an aggregate capacity that will accommodate the total numberof persons permitted on board. (2) One or more liferafts capable of being launched on either side of thevessel. The liferafts must have an aggregate capacity that will accommodatethe total number of persons permitted on board. If the liferaft or liferaftscan not be readily transferred for launching on either side of the vessel,the total capacity available on each side must be sufficient to accommodatethe total number of persons permitted on board. (c) <T3>Alternative: ocean or coastwise service. </T3>A cargo vessel in oceanor coastwise service is not required to meet paragraph (b) of this section,if it carries the following: (1) One or more lifeboats capable of being free-fall launched over thestern of the vessel. The lifeboats must have an aggregate capacity thatwill accommodate the total number of persons permitted on board. (2) Liferafts. The liferafts on each side of the vessel must have an aggregatecapacity that will accommodate the total number of persons permitted onboard. The liferafts on at least one side of the vessel must be servedby launching appliances. (d) <T3>Alternative for vessels less than 85 m long and for nonself-propelledvessels: ocean or coastwise service. </T3>A cargo vessel less than 85 m(278 ft.) in length in ocean or coastwise service, or a nonself-propelledvessel in ocean or coastwise service is not required to meet paragraphs(b) or (c) of this section, if it meets the following: (1) One or more liferafts must be carried on each side of the vessel. Theliferafts on each side must have an aggregate capacity that will accommodatethe total number of persons permitted on board. (2) Unless the liferafts required under paragraph (d)(1) of this sectioncan be readily transferred for launching on either side of the vessel,additional liferafts must be provided to bring the total capacity availableon each side to at least 150% of the total number of persons permittedon board. (3) If the rescue boat required under andSection; 199.262 is also a lifeboat,it is included in the aggregate capacity required under paragraph (d)(1)of this section, provided that the total survival craft capacity availableon each side of the vessel is at least 150% of the total number of personspermitted on board. (4) In the event of the largest survival craft on either side of the vesselbeing lost or rendered unserviceable, there must be sufficient survivalcraft available for use on that side to accommodate the total number ofpersons permitted on board. (5) In calculating the capacity of survival craft on board the vessel,no individual survival craft is credited with a capacity greater than thetotal number of persons permitted on board. (e) <T3>Great Lakes or lakes, bays, and sounds service. </T3>Each cargo vesselin Great Lakes or lakes, bays, and sounds service must meet the following:(1) The vessel must have one or more totally enclosed lifeboats with anaggregate capacity sufficient to accommodate the total number of personspermitted on board. (2) The vessel must have one or more liferafts with an aggregate capacitysufficient to accommodate the total number of persons permitted on board.(3) The aggregate capacity of the lifeboats and liferafts on each sideof the vessel must be sufficient to accommodate the total number of personspermitted on board. (f) <T3>Alternative for vessels less than 85 m long and for nonself-propelledvessels: Great Lakes service; lakes, bays, and sounds service; or vesselsoperating on the continental shelf of the United States. </T3>A cargo vesselless than 85 m (278 ft.) in length in Great Lakes service; lakes, bays,and sounds service; or operating on the continental shelf of the UnitedStates; or a nonself-propelled vessel in Great Lakes service; lakes, bays,and sounds service; or operating on the continental shelf of the UnitedStates, is not required to meet paragraph (e) of this section, if it meetsthe following: (1) One or more liferafts must be carried with an aggregate capacity thatwill accommodate the total number of persons permitted on board. (2) Unless the liferafts required under paragraph (f)(1) of this sectioncan be readily transferred for launching on either side of the vessel,additional liferafts must be provided to bring the total capacity availableon each side to at least 100% of the total number of persons permittedon board. (3) If the rescue boat required under andSection; 199.262 is also a lifeboat,it is included in the aggregate capacity required under paragraph (f)(1)of this section, if the requirements under paragraph (f)(2) of this sectionare met. (g) <T3>River service. </T3>Each cargo vessel in river service must have acombination of lifeboats, liferafts, or inflatable buoyant apparatus, thattogether with its rescue boat, provides an aggregate capacity that willaccommodate the total number of persons permitted on board. (h) <T3>Additional liferaft for large vessels. </T3>Each cargo vessel wherethe survival craft are stowed more than 100 m (328 ft.) from the stem mustcarry, in addition to the liferafts required under paragraphs (b)(2), (c)(2),or (e)(2) of this section, a liferaft stowed as far forward as is reasonableand practicable. Each cargo vessel where the survival craft are stowedmore than 100 m (328 ft.) from the stern must carry, in addition to theliferafts required under paragraphs (b)(2), (c)(2), or (e)(2) of this section,a liferaft stowed as far aft as is reasonable and practicable. The requirementfor the liferaft to float free under andSection; 199.290(b) does not applyto a liferaft under this paragraph, provided it is arranged for quick manualrelease. (i) <T3>Alternative: warm water operation; vessels not in ocean or coastwiseservice and small vessels operating on the continental shelf of the UnitedStates in the Gulf of Mexico. </T3>Lifeboats, liferafts, and inflatablebuoyant apparatus are not required if life floats of a combined capacityto accommodate all persons permitted on board are carried on the following:(1) Vessels not in ocean or coastwise service during those periods of theyear when the normal temperature of the water equals or exceeds 15 anddegrees;C(59 anddegrees;F) in the area where the vessel operates. (2) Vessels less than 500 tons gross tonnage operating exclusively on thecontinental shelf of the United States in the Gulf of Mexico. (j) <T3>Alternative: shallow water operation close to land; vessels not inocean or coastwise service. </T3>No survival craft are required under thissection on vessels that_ (1) Are not in ocean or coastwise service; and (2) Operate not more than 3 miles from land in water where the averagedepth of the channel does not exceed 1 m (39 in.). <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.262</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Rescue boats. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Ocean service. </T3>Each cargo vessel in ocean service must carry atleast one rescue boat. The rescue boat must be approved by the Commandant(G-MVI) as meeting Regulations III/30.2 and III/47 of SOLAS 74/83. A lifeboatis accepted as a rescue boat if it also meets the requirements for a rescueboat. (b) <T3>Coastwise or Great Lakes service. </T3>Each cargo vessel in coastwiseor Great Lakes service must carry at least one rescue boat. The rescueboat must be approved by the Commandant (G-MVI) as meeting RegulationsIII/30.2 and III/47 of SOLAS 74/83. (1) A lifeboat is accepted as a rescue boat if it also meets the requirementsfor a rescue boat. (2) A vessel that uses a motor-propelled work boat or launch in its normaloperations is not required to carry a rescue boat if the work boat or launchmeets the stowage, launching, and recovery requirements, and carries thesame equipment as the rescue boat that would otherwise be required. (c) <T3>Lakes, bays, and sounds service. </T3>Each cargo vessel in lakes, bays,and sounds service must carry at least one rescue boat. The rescue boatmust be approved by the Commandant (G-MVI) as meeting Regulations III/30.2and III/47 of SOLAS 74/83. (1) A lifeboat is accepted as a rescue boat if it also meets the requirementsfor a rescue boat. (2) A vessel that uses a motor-propelled work boat or launch in its normaloperations is not required to carry a rescue boat if the work boat or launchcarries the same equipment as the rescue boat that would otherwise be required.(3) A vessel operating in harbors or sheltered lakes is not required tocarry a rescue boat approved by the Commandant (G-MVI) as meeting RegulationsIII/30.2 and III/47 of SOLAS 74/83, if it carries a rescue boat meetingSubpart 160.056 of this chapter. (d) <T3>River service. </T3>Each cargo vessel in river service where the averagedepth of the channel exceeds 1 m (39 in.), must carry at least one rescueboat meeting Subpart 160.056 of this chapter. A vessel that uses a workboat or launch in its normal operations is not required to carry a rescueboat if the work boat or launch carries the same equipment as the rescueboat that would otherwise be required. (e) <T3>Alternative: vessels not in ocean service. </T3>A rescue boat is notrequired for a vessel, other than a vessel in ocean service, if_ (1) The OCMI determines the vessel is arranged to allow a helpless personto be recovered from the water; (2) Recovery of the helpless person can be observed from the navigatingbridge; and (3) The vessel does not regularly engage in operations that restrict itsmaneuverability. (f) <T3>Alternative: nonself-propelled vessels. </T3>A rescue boat is not requiredon a nonself-propelled vessel if the vessel is normally always_ (1) Under tow; (2) Moored to or alongside a mobile offshore drilling unit or self-propelledvessel; or (3) Moored to shore. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.271</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Ring life buoys. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Self-propelled vessels. </T3>For a self-propelled vessel, the minimumnumber of ring life buoys carried to meet andSection; 199.70, is prescribedin Table 199.271.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,i1,s250,15,15</C><T4>Table </T4>199.271 <H1>Length of vessel in meters (feet)</H1><H1>Minimum number of ring life buoys</H1><H2>Ocean service</H2><H2>Other than ocean service</H2>  <ITAG tagnum="1">Under 30 (98) <D>8 </D><D>3 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">30 (98) and under 60 (196) <D>8 </D><D>4 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">60 (196) and under 100 (328) <D>8 </D><D>6 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">100 (328) and under 150 (492) <D>12 </D><D>12 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">150 (492) and under 200 (656) <D>18 </D><D>18 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">200 (656) and under 250 (820) <D>24 </D><D>24 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">250 (820) and over <D>30 </D><D>30</D></ITAG></ITAG> (b) <T3>Nonself-propelled vessels. </T3>Each nonself-propelled vessel musthave one ring life buoy at each end of the vessel. (c) <T3>Small vessels: not in ocean service. </T3>Notwithstanding the requirementsof andSection; 199.70(a)(3), a cargo vessel is not required to have any ringlife buoys with water lights if it is_ (1) Under 30 m (98 ft.) in length; and (2) Not in ocean service. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.272</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Lifejackets. </ITAG>In addition to the lifejackets required under andSection; 199.72, each vesselwith a liferaft under andSection; 199.261(h) of this chapter must have enoughlifejackets to equal the capacity of the liferaft stowed at the liferaftstation. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.273</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Immersion suits: ocean, coastwise, or Great Lakes service. </ITAG>(a) This section applies to each vessel in ocean, coastwise, or Great Lakesservice, except those operating on routes between 32anddegrees;N and 32anddegrees;Slatitude. (b) Each vessel must carry an immersion suit for each person permittedon board. A child/small adult size immersion suit must be provided foreach person smaller than the lower size limit of the adult immersion suits.(c) In addition to the immersion suits required under paragraph (b) ofthis section, the engine room, pilot house, bow lookout station, and eachwork station and industrial work site must have enough immersion suitsto equal the number of persons normally on watch in or assigned to thestation at one time. However, an immersion suit is not required at a watchstation, work station, or work site for a person whose cabin, stateroom,or berthing area (and the immersion suits stowed in that location) is readilyaccessible to the station or site. (d) The immersion suits required under this section count toward meetingthe requirements of andSection; 199.73. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.280</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Survival craft embarkation and launching arrangements: ocean, coastwise,or Great Lakes service. </ITAG>(a) This section applies to vessels in ocean, coastwise, or Great Lakesservice. (b) Each lifeboat must be arranged to be boarded and launched directlyfrom the stowed position. (c) Each davit-launched liferaft must be arranged to be boarded and launchedfrom a position immediately adjacent to the stowed position or from a positionto where the liferaft is transferred under andSection; 199.135(d). (d) In order to meet andSection; 199.150(g), each lifeboat and davit-launchedliferaft on a cargo vessel must be arranged to be boarded by its full complementof persons within 3 min. from the time the instruction to board is given.(e) All survival craft required for abandonment by the total number ofpersons permitted on board must be capable of being launched with theirfull complement of persons and equipment within 10 min. from the time theabandon-ship signal is given.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.290</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Stowage of survival craft. </ITAG>(a) In order to meet andSection; 199.133(a), each lifeboat on a cargo vessel_(1) 80 m (262 ft.) in length and upwards but less than 120 m (393 ft.)in length, must be stowed with the after end of the lifeboat not less thanone length of the lifeboat forward of the propeller; and (2) 120 m (393 ft.) in length and upwards, must be stowed with the afterend of the lifeboat not less than 1.5 times the length of the lifeboatforward of the propeller. (b) Each liferaft, other than those required under andSection; 199.261(h),and each inflatable buoyant apparatus must be arranged for float-free launching.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart E_Additional Requirements for Tank Vessels </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.300</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General. </ITAG>Except as provided in this subpart, tank vessels must meet the requirementsfor cargo vessels in Subpart D. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.310</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Survival craft. </ITAG>(a) Each lifeboat on a tank ship certificated to carry crude, product,chemicals, or liquified gases, emitting toxic vapors or gases; must bea lifeboat with a self-contained air support system approved by the Commandant(G-MVI) as meeting Subpart 160.035 of this chapter; and Regulations III/30.2,III/41, III/44, and III/45 of SOLAS 74/83. (b) Each lifeboat on a tank ship certificated to carry crude, product,chemicals, or liquified gases, having a flashpoint less than 60 anddegrees;C(closed cup test); must be a fire-protected lifeboat approved by the Commandant(G-MVI) as meeting Subpart 160.035 of this chapter; and Regulations III/30.2,III/41, III/44, III/45, and III/46 of SOLAS 74/83 A fire-protected lifeboatmust not be of aluminum construction in the hull or canopy. (c) Substitution of liferafts for lifeboats under andSection; 199.261(d)is not permitted unless the tank vessel is less than 500 tons gross tonnageand not in ocean service. (d) Each stowage position and each muster and embarkation station for asurvival craft on a tank vessel other than the liferaft required underandSection; 199.261(h) of this subchapter, must be in a location_(1) Not over a cargo tank; and (2) Protected from fire and explosion in the cargo tank area by the deckhouse,or A-60 divisions under andSection; 32.57-5(b) of this chapter, or both.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.320</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Survival craft embarkation and launching arrangements: ocean, coastwise,or Great Lakes service. </ITAG>(a) This section applies to vessels in ocean, coastwise, or Great Lakesservice. (b) Notwithstanding the requirements of andSection; 199.150(b), each launchingappliance on a tank ship carrying crude, product, chemicals, or liquifiedgases, together with its lowering and recovery gear, must be arranged ina way that the fully equipped survival craft it serves can be safely loweredon the lower side of the vessel at the angle of heel after damage allowedunder_ (1) MARPOL 73/78 in the case of an oil tanker; (2) The IBC Code in the case of a chemical tanker; or (3) The IGC Code in the case of a gas carrier. (c) Each launching appliance on a tank ship certificated to carry crude,product, chemicals, or liquified gases, having a flashpoint less than 60anddegrees;C (closed cup test); must not be of aluminum construction. <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart F_Additional Requirements for Special Purpose Ships </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.400</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General. </ITAG>(a) This subpart applies to the following vessels: (1) Oceanographic research vessels. Scientific personnel on an oceanographicresearch vessel are ``special personnel'' for the purposes of this subpart.(2) Offshore supply vessels. Offshore workers on an offshore supply vesselare ``special personnel'' for the purposes of this subpart. (b) The term ``passenger'' wherever it is used in Subparts A, B, or C meansone of the special personnel on a special purpose ship. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.405</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Lifesaving appliance requirements. </ITAG>(a) Each special purpose ship permitted to carry more than 50 special personnelmust meet the requirements for passenger vessels in Subpart C, except thatthe lifesaving appliance requirements for passenger vessels on short internationalvoyages do not apply. (b) Each special purpose ship permitted to carry not more than 50 specialpersonnel must meet the requirements for cargo and miscellaneous vesselsin Subpart D, unless it meets the subdivision requirements for ships permittedto carry more than 50 special personnel under the IMO Code of Safety forSpecial Purpose Ships. (c) Each special purpose ship permitted to carry not more than 50 specialpersonnel, but meeting the subdivision requirements for ships permittedto carry more than 50 special personnel under the IMO Code of Safety forSpecial Purpose Ships, must meet either the lifesaving appliance requirementsfor passenger vessels in Subpart C or the requirements for cargo and miscellaneousvessels in Subpart D. (d) Notwithstanding the requirements of paragraph andSection; 199.150(a),a self-elevating offshore supply vessel, known in the industry as a ``liftboat'',is not required to have launching appliances for its liferafts. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.410</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Rescue boats: special purpose ships operating on the continental shelfof the United States. </ITAG>A rescue boat is not required under andSection; 199.202 or andSection; 199.262for a special purpose ship operating on the continental shelf of the UnitedStates, if all of the following are demonstrated to the satisfaction ofthe Commandant (G-MVI): (a) The vessel is arranged to allow a helpless person to be recovered fromthe water. (b) Recovery of the helpless person can be observed from the navigatingbridge. (c) The vessel does not regularly engage in operations that restrict itsmaneuverability. <ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart G_Additional Requirements for Nautical School Ships </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.500</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General. </ITAG>(a) This subpart applies to public nautical school ships and civilian nauticalschool ships. (b) In addition to a regular passenger, the term ``passenger'' whereverit is used in Subparts A, B, or C includes each_(1) Student; (2) Cadet; and (3) Instructor who is not also a member of the crew. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.505</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Lifesaving appliance requirements. </ITAG>(a) Each nautical school ship which meets the structural fire protectionrequirements for a passenger vessel of the same size and service, mustmeet the lifesaving appliance and arrangement requirements for passengervessels in Subpart C. (b) Each nautical school ship which does not meet the structural fire protectionrequirements for a passenger vessel of the same size and service, mustmeet the lifesaving appliance and arrangement requirements for cargo vesselsin Subpart D. (c) Notwithstanding the requirements under andSection; 199.150(e), the releasegear is not required to be of the same type on various lifeboats and rescueboats on a nautical school ship.<ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart H_Additional Requirements for Mobile Offshore Drilling Units</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.600</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General. </ITAG>(a) For the purposes of this subpart, a ``drillship'' is a surface typemobile offshore drilling unit (unit) that is not a column stabilized unitas defined in andSection; 107.111 of this chapter. (b) Each mobile offshore drilling unit (unit), other than a drillship,must meet the requirements in this subpart in addition to the requirementsin Subparts A and B for a vessel in ocean service. (c) Each drillship must meet the requirements in Subpart E for an oil tankerin ocean service carrying a cargo having a flashpoint less than 60anddegrees;C(closed cup test). <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.605</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Survival craft. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General.</T3> Each survival craft on a unit must be one of the following:(1) A totally enclosed, fire-protected lifeboat approved by the Commandant(G-MVI) as meeting Subpart 160.035 of this chapter; and Regulations III/30.2,III/41, III/44, III/45, and III/46 of SOLAS 74/83. A fire-protected lifeboatmust not be of aluminum construction in the hull or canopy. (2) An inflatable liferaft approved by the Commandant (G-MVI) as meetingSubpart 160.051 of this chapter; and Regulations III/30.2, III/38, andIII/39 of SOLAS 74/83. Each inflatable liferaft must have a capacity of6 persons or more. (3) A rigid liferaft approved by the Commandant (G-MVI) as meeting Subpart160.018 of this chapter; and Regulations III/30.2, III/38, and III/40 ofSOLAS 74/83. Each rigid liferaft must have a capacity of 6 persons or more.(b) <T3>Lifeboats and liferafts.</T3> Each unit must carry the following: (1) Totally enclosed fire-protected lifeboats installed in at least twowidely separated locations on different sides or ends of the unit. Thearrangement of the lifeboats must provide sufficient capacity to accommodatethe total number of persons permitted on board if_ (i) All the lifeboats in any one location are lost or rendered unusable;or (ii) All the lifeboats on any one side or end of the unit are lost or renderedunusable. (2) Float-free liferafts. The float-free liferafts must have an aggregatecapacity that will accommodate the total number of persons permitted onboard. Notwithstanding the requirements of andSection; 199.150(a), theseliferafts are not required to be served by launching appliances. (c) <T3>Alternative: certain self-elevating units.</T3> In the case of a self-elevatingunit where, due to its size or configuration, lifeboats can not be locatedin the widely separated locations required under paragraph (b)(1) of thissection, the OCMI may require_ (1) The lifeboats to have an aggregate capacity to accommodate the totalnumber of persons permitted on board; and (2) Liferafts served by launching appliances of an aggregate capacity toaccommodate the total number of persons permitted on board. These liferaftsmay be the float-free liferafts under paragraph (b)(2) of this section,or liferafts in addition to the float-free liferafts. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.610</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Rescue boats. </ITAG>Each unit must carry at least one rescue boat. The rescue boat must beapproved by the Commandant (G-MVI) as meeting Regulations III/30.2 andIII/47 of SOLAS 74/83. A lifeboat is accepted as a rescue boat if it alsomeets the requirements for a rescue boat. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.630</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Ring life buoys. </ITAG>(a) Each unit must have at least eight ring life buoys to meet andSection;199.70. (b) The releasing mechanism for each ring life buoy with a smoke signalrequired under andSection; 199.70(c) must be capable of operation from thenavigating bridge, main control station, or a location readily availableto personnel on board. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.640</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Immersion suits. </ITAG>(a) This section applies to each unit operating in any ocean or in theGreat Lakes, except those operating between 32anddegrees;N and 32anddegrees;Slatitude. (b) Each unit must carry an immersion suit for each person permitted onboard. A child/small adult size immersion suit must be provided for eachperson smaller than the lower size limit of the adult immersion suits.(c) In addition to the immersion suits required under paragraph (b) ofthis section, each watch station, work station, and industrial work sitemust have enough immersion suits to equal the number of persons normallyon watch in, or assigned to, the station or site at one time. However,an immersion suit is not required at a station or site for a person whosecabin or berthing area (and the immersion suits stowed in that location)is readily accessible to the station or site. (d) The immersion suits required under this section count toward meetingthe requirements of andSection; 199.73. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.645</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Station bill. </ITAG>The requirements in andSection; 199.80 applying to the crew, also includethe industrial personnel assigned to the unit. The requirements in andSection;199.80 applying to passengers, apply to visitors and other persons on boardnot regularly employed on the unit. In addition to the requirements inandSection; 199.80, the station bill must_ (a) Cover the duties of the crew in case of collisions or other seriouscasualties, and (b) Cover the duties of the crew in case of severe storms. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 199.650</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Survival craft embarkation and launching arrangements. </ITAG>(a) Each lifeboat must be arranged to be boarded and launched directlyfrom the stowed position. (b) In order to meet andSection; 199.150(g), each lifeboat on a unit mustbe arranged to be boarded by its full complement of persons within 3 min.from the time the instruction to board is given. (c) All lifeboats required for abandonment by the total number of personspermitted on board must be capable of being launched with their full complementof persons and equipment within 10 min. from the time the signal to abandonthe unit is given. (d) Each survival craft must be arranged to clear each leg, column, footing,brace, mat, and each similar structure below the hull of a self-elevatingunit and below the upper hull of a column stabilized unit, with the unitin an intact condition. (1) The survival craft is not required to be arranged to be launched downthe straight side of the unit as required under andSection; 199.120(b), ifit is mounted on a structure intended to provide clearance from lower structuresof the unit. (2) The OCMI may allow a reduction in the total number of survival craftmeeting this requirement when the unit is in the transit mode and the numberof personnel on board is reduced. In such cases, survival craft sufficientto meet andSection; 199.605 of this chapter must be available for use bythe total number of personnel remaining on board. (e) When the unit is under any unfavorable condition such as maximum airgap,lightest transit or operational condition, or any damaged condition underPart 174, Subpart C of this chapter,_ (1) Notwithstanding the requirements under andSection; 199.150(b), survivalcraft launching appliances must be capable of operation; (2) Falls, where used, must be long enough for survival craft to reachthe water; and (3) Lifeboats with an aggregate capacity that will accommodate the totalnumber of persons permitted on board must be capable of being launchedsafely, and clear of any obstruction. The location and orientation of eachlifeboat must take into consideration the in-water operating capabilitiesof the lifeboat. (f) Each launching appliance and supporting structure must not be of aluminumconstruction. (g) In place of the embarkation ladders required under andSection; 199.110(e),each unit must be provided with at least two widely separated fixed metalladders or stairways extending from the deck to the surface of the water.If a fixed ladder can not be installed, the OCMI will approve an alternatemeans of escape with sufficient capacity to permit all persons permittedon board to safely descend to the waterline. (1) Each inclined fixed ladder must meet the requirements under andSection;108.159 of this chapter. (2) Each vertical fixed ladder must meet the requirements under andSection;108.160 of this chapter for fixed ladders, except that the vertical barsin cages must be open at least 500 mm (20 in.) on one side throughout thelength of the ladder. (3) An alternate means of escape must have sufficient capacity to permitall persons permitted on board to safely descend to the waterline within10 minutes from the time the signal to start is given. (h) Means of abandonment, such as portable slides, safety booms, moveableladders, elevators, and controlled descent devices must be approved bythe Commandant (G-MVI).<ITAG tagnum="72">SUBCHAPTER D_TANK VESSELS </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 30_GENERAL PROVISIONS </ITAG>2. The authority citation for Part 30 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>46 U.S.C. 3306, 3703; 49 CFR 1.46.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 30.01-5</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended] </ITAG>3. By removing and reserving paragraph (b)(3) of andSection; 30.01-5. 4. By adding a new Subpart 30.35 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart 30.35_Lifesaving Appliances and Arrangements </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 30.35-1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General_TB/ALL. </ITAG>Lifesaving appliances and arrangements on tank vessels must meet SubchapterW of this chapter. <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 31_INSPECTION AND CERTIFICATION </ITAG>5. The authority citation for Part 31 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>46 U.S.C. 3306, 3307; 49 CFR 1.46. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart 31.01_General </ITAG>6. By revising paragraph (a) of andSection; 31.01-1 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 31.01-1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Inspections required_TB/ALL. </ITAG>(a) The Coast Guard inspects each tank vessel biennially, annually, ormore often if necessary, to determine that it meets the laws, the regulationsin this chapter, and the regulations in 33 CFR Chapter I. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>7. By adding paragraph (c) to andSection; 31.01-5 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 31.01-5</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Scope of initial inspections_TB/ALL. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(c) The following tests and inspections and the tests and inspections inandSection; 31.10-15(d)(7) through andSection; 31.10-15(d)(11) must be conductedfor each initial inspection for certification. The tests and inspectionsunder paragraph (c)(1) of this section must also be conducted when eachnew davit or winch is installed on the vessel. The tests and inspectionsunder paragraph (c)(2) of this section must also be conducted when eachnew free-fall launching system is installed on the vessel. The test underparagraph (c)(3) of this section must also be conducted when each new lifeboator rescue boat is installed on the vessel. The inspection under paragraph(c)(6) of this section must also be conducted when each new lifeboat, rescueboat, liferaft, davit, winch, or other launching appliance is installedon the vessel. The test under paragraph (c)(7) of this section must alsobe conducted when each new life buoy quick release device is installedon the vessel. (1) Each launching appliance using falls and a winch for a rescue boat,davit-launched liferaft, or lifeboat including any auxiliary davit systemfor a free-fall lifeboat must be tested as follows: (i) The lifeboat, rescue boat or davit-launched liferaft must be loadedwith all of its equipment or the deadweight equivalent. In addition, thedavit-launched liferaft must be loaded with a 75 kg (165 lb.) weight tosimulate the load of one person. A davit-launched liferaft is not requiredfor this test if an appropriate test weight is used. The boat or liferaftmust be lowered from the embarkation station and launched into the waterusing the normal launching procedure. If a test weight is substituted forthe davit-launched liferaft, the weight must be ``launched'' onto a surfacethat will support its weight. The rescue boat must then be loaded withthe deadweight equivalent of its full rescue boat complement using a weightof 75 kg (165 lb.) per person. In the case of a lifeboat or rescue boatlaunching appliance, the boat must then be recovered by the launching appliance.In the case of a liferaft launching appliance, the hand-operated quick-returnmechanism must be used to recover the fall. (A) There must be no deformation of or damage to the launching applianceor its connections to the vessel. (B) The lowering speed must meet andSection; 199.153(j) of this chapter,and the falls must meet andSection; 199.153(g) of this chapter. For a multipledrum winch, the falls must wind off the drums at the same rate when lowering,and wind onto the drums evenly in a level wrap at the same rate when hoisting.(C) The release mechanism control in a boat must open all hooks simultaneouslyand release the boat into the water. (D) The automatic disengaging apparatus for a davit-launched liferaft mustopen and release the liferaft or test weight after the apparatus is setto open automatically and the liferaft or test weight is set on the surface.(E) The recovery of the boat must meet andSection; 199.153(l) of this chapter,and if the boat is a rescue boat, andSection; 199.160(d) of this chapter.(F) For each launching device equipped to recover a boat by power, includinga launching device with a portable power source, the limit switches orother safety devices must automatically cut off the power before the boatreaches the stops to avoid overstressing the falls and davits. (G) The hand-operated recovery gear for a lifeboat or rescue boat launchingappliance must be capable of moving the boat into its stowed position wherethe boat can be safely and properly secured. (H) The operation of the hand-operated quick-return mechanism on a davit-launchedliferaft launching appliance must be smooth, rapid, and easy enough forone person to recover the fall. (ii) If the lowering of a lifeboat or rescue boat is controlled from withinthe boat by a control wire wound on an auxiliary drum on the winch, thelaunching of the boat must be tested with the boat loaded as under paragraph(c)(1)(i) of this section, but with an operator inside. (A) The mass of the control wire must be sufficient to overcome the frictionof the sheaves used on the control wire when the launching appliance isbeing operated by the on-deck controls. (B) The control wire must properly operate the winch brake. (C) The winch brake must not be affected by the mass of the fully extendedcontrol wire. (D) There must be sufficient length of control wire available inside theboat to operate the winch brake during all stages of lowering. (E) The free end of the control wire must be retained within the boat untilthe boat is released from the falls by the operator. (iii) The test procedure under paragraph (c)(1)(i) of this section mustbe repeated with the lifeboat, rescue boat or liferaft loaded with weightequivalent to all of its equipment and full complement of persons, plus10% of the total weight of the loaded boat or liferaft. In the case ofa davit-launched liferaft, the automatic disengaging apparatus must beset to release. The on-deck launching controls must be used for this test,with the boat or liferaft being stopped after it has reached its maximumlowering speed, and then at approximately 2 m (6 ft.) intervals. In thecase of a lifeboat or rescue boat, when the boat reaches a position justabove the water, it must be released from the falls using the on-load releasemechanism control. (A) There must be no deformation of or damage to the launching applianceor its connections to the vessel. (B) The lowering speed must meet andSection; 199.153(i) and 199.153(k) ofthis chapter, and the falls must meet andSection; 199.153(g) of this chapter.(C) The launching appliance must bring the boat or raft to a stop within1 m (39 in.) by application of the brake by the winch counterweight alone.(D) The brake action must be smooth and positive. (E) The brake must be always applied unless the operator, or a mechanismactivated by the operator, holds the brake control in the ``off'' position.(F) The boat or raft must begin to lower each time the brake is released.No additional force is permitted. (G) The release mechanism control in a boat must open all hooks simultaneouslyand release the boat into the water. (H) The automatic disengaging apparatus for a davit-launched liferaft mustnot release the liferaft or test weight until the liferaft or test weightis set on the surface. (iv) The release apparatus for a davit-launched liferaft must be testedto determine that it will release under a towing strain. The liferaft ortest weight loaded as required under paragraph (c)(1)(iii) of this sectionmust be suspended just above the surface and the release apparatus setto open automatically. A horizontal towing strain sufficient to pull thefalls 5anddegrees; from vertical must be applied to the liferaft or testweight and the liferaft lowered. The release apparatus must release theliferaft or test weight as it is set on the surface. (v) If any winch brake surface is exposed to the weather, the test underparagraph (c)(1)(iii) of this section must be conducted with the brakesurfaces dry and repeated with the brake surfaces wet. The brake must stopthe winch when the brake surface is wet, but the stopping distance requirementdoes not apply. (2) Each free-fall launched lifeboat and launching system must be testedas follows with the vessel at its lightest seagoing draft: (i) The lifeboat loaded with only its normal equipment or the deadweightequivalent of the equipment, must be launched into the water. After launching,the boat must be retrieved and examined. (A) The free-fall release mechanism must operate properly and release theboat from the launching appliance.(B) The launching system must operate smoothly, must launch the boat intothe water at the intended angle, and must not show any evidence of improperoperation.(C) The lifeboat must not show any evidence of instability in the air orin the water.(D) There must be no deformation of or damage to the lifeboat, the launchingappliance or its connections to the vessel.(ii) The procedure under paragraph (c)(2)(i) of this section must be repeatedwith each seat in the lifeboat loaded with 75 kg (165 lb.) of deadweightproperly secured in place to simulate the weight of one person.(A) The inspections required under paragraphs (c)(2)(i)(A) through (c)(2)(i)(D)of this section must be performed.(B) Each seat and its mounting arrangements must be closely inspected.There must be no deformation or damage to any seat or its mounting arrangements.(C) If the inspector has reason to believe that the boat is not being launchedin a safe and proper manner, the inspector may order the test under thisparagraph (paragraph (c)(2)(ii) of this section) to be repeated with theboat instrumented with acceleration monitoring equipment. The data mustbe compared with the approval test data to determine whether or not theboat is being launched in a safe and proper manner.(iii) The procedure under paragraph (c)(2)(i) of this section must be repeatedwith at least one operator aboard the lifeboat. The rest of the seats inthe lifeboat must either be empty, loaded with deadweight, or with personnelto the satisfaction of the inspector. The launching of the lifeboat mustbe completely controlled by the personnel in the lifeboat.(A) The inspections required under paragraphs (c)(2)(i)(A) through (c)(2)(i)(D)of this section must be performed.(B) There must be no injury to any of the personnel in the lifeboat.(3) Each lifeboat and rescue boat must be operated in the water for atleast 2 hr. During this time, the propulsion system must be operated bothforward and astern. At least l hr. of this running time must be with thepropulsion system operating at full speed. Each boat system, such as anypowered bilge pump, water spray system, or air supply system, must be operated.(i) The boat and each of its systems must operate properly without overheatingor being damaged.(ii) The boat must not have any evident leakage through the hull or aroundany through-hull fitting.(4) An abandon-ship simulation must be held to determine that all survivalcraft required for abandonment by the total number of persons permittedon board, can be launched with their full complement of persons and equipmentwithin 10 min. from the time the abandon-ship signal is given.(i) This simulation must include loading and launching of sufficient survivalcraft to demonstrate that the requirement can be met.(ii) This test is not required if the Coast Guard has witnessed a successfultest on a sister vessel with the same lifesaving appliance arrangements.(5) One lifeboat and one rescue boat of each type on board must be launchedwith the vessel proceeding at a speed of approximately 5 knots. No particularloading of the boat is required. The boat must not give any indicationthat it is unstable or out of control during the launching procedure.(6) The installation of each lifeboat, rescue boat, liferaft and launchingappliance must be inspected to determine that it meets each condition ofits approval, as listed on its Certificate of Approval (Form CGHQ 10030).(7) The quick release device for ring life buoys required for certain vesselsunder andSection; 199.70(c) of this chapter, must be tested to demonstratethat the ring life buoy and its attachments drop clear of the side of thevessel when released. A self-activating smoke signal is not required forthis test if a dummy device of comparable size and weight is used.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart 31.05_Certificate of Inspection</ITAG>8. By revising paragraph (a) of andSection; 31.05-1 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 31.05-1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Issuance of certificate of inspection_TB/ALL.</ITAG>(a) When a tank vessel is found to meet the laws, the regulations in thischapter, and applicable regulations in 33 CFR Chapter I, the Officer inCharge, Marine Inspection issues a certificate of inspection.<ITAG tagnum="37"> * * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart 31.10_Inspections</ITAG>9. By adding paragraphs (d) and (e) to andSection; 31.10-15 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 31.10-15</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Inspection for certification_TB/ALL.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37"> * * * * *</ITAG>(d) At each inspection for certification, the following inspections andtests must be conducted in the presence of a marine inspector, or as otherwisedirected by the OCMI:(1) Each air tank provided for buoyancy on a lifeboat, liferaft, buoyantapparatus or life float, must be tested and demonstrated to be airtight.(2) Each lifeboat and rescue boat gravity davit including each auxiliarydavit system for a free-fall lifeboat, and each davit-launched liferaftlaunching device must be used to lower the boat or liferaft from its stowedposition to a point near the water using the on-deck launching appliancecontrols. This test must be conducted twice; once with the boat or liferaftloaded with all equipment and additional weight of not more than one person,and a second time with the weight of a full load of persons and equipment.A davit-launched liferaft is not required for this test if an appropriatetest weight is used. During the lowering, the brake must be applied andreleased at least five times.(i) The launching appliance must bring the boat, liferaft, or test weightto a stop by application of the brake by the winch counterweight alone.(ii) The brake action must be smooth and positive.(iii) The brake must be always applied unless the operator, or a mechanismactivated by the operator, holds the brake control in the ``off'' position.(iv) Lowering must begin each time the brake is released. No additionalforce is permitted.(3) Each lifeboat and rescue boat on a davit must be lowered to a pointjust above the water and evenly loaded until the total weight of the boatequals the ``B'' weight on the boat data plate. If the boat is equippedwith mechanical disengaging apparatus, the release mechanism control mustbe operated and must open all hooks simultaneously and release the boatinto the water properly. There must be no evident damage or deformationof the boat, the launching appliance, or its connections to the vessel.(4) Each free-fall launched lifeboat and launching system must be testedwith the lifeboat loaded with only its normal equipment or the deadweightequivalent of the equipment. The lifeboat must be launched into the water.After launching, the boat must be retrieved and examined.(i) The free-fall release mechanism must operate properly and release theboat from the launching appliance.(ii) The launching system must operate smoothly, must launch the boat intothe water at the intended angle, and must not show any evidence of improperoperation.(iii) The lifeboat must not show any evidence of instability in the airor in the water. (iv) There must be no deformation of or damage to the lifeboat, the launchingappliance or its connections to the vessel. (5) The procedure under paragraph (d)(4) of this section must be repeatedwith each seat in the lifeboat loaded with 75 kg (165 lb.) of deadweightproperly secured in place to simulate the weight of one person. (i) The inspections required under paragraphs (d)(4)(i) through (d)(4)(iv)of this section must be performed. (ii) Each seat and its mounting arrangements must be closely inspected.There must be no deformation or damage to any seat or its mounting arrangements.(6) If the inspector has reason to believe that the free-fall boat is notbeing launched in a safe and proper manner, the inspector may order thetest under paragraphs (d)(4) and (d)(5) of this section to be repeatedwith the boat instrumented with acceleration monitoring equipment. Thedata must be compared with the approval test data to determine whetheror not the boat is being launched in a safe and proper manner. (7) The procedure under paragraph (d)(4) of this section must be repeatedwith at least one operator aboard the lifeboat. The rest of the seats inthe lifeboat must either be empty, loaded with deadweight, or with personnelto the satisfaction of the inspector. The launching of the lifeboat mustbe completely controlled by the personnel in the lifeboat. (A) The inspections required under paragraphs (d)(4)(i) through (d)(4)(iv)of this section must be performed. (B) There must be no injury to any of the personnel in the lifeboat. (8) The air supply system of each gas protected and fire protected lifeboatmust be checked by_ (i) determining that the air regulator is operating properly either bydischarging one or more of the air supply cylinders through the regulator,or by checking the flow rate on a test apparatus; and (ii) making sure each air supply cylinder is fully charged and meets andSection;147.04-1(a) of this chapter. (9) The water spray system of each fire protected lifeboat must be checkedby operating the pump and determining that all sprinkler heads are operatingproperly and provide a uniform flow of water over the surface of the lifeboat.(10) Each davit-launched liferaft launching appliance must be loaded witha weight equal to the liferaft loaded with its full load of persons andequipment. The weight must be lowered to a point just above the water,dock or other surface that will support the weight. The automatic disengagingapparatus control must be set to release, and must open when the weightis lowered to and supported by the surface. There must be no evident damageor deformation of the automatic disengaging apparatus, launching appliance,or its connections to the vessel. (11) Each lifejacket, immersion suit, and work vest must be examined todetermine that it is in serviceable condition. Each lifejacket, immersionsuit, and work vest not in serviceable condition must be either repaired,or destroyed and removed from the vessel. The marine inspector may markthe lifejackets, immersion suits, and work vests to indicate that theyhave been inspected and passed. (12) The control apparatus for each electrically-controlled launching appliancewinch must be opened, inspected, and determined to be in serviceable condition.(13) Each inflatable liferaft and inflatable lifejacket must be inspectedto determine that it has been serviced under andSection; 35.90-80 of thischapter. (14) Each hydrostatic release unit must be inspected to determine thatit has been serviced under andSection; 35.90-90 of this chapter. (15) Each other item of lifesaving equipment on the vessel must be inspectedto determine that it is in serviceable condition. Each item not in serviceablecondition must be repaired or replaced. Each item of survival equipmentwith an expiration date on it must be replaced if the expiration date haspassed. (16) An abandon-ship drill must be held. The marine inspector specifiesthe nature of the emergency to be simulated. <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 33_LIFESAVING EQUIPMENT </ITAG>10. By removing and reserving Part 33.10a. The following Table of Contents for Part 35 reflects new subpartsto read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 35_OPERATIONS</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart 35.00_Incorporation by Reference</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">35.00-1 Incorporation by reference.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart 35.01_Special Operating Requirements</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart 35.11_Manning of Survival Craft and Supervision</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">35.11-1 Certificate of proficiency_TB/ALL.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">35.11-5 Manning and supervision_TB/ALL.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart 35.90_Operational Readiness, Maintenance and Inspection ofLifesaving Equipment</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">35.90-20 Operational readiness_TB/ALL.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">35.90-30 Maintenance_TB/ALL.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">35.90-40 Maintenance of falls_TB/ALL.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">35.90-50 Spare parts and repair equipment_TB/ALL.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">35.90-60 Weekly Maintenance and inspection_TB/ALL.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">35.90-70 Monthly inspections_TB/ALL.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">35.90-73 /Quarterly inspections_TB/ALL.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">35.90-75 Annual inspection and repair_TB/ALL.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">35.90-80 Servicing of inflatable liferafts, inflatable lifejacketsand inflated rescue boats_TB/ALL.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">35.90-90 Periodic servicing of hydrostatic release units_TB/ALL.</ITAG>11. The authority citation for Part 35 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>46 U.S.C. 3306, 3703; 49 CFR 1.46.</ITAG>12. By adding Subpart 35.00 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart 35.00_Incorporation by Reference </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 35.00-1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Incorporation by reference. </ITAG>(a) Certain materials are incorporated by reference into this part withthe approval of the Director of the Federal Register in accordance with5 U.S.C. 552(a). To enforce any edition other than the one listed in paragraph(b) of this section, notice of change must be published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>and the material made available to the public.All approved material is on file at the Office of the Federal Register,1100 L Street, NW., Washington, DC, and at the U.S. Coast Guard, MerchantVessel Inspection Division (G-MVI), 2100 Second Street, SW., Washington,DC 20593-0001, and is available from the sources indicated in paragraph(b) of this section. (b) The material approved for incorporation by reference in this part,and the sections affected are: <ITAG tagnum="73">American Society for Testing and Materials </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1916 Race St., Philadelphia, PA 19103 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">ASTM D93-80, Test for Flash Point by Pennsky-Martens  Closed Tester_35.25-10.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">International Maritime Organization (IMO) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Publications Section, 4 Albert Embankment, London SE1 7SR, England.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Resolution [LSR 19/WP.4, Annex 3], ``Guidelines Concerning the Useand Fitting of Retroreflective Materials on Life-saving Appliances'', June1987_35.40-40; 35.40-50. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">National Fire Protection Association </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Batterymarch Park, Quincy, MA 02269. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">NFPA 306, Control of Gas Hazards on Vessels, 1975_35.01-1. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart 35.07_Logbook Entries </ITAG>13. By revising paragraphs (b)(1), (b)(2), and (b)(6) of andSection; 35.07-10to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 35.07-10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Actions required to be logged_TB/ALL. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(b) * * * (1) Abandon-ship training and drills, and fire drills. As held. See andSection;andSection;35.10-1 and 35.10-2. (2) Survival craft winches. Once in each three months. See andSection; 35.90-73.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(6) Line-throwing appliances. Once in each three months. See andSection;35.10-3. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart 35.10_Fire and Emergency Requirements </ITAG>14. By revising andSection; 35.10-1 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 35.10-1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Abandon-ship training and drills_T/ALL. </ITAG>(a) Abandon-ship training material must be on board each vessel. The trainingmaterial must consist either of a manual of one or more volumes, or audio-visualtraining aids, or both. (1) The training material must contain instructions and information onthe lifesaving appliances on the vessel and on the best methods of survival.A training manual must be written in easily understood terms, illustratedwherever possible. (2) If a training manual is used, a copy must be in each crew messroomand recreation room or in each crew cabin. If audio-visual training aidsare used they must be incorporated in the onboard training sessions underparagraph (d) of this section. (3) The training material must explain the following in detail: (i) Donning of the lifejackets and immersion suits carried on board. (ii) Muster at the assigned stations. (iii) Boarding, launching, and clearing the survival craft and rescue boats.(iv) Method of launching from within the survival craft. (v) Release from launching appliances. (vi) Method and use of devices for protection in launching areas, whereappropriate. (vii) Illumination in launching areas. (viii) Use of all survival equipment. (ix) Use of all detection equipment. (x) With illustrations, the use of radio lifesaving appliances. (xi) Use of sea anchors. (xii) Use of engine and accessories. (xiii) Recovery of survival craft and rescue boats including stowage andsecuring. (xiv) Hazards of exposure and the need for warm clothing. (xv) Best use of the survival craft for survival. (xvi) Methods of retrieval, including the use of helicopter rescue gear(slings, baskets, stretchers), breeches-buoy and shore lifesaving apparatusand vessel's line-throwing apparatus. (xvii) All other functions contained in the muster list and emergency instructions.(xviii) Instructions for emergency repair of the lifesaving appliances.(b) An abandon-ship drill must be conducted on each vessel in alternatingweeks. If a drill cannot be held during the appointed week due to bad weatheror other unavoidable reason, the drill must be conducted at the first opportunityfollowing the time when the drill would normally have been held. (1) Any member of the crew excused from an abandon-ship drill must participatein the next drill, so that each member participates in at least one abandon-shipdrill each month. If more than 25% of the crew have not participated inan abandon-ship drill on board that particular vessel in the previous month,a drill must be conducted before the vessel leaves port if reasonable andpracticable, but not later than 24 hours after the vessel leaves port.The Commandant (G-MVI) may accept other arrangements that are at leastequivalent for those vessels where this is impractical. (2) On a vessel on an international voyage, musters of the passengers musttake place within 24 hours after their embarkation. Passengers must beinstructed in the use of the lifejackets and the action to take in an emergency.The passengers must be encouraged to participate fully in the abandon-shipdrill. If only a small number of passengers embark at a port after theoriginal muster has been held, the attention of these passengers must bedrawn to the emergency instructions required under andSection; 199.80(a)and 199.80(c) of this chapter if another muster is not held. (3) On each vessel not on an international voyage, a muster of the passengersmust be held on departure, or else_ (i) For voyages of more than one day's duration, musters of the passengersmust be in accordance with paragraph (b)(2) of this section as for vesselson an international voyage; and (ii) For voyages of less than one day's duration, the attention of thepassengers must be drawn to the emergency instructions required under andSection;199.80(a) and 199.80(c) of this chapter. (4) Each abandon-ship drill must include: (i) Summoning of passengers and crew to muster stations with the generalalarm and making sure that they are made aware of how the order to abandonship is given, as specified in the station bill. (ii) Simulation of an abandon-ship emergency which varies from drill todrill. (iii) Reporting to stations, preparing for, and demonstrating the dutiesassigned under the procedure described in the station bill for the particularabandon-ship emergency being simulated. (iv) Checking to see that passengers and crew are suitably dressed. (v) Checking to see that lifejackets are correctly donned. (vi) Lowering of at least one lifeboat after any necessary preparationfor launching. The lifeboat must be lowered at least to the extent wherethe davit head has completed its travel and the fall wire has begun topay out. (vii) Starting and operating the lifeboat engine. (viii) Operation of davits used for launching liferafts. (5) Different lifeboats must, as far as practicable, be lowered to meetparagraph (b)(3)(v) of this section at successive drills. (6) Each abandon-ship drill must, as far as practicable, be conducted asif there were an actual emergency. (7) Each lifeboat must be launched with its assigned operating crew aboardand maneuvered in the water at least once every 3 months during an abandon-shipdrill. (8) Each rescue boat that is not also a lifeboat must be launched withits assigned crew aboard and maneuvered in the water_ (i) Once each month, if reasonable and practicable; but (ii) At least once every 3 months. (9) If lifeboat and rescue boat launching drills are carried out with thevessel making headway, such drills must, because of the dangers involved,be practiced only in waters where it is safe, under the supervision ofan officer experienced in such drills.(10) At least one drill every 3 months must be held at night, unless themaster determines it is unsafe.(11) Emergency lighting for mustering and abandonment must be tested ateach abandon-ship drill.(c) The master of a vessel carrying immersion suits shall make sure that_(1) Each crew member either_(i) Wears an immersion suit in at least one abandon-ship drill per monthunless is is impracticable due to warm weather; or(ii) Participates in at least one immersion suit drill per month that includesdonning an immersion suit and being instructed in its use;(2) In each abandon-ship drill, each passenger on board is instructed inthe use of immersion suits; and(3) Each passenger is told at the beginning of the voyage where immersionsuits are stowed on board and is encouraged to read the instructions fordonning and use of the immersion suits.(d) Each crew member on board the vessel must be given training in theuse of lifesaving appliances and the duties assigned in the station bill.(1) Except as provided under paragraph (d)(2) of this section, onboardtraining in the use of the vessel's lifesaving appliances, including survivalcraft equipment, must be given to each crew member as soon as possible,but not later than 2 weeks after the crew member joins the vessel.(2) If a crew member is on a regularly scheduled rotating assignment toa vessel, onboard training in the use of the vessel's lifesaving appliances,including survival craft equipment, must be given to the crew member notlater than 2 weeks after the time the crew member first joins the vessel.(3) The crew must be instructed in the use of the vessel's lifesaving appliancesand in survival at sea on alternating weeks, normally in the weeks whenabandon-ship drills are not held. If individual instruction sessions coverdifferent parts of the vessel's lifesaving system, all the vessel's lifesavingequipment and appliances must be covered within each 2 month period. Eachmember of the crew must be instructed in at least_(i) Operation and use of the vessel's inflatable liferafts;(ii) Problems of hypothermia, first-aid treatment for hypothermia and otherappropriate first-aid procedures; and(iii) Special instructions necessary for use of the vessel's lifesavingappliances in severe weather and severe sea conditions.(4) Onboard training in the use of davit-launched liferafts must take placeat intervals of not more than 4 months on each vessel with davit-launchedliferafts. Whenever practicable this must include the inflation and loweringof a liferaft. If this liferaft is a special liferaft intended for trainingpurposes only, and is not part of the vessel's lifesaving equipment, thisliferaft must be conspicuously marked.(e) The date when musters are held, details of abandon-ship drills, drillsof other lifesaving appliances and onboard training must be recorded inthe vessel's official logbook. Each logbook entry must include the following,as applicable:(1) The time and date.(2) Length of drill or training session.(3) Identification of survival craft used in drills.(4) Subject of training session.(5) Statement as to the condition of the equipment used.(6) If a full muster, drill or training session is not held at the appointedtime, the circumstances and the extent of the muster, drill or trainingsession held.15. By adding a new andSection; 35.10-2 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 35.10-2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Fire drills.</ITAG>(a) A fire drill must be conducted on each vessel in alternating weeks.The fire drill must not be conducted as part of the abandon-ship drill,nor immediately prior to or after the abandon-ship drill. If a fire drillcan not be held during the appointed week due to bad weather or other unavoidablereason, the drill must be conducted at the first opportunity followingthe time when the drill would normally have been held.(b) Any member of the crew excused from a fire drill must participate inthe next drill, so that each member participates in at least one fire drilleach month. If more than 25% of the crew have not participated in a firedrill on board that particular vessel in the previous month, a drill mustbe conducted before the vessel leaves port if reasonable and practicable,but not later than 24 hours after the vessel leaves port. The Commandant(G-MVI) may accept other arrangements that are at least equivalent forthose vessels where this is impractical.(c) Each fire drill must include:(1) Summoning of passengers and crew to their stations with the generalalarm.(2) Simulation of a fire emergency which varies from drill to drill.(3) Reporting to stations, preparing for, and demonstrating the dutiesassigned under the procedure described in the station bill for the particularfire emergency being simulated.(4) Starting of fire pumps and use of a sufficient number of outlets todetermine that the system is in proper working order.(5) Bringing out each breathing apparatus and other item of rescue andsafety equipment from the emergency equipment lockers, and demonstratingthe use of each item by the person or persons designated to use it.(6) Operating each watertight door used while the vessel is underway.(7) Operation of each self-closing fire door.(8) Closing all fire doors and doors in fire boundaries.(d) Each fire drill must, as far as practicable, be conducted as if therewere an actual emergency.(e) The date when fire drills are held, and details of fire drills mustbe recorded in the vessel's official logbook. Each logbook entry must includethe following, as applicable:(1) The time and date.(2) Length of drill.(3) Number and lengths of hose used.(4) Statement as to the condition of the equipment used.(5) If a full drill is not held at the appointed time, the circumstancesand the extent of the drill held.16. By redesignating andSection; 35.10-3 as andSection; 35.10-4 and addinga new andSection; 35.10-3 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 35.10-3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Line throwing appliance drills_T/ALL.</ITAG>(a) The master of a vessel carrying a line-throwing appliance shall makesure that the crew is drilled in its use at least once every three months.The actual firing of the appliance is at the discretion of the master.(b) Each line-throwing appliance drill must be recorded in the vessel'slogbook.17. By revising andSection; 35.10-5 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 35.10-5</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Emergency signals_T/ALL.</ITAG>(a) The various signals used to call the crew to their stations and togive instructions to the crew must be listed on the station bill requiredunder andSection; 199.80(b) of this chapter. The signals must be as follows:(1) The fire and emergency signal must consist of a continuous blast ofthe whistle for not less than 10 seconds followed by the continuous ringingof the general alarm bells for not less than 10 seconds.(2) The signal for dismissal from fire alarm stations must consist of ringingof the general alarm bells three times, followed by three short blastsof the whistle.(3) The signal for boat stations or boat drill must consist of a successionof more than six short blasts, followed by one long blast of the whistle,followed by the same signal on the general alarm bells.(4) A man-overboard signal must be established.(5) An abandon-ship signal must be established.(6) The signal to lower lifeboats or davit launched liferafts must consistof one short blast of the whistle.(7) The signal to stop lowering lifeboats or davit launched liferafts mustconsist of two short blasts of the whistle.(8) The signal for dismissal from boat stations must consist of three shortblasts of the whistle.(9) Each other emergency signal must not conflict with navigational signalsor other general alarm signals.(b) For vessels in river service where a whistle is not used, the ship'sbell must be used for the whistle signals described under paragraph (a)of this section.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 35.10-6</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed]</ITAG>18. By removing andSection; 35.10-6.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 35.10-7</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> [Removed] </ITAG>19. By removing andSection; 35.10-7. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 35.10-9</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> [Removed] </ITAG>20. By removing andSection; 35.10-9. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 35.10-20</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> [Removed] </ITAG>21. By removing andSection; 35.10-20. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 35.10-25</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> [Removed] </ITAG>22. By removing andSection; 35.10-25. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 35.10-30</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> [Removed] </ITAG>23. By removing andSection; 35.10-30.  24. By adding Subpart 35.11 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart 35.11_Manning of Survival Craft and Supervision </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 35.11-1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Certificate of proficiency_TB/ALL. </ITAG>A merchant mariner's document endorsement as a lifeboatman or another inclusiverating under Part 12 of this Title is evidence of training in survivalcraft and serves as a certificate of proficiency. For the purposes of thissubpart, a ``certificated person'' is a person holding a merchant mariner'sdocument with such an endorsement. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 35.11-5</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Manning and supervision_TB/ALL. </ITAG>(a) There must be a sufficient number of trained persons on board for musteringand assisting untrained persons. (b) There must be a sufficient number of deck officers, able seamen, orcertificated persons on board to operate the survival craft and launchingarrangements required for abandonment by the total number of persons permittedon board.  (c) One person must be placed in charge of each survival craft to be used.(1) Except for vessels in river service, the person in command must bea deck officer, able seaman, or certificated person. (2) A deck officer, able seaman, or certificated person must be designatedsecond-in-command for_ (i) Each lifeboat on a vessel in ocean service; and (ii) Except on a vessel in river service, each lifeboat permitted to carrymore than 40 persons. (3) Each vessel that carries passengers and is not in river  service, musthave at least one deck officer, able seaman, or certificated person forevery 20 passengers assigned to each lifeboat. (d) The person in charge of each survival craft shall have a list of thesurvival craft crew and shall see that the crewmembers are acquainted withtheir duties. The second-in-command of a lifeboat shall also have a listof the lifeboat crew. (e) Each motorized survival craft must have a person assigned who is capableof operating the engine and carrying out minor adjustments. (f) The master shall make sure the persons required under paragraphs (a),(b), and (c) of this section are equitably distributed among the vessel'ssurvival craft.  <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart 35.40_Marking of Fire and Emergency Equipment. </ITAG>25. By adding a new andSection; 35.40-19 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 35.40-19</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Fire hoses and fire axes_TB/ALL. </ITAG>Fire hoses and fire axes must be marked with the vessel's name. 26. By revising andSection; 35.40-40 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 35.40-40</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Lifeboats and rescue boats_TB/ALL. </ITAG>(a) The following must be plainly marked or painted on each side of thebow of each lifeboat and rescue boat in letters and numbers at least 75mm (3 in.) high: (1) The name of the vessel. (2) The number of the boat. The boats on each side of the vessel must benumbered from forward to aft. If there are boats on both sides of the vessel,the odd numbers must be on the starboard side. (3) For vessels in ocean service, the name of the port is required to bemarked on the stern of the vessel under Subpart 67.13 of this chapter.(b) The following must be plainly marked or painted on each side of thebow of each lifeboat and rescue boat in letters and numbers at least 35mm (1.5 in.) high: (1) The length and beam of the boat. (2) The number of persons capacity of the boat. This number must_ (i) Be the number of persons the lifeboat is equipped for; and (ii) Not be greater than the number of persons the boat is approved for,as shown on its nameplate.  (c) The following must be plainly marked or painted on each lifeboat andrescue boat in at least two places visible from above the boat in lettersand numbers not less than 75 mm (3 in.) high: (1) The number of persons capacity of the boat. (2) The name of the vessel. (d) The name of the vessel must be plainly marked or painted on each oarand paddle. (e) On or before July 1, 1991, each lifeboat and rescue boat must be markedwith Type II retroreflective material approved under Subpart 164.018 ofthis chapter. The arrangement of the retroreflective material must meetIMO Resolution [LSR 19/WP.4, Annex 3]. 27. By adding a new andSection; 35.40-43 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 35.40-43</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Rigid liferafts_TB/ALL. </ITAG>(a) The following must be plainly marked or painted near one entrance ofeach rigid liferaft in letters and numbers at least 75 mm (3 in.) high:(1) The name of the vessel. (2) The number of the liferaft. Liferafts stowed on the sides of the vesselmust be numbered in the same manner as the lifeboats. (3) For vessels in ocean service, the name of the port required to be markedon the stern of the vessel under Subpart 67.13 of this chapter. (b) The following must be plainly marked or painted near one entrance ofeach rigid liferaft in letters and numbers at least 35 mm (1.5 in.) high: (1) Either ``SOLAS A Pack'' or ``SOLAS B Pack'' depending upon its equipmentunder andSection; 199.143(b) or andSection; 199.143(c) of this chapter. (2) The length of the painter. (c) The number of persons capacity must be plainly marked or painted overeach entrance to each rigid liferaft in letters and numbers at least 100mm (4 in.) high, in a color contrasting to that of the liferaft. This numbermust_ (1) Be the number of persons the liferaft is equipped for; and (2) Not be greater than the number of persons the liferaft is approvedfor, as shown on its nameplate. (d) The name of the vessel must be plainly marked or painted on each paddle.28. By adding a new andSection; 35.40-45 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 35.40-45</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Inflatable liferafts_TB/ALL. </ITAG>The number of the liferaft and the number of persons it is permitted toaccommodate must be marked or painted in a conspicuous place in the immediatevicinity of each inflatable liferaft in letters and numbers at least 35mm (1.5 in.) high. Liferafts stowed on the sides of the vessel must benumbered in the same manner as the lifeboats. This marking must not beon the inflatable liferaft container. 29. By adding a new andSection; 35.40-48 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 35.40-48</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Life floats and buoyant apparatus_TB/ALL. </ITAG>(a) The name of the vessel must be plainly marked or painted on  each lifefloat and buoyant apparatus, together with their oars and paddles. (b) The number of persons capacity must be plainly marked or painted oneach life float and buoyant apparatus in letters and numbers at least 35mm (1.5 in.) high. This number must_ (1) Be the number of persons the device is equipped for; and (2) Not be greater than the number of persons the device is approved for,as shown on its nameplate. 30. By adding a new andSection; 35.40-50 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 35.40-50</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Lifejackets, immersion suits, and ring life buoys_TB/ALL. </ITAG>(a) Each lifejacket, immersion suit, and ring life buoy must be markedin block capital letters with the vessel's name. (b) Each container for lifejackets and immersion suits must be marked inletters and numbers at least 50 mm (2 in.) high with the number and identificationof the items stowed inside and their size. (c) Each ring life buoy on a vessel in ocean service must be marked inblock capital letters with the name of the port required to be marked onthe stern of the vessel under Subpart 67.13 of this chapter. (d) Each stowage position for a ring life buoy must be marked ``LIFE BUOY''.(e) Each lifejacket must be marked with Type I retroreflective materialapproved under Subpart 164.018 of this chapter. The arrangement of theretroreflective material must meet IMO Resolution (LSR 19/WP.4, Annex 3).(f) On or before July 1, 1991, each ring life buoy must be marked withType II retroreflective material approved under Subpart 164.018 of thischapter. The arrangement of the retroreflective material must meet IMOResolution [LSR 19/WP.4, Annex 3].<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note._</T4>Each approved immersion suit is provided with retroreflectivematerial by the manufacturer of the suit.</ITAG>31. By adding a new andSection; 35.40-55 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 35.40-55</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">EPIRBs and SARTs_TB/ALL. </ITAG>The name of the vessel must be plainly marked or painted on each EmergencyPosition Indicating Radio Beacon (EPIRB) and on each Search and RescueTransponder (SART), except for an EPIRB or SART_ (a) In an inflatable liferaft; or (b) Permanently installed in a survival craft. 32. By adding a new Subpart 35.90 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart 35.90_Operational Readiness, Maintenance and Inspection ofLifesaving Equipment </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 35.90-20</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Operational readiness_TB/ALL. </ITAG>(a) Except as provided in andSection; 35.90-30(e), each lifesaving applianceand each item of survival craft, rescue boat, life float, and buoyant apparatusequipment must be in good working order and ready for immediate use beforethe vessel leaves port and at all times when the vessel is in navigation.(b) Each deck where lifeboats, liferafts, life floats, and buoyant apparatusare stowed or boarded must be kept clear of obstructions that would interferewith the boarding and launching of the lifesaving appliances. (c) If lifeboats are used to carry persons to and from the vessel whenthe vessel is in a harbor or at an anchorage, a sufficient number of lifeboatsand liferafts must be available for use on each side of the vessel to accommodateall persons remaining on board. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 35.90-30</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Maintenance_TB/ALL. </ITAG>(a) The manufacturer's instructions for onboard maintenance of lifesavingappliances must be onboard and must include the following for each appliance_(1) Checklists for use when carrying out the inspections required underandSection; 35.90-70(a); (2) Maintenance and repair instructions; (3) A schedule of periodic maintenance; (4) A diagram of lubrication points with the recommended lubricants; (5) A list of replaceable parts; (6) A list of sources of spare parts; and (7) A log for records of inspections and maintenance. (b) The master shall make sure that maintenance is carried out in accordancewith the instructions required under paragraph (a) of this section. (c) For lifesaving appliances constructed on or before July 1, 1986, paragraph(a) of this section need only be complied with to the extent that the manufacturer'sinstructions are available. (d) The OCMI may accept, instead of the instructions required under paragraph(a) of this section, a shipboard planned maintenance program that includesthe items listed in that paragraph. (e) If lifeboats, rescue boats, and rigid liferafts are maintained andrepaired while the vessel is underway, a sufficient number of lifeboatsand liferafts must be available for use on each side of the vessel to accommodateall persons on board. (f) Except in an emergency, extensive repairs or alterations must not bemade to any lifesaving appliance without advance notification of the OCMI.Insofar as possible, each repair or alteration must be made in accordancewith the requirements for the lifesaving appliance in Subchapter Q of thischapter. The OCMI may require each lifesaving appliance that has been alteredor extensively repaired to be subjected to each test for the appliancein Subchapter Q of this chapter that is affected by the repair or alteration.(g) The master shall report each emergency repair or alteration to a lifesavingappliance as soon as practicable to the OCMI in the next port in the UnitedStates where the vessel calls. If the vessel does not regularly call atports in the the United States, the report must be made to the OCMI responsiblefor one of the foreign ports where the vessel calls. (h) A lifeboat or rigid liferaft must not be repaired or reconditionedfor use on a vessel other than the one it was originally built for, unlessspecifically permitted by the OCMI. If required by the OCMI, the repairor reconditioning of the lifeboat or rigid liferaft must be made underthe OCMI's supervision. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 35.90-40</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Maintenance of falls_TB/ALL. </ITAG>(a) Each fall used in a launching appliance must be turned end for endat intervals of not more than 30 months. (b) Each fall must be renewed when necessary due to deterioration or atintervals of not more than 5 years, whichever is the earlier. (c) Each fall must have a corrosion-resistant tag with the following permanentlymarked on it: (1) The date the new fall was installed. (2) If the fall has been turned end for end, the date it was turned. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 35.90-50</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Spare parts and repair equipment_TB/ALL. </ITAG>Spare parts and repair equipment must be provided for each lifesaving applianceand component subject to excessive wear or consumption and that needs tobe replaced regularly. These parts and equipment must be kept on boardthe vessel, or, if the vessel operates daily out of the same shore base,these parts and equipment may be kept at the shore base. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 35.90-60</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Weekly maintenance and inspection_TB/ALL. </ITAG>The following tests and inspections must be carried out weekly: (a) Each survival craft, rescue boat and launching appliance must be visuallyinspected to ensure its readiness for use. (b) Each lifeboat engine and rescue boat engine must be run ahead and asternfor not less than 3 min., unless the ambient temperature is below the minimumtemperature required for starting the engine. (c) The general alarm system must be tested. (d) Each battery for lifeboat and rescue boat engine starting, searchlights,fixed lifeboat radio installations, and portable radio apparatus must bebrought up to full charge at least once each week if_ (1) The battery is of a type that requires recharging; and (2) The battery is not connected to a device that keeps it continuouslycharged. (e) The transmitter of each fixed lifeboat radio installation and portableradio apparatus must be tested at least once each week using a dummy antennaload. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 35.90-70</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Monthly inspections_TB/ALL. </ITAG>(a) Each lifesaving appliance, including lifeboat equipment, must be inspectedmonthly using the checklist required under andSection; 35.90-30(a)(1) tomake sure it is complete and in good order. A report of the inspection,including a statement as to the condition of the equipment, must be recordedin the vessel's official logbook. (b) Each EPIRB and each SART, other than an EPIRB or SART in an inflatableliferaft, must be tested monthly. The EPIRB must be tested using the integratedtest circuit and output indicator to determine that it is operative.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 35.90-73</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Quarterly inspections_TB/ALL.</ITAG>(a) Each lifeboat winch control apparatus, including motor controllers,emergency switches, master switches, and limit switches must be examinedonce each three months.(b) The examination must include the removal of drain plugs and the openingof drain valves to make sure that enclosures are free of water.(c) The date of the examination required under this section and the conditionof the equipment must be noted in the official logbook.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 35.90-75</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Annual inspection and repair_TB/ALL.</ITAG>(a) Each lifeboat, rescue boat, rigid liferaft, buoyant apparatus and lifefloat must be stripped, cleaned, and thoroughly inspected and repairedas needed at least once each year, including emptying and cleaning of eachfuel tank, and refilling it with fresh fuel.(b) Each davit, winch, fall and other launching appliance must be thoroughlyinspected and repaired as needed once each year.(c) Each item of survival equipment with an expiration date must be replacedduring the annual inspection and repair if the expiration date has passed.(d) Each battery used in an item of survival equipment and clearly markedwith a date identified as an expiration date must be replaced during theannual inspection and repair if the expiration date has passed.(e) Except for a storage battery used in a lifeboat or rescue boat, eachbattery without an expiration date used in an item of survival equipmentmust be replaced during the annual inspection and repair.(f) The requirements in this section do not relieve the master or personin charge of the requirement under andSection; 35.90-20(a) to keep the equipmentready for immediate use.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 35.90-80</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Servicing of inflatable liferafts, inflatable lifejackets and inflatedrescue boats_TB/ALL.</ITAG>(a) Each inflatable liferaft, inflatable lifejacket, and hybrid inflatablelifejacket or work vest must be serviced_(1) Within 12 months of its initial packing; and(2) Within 12 months of each subsequent servicing, except when servicingis delayed until the next scheduled inspection of the vessel, providedthe delay does not exceed 5 months.(b) Each inflatable liferaft must be serviced_(1) Whenever the container of the raft is damaged, or the straps or sealbroken; and(2) In accordance with the servicing procedure under Subpart 160.051 ofthis chapter.(c) Each inflatable lifejacket must be serviced in accordance with theservicing procedure under Subpart 160.076 of this chapter.(d) Each hybrid inflatable lifejacket or work vest must be serviced inaccordance with the servicing procedure under Subpart 160.077 of this chapter.(e) Repair and maintenance of inflated rescue boats must be in accordancewith the manufacturer's instructions. All repairs must be made at a servicingfacility approved by the Commandant (G-MVI), except for emergency repairscarried out on board the vessel.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 35.90-90</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Periodic servicing of hydrostatic release units_TB/ALL.</ITAG>(a) Each hydrostatic release unit must be serviced_(1) Within 12 months of its manufacture and within 12 months of each subsequentservicing, except when servicing is delayed until the next scheduled inspectionof the vessel, provided the delay does not exceed 5 months; and(2) In accordance with the repair and testing procedures under Subpart160.062 of this chapter.(b) The springs of each spring-tensioned gripe used with a hydrostaticrelease unit must be renewed when the unit is serviced and tested.<ITAG tagnum="72">SUBCHAPTER H_PASSENGER VESSELS</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 70_GENERAL PROVISIONS</ITAG>33. The authority citation for Part 70 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> 46 U.S.C. 3306; 49 CFR 1.46.</ITAG>34. By revising andSection; 70.10-43 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 70.10-43</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Short international voyage.</ITAG>A short international voyage is an international voyage in the course ofwhich a vessel is not more than 200 miles from a port or place in whichthe passengers and crew could be placed in safety. Neither the distancebetween the last port of call in the country in which the voyage beginsand the final port of destination nor the return voyage must exceed 600miles. The final port of destination is the last port of call in the scheduledvoyage at which the vessel begins its return voyage to the country in whichthe voyage began.35. By adding a new Subpart 70.28 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart 70.28_Lifesaving Appliances and Arrangements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 70.28-1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General.</ITAG>Lifesaving appliances and arrangements on passenger vessels must meet SubchapterW of this chapter.<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 71_INSPECTION AND CERTIFICATION</ITAG>36. The authority citation for Part 71 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> 46 U.S.C. 2113, 3306; 49 CFR 1.46.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52"> Subpart 71.20_Initial Inspection</ITAG>37. By revising paragraph (a)(1) of andSection; 71.20-20 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 71.20-20</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Specific tests and inspections.</ITAG>(a) * * *(1) The following tests and inspections and the tests and inspections inandSection; 71.25-15(a)(5) through andSection; 71.25-15(a)(9) must be conductedfor each initial inspection for certification. The tests and inspectionsunder paragraph (a)(1)(i) of this section must also be conducted when eachnew davit, winch, or other launching appliance is installed on the vessel.The test under paragraph (a)(1)(ii) of this section must also be conductedwhen each new lifeboat or rescue boat is installed on the vessel. The inspectionunder paragraph (a)(1)(v) of this section must also be conducted when eachnew lifeboat, rescue boat, liferaft, davit, winch, or other launching applianceis installed on the vessel. The test under paragraph (a)(1)(vi) of thissection must also be conducted when each new life buoy quick release deviceis installed on the vessel.(i) Each launching appliance using falls and a winch for a rescue boat,davit-launched liferaft, or lifeboat must be tested as follows:(A) The lifeboat, rescue boat or davit-launched liferaft must be loadedwith all of its equipment or the deadweight equivalent. In addition, thedavit-launched liferaft must be 1oaded with a 75 kg (165 lb.) weight tosimulate the load of one person. A davit-launched liferaft is not requiredfor this test if an appropriate test weight is used. The boat or liferaftmust be lowered from the embarkation station and launched into the waterusing the normal launching procedure. If a test weight is substituted forthe davit-launched liferaft, the weight must be ``launched'' onto a surfacethat will support its weight. The rescue boat must then be loaded withthe deadweight equivalent of its full rescue boat complement using a weightof 75 kg (165 lb.) per person. In the case of a lifeboat or rescue boatlaunching appliance, the boat must then be recovered by the launching appliance.In the case of a liferaft launching appliance, the hand-operated quick-returnmechanism must be used to recover the fall.(<T3>1</T3>) There must be no deformation of or damage to the launchingappliance or its connections to the vessel.(<T3>2</T3>) The lowering speed must meet andSection; 199.153(j) of this chapter,and the falls must meet andSection; 199.153(g) of this chapter. For a multipledrum winch, the falls must wind off the drums at the same rate when lowering,and wind onto the drums evenly in a level wrap at the same rate when hoisting.(<T3>3</T3>) The release mechanism control in a boat must open all hookssimultaneously and release the boat into the water.(<T3>4</T3>) The automatic disengaging apparatus for a davit-launched liferaftmust open and release the liferaft or test weight after the apparatus isset to open automatically and the liferaft or test weight is set on thesurface. (<T3>5</T3>) The recovery of the boat must meet andSection; 199.153(1) ofthis chapter, and if the boat is a rescue boat, andSection; 199.160(d) ofthis chapter. (<T3>6</T3>) For each launching device equipped to recover a boat by power,including a launching device with a portable power source, the limit switchesor other safety devices must automatically cut off the power before theboat reaches the stops to avoid overstressing the falls and davits. (<T3>7</T3>) The hand-operated recovery gear for a lifeboat or rescue boatlaunching appliance must be capable of moving the boat into its stowedposition where the boat can be safely and properly secured. (<T3>8</T3>) The operation of the hand-operated quick-return mechanism ona davit-launched liferaft launching appliance must be smooth, rapid, andeasy enough for one person to recover the fall. (B) If the lowering of a lifeboat or rescue boat is controlled from withinthe boat by a control wire wound on an auxiliary drum on the winch, thelaunching of the boat must be tested with the boat loaded as under paragraph(a)(1)(i)(A) of this section, but with an operator inside. (<T3>1</T3>) The mass of the control wire must be sufficient to overcomethe friction of the sheaves used on the control wire when the launchingappliance is being operated by the on-deck controls. (<T3>2</T3>) The control wire must properly operate the winch brake. (<T3>3</T3>) The winch brake must not be affected by the mass of the fullyextended control wire. (<T3>4</T3>) There must be sufficient length of control wire available insidethe boat to operate the winch brake during all stages of lowering. (<T3>5</T3>) The free end of the control wire must be retained within theboat until the the boat is released from the falls by the operator. (C) The test procedure under paragraph (a)(1)(i)(A) of this section mustbe repeated with the lifeboat, rescue boat or liferaft loaded with weightequivalent to all of its equipment and full complement of persons, plus10% of the total weight of the loaded boat or liferaft. In the case ofa davit-launched liferaft, the automatic disengaging apparatus must beset to release. The on-deck launching controls must be used for this test,with the boat or liferaft being stopped after it has reached its maximumlowering speed, and then at approximately 2 m (6 ft.) intervals. In thecase of a lifeboat or rescue boat, when the boat reaches a position justabove the water, it must be released from the falls using the on-load releasemechanism control. (<T3>1</T3>) There must be no deformation of or damage to the launchingappliance or its connections to the vessel. (<T3>2</T3>) The lowering speed must meet andSection;andSection; 199.153(i)and 199.153(k) of this chapter, and the falls must meet andSection; 199.153(g)of this chapter. (<T3>3</T3>) The launching appliance must bring the boat or raft to a stopwithin 1 m (39 in.) by application of the brake by the winch counterweightalone. (<T3>4</T3>) The brake action must be smooth and positive. (<T3>5</T3>) The brake must be always applied unless the operator, or amechanism activated by the operator, holds the brake control in the ``off''position. (<T3>6</T3>) The boat or raft must begin to lower each time the brake isreleased. No additional force is permitted. (<T3>7</T3>) The release mechanism control in a boat must open all hookssimultaneously and release the boat into the water. (<T3>8</T3>) The automatic disengaging apparatus for a davit-launched liferaftmust not release the liferaft or test weight until the liferaft or testweight is set on the surface. (D) The release apparatus for a davit launched liferaft must be testedto determine that it will release under a towing strain. The liferaft ortest weight loaded as required under paragraph (a)(1)(i)(C) of this sectionmust be suspended just above the surface and the release apparatus setto open automatically. A horizontal towing strain sufficient to pull thefalls 5anddegrees; from vertical must be applied to the liferaft or testweight and the liferaft lowered. The release apparatus must release theliferaft or test weight as it is set on the surface. (E) If any winch brake surface is exposed to the weather, the test underparagraph (a)(1)(i)(C) of this section must be conducted with the brakesurfaces dry and repeated with the brake surfaces wet. The brake must stopthe winch when the brake surface is wet, but the stopping distance requirementdoes not apply. (ii) Each lifeboat and rescue boat must be operated in the water for atleast 2 hrs. During this time, the propulsion system must be operated bothforward and astern. At least 1 hr. of this running time must be with thepropulsion system operating at full speed. Each boat system, such as anypowered bilge pump, water spray system, or air supply system, must be operated.(A) The boat and each of its systems must operate properly without overheatingor being damaged. (B) The boat must not have any evident leakage through the hull or aroundany through-hull fitting. (iii) An abandon-ship simulation must be held to determine that all survivalcraft required for abandonment by the total number of persons permittedon board, can be launched with their full complement of persons and equipmentwithin 30 min. from the time the abandon-ship signal is given. (A) This simulation must include loading and launching of sufficient survivalcraft to demonstrate that the requirement can be met. (B) This test is not required if the Coast Guard has witnessed a successfultest on a sister vessel with the same lifesaving appliance arrangements.(iv) One lifeboat and one rescue boat of each type on board must be launchedwith the vessel proceeding at a speed of approximately 5 knots. No particularloading of the boat is required. The boat must not give any indicationthat it is unstable or out of control during the launching procedure.(v) The installation of each lifeboat, rescue boat, liferaft and launchingappliance must be inspected to determine that it meets each condition ofits approval, as listed on its Certificate of Approval (Form CGHQ 10030).(vi) The quick release device for ring life buoys required for certainvessels under andSection; 199.70(c) of this chapter, must be tested to demonstratethat the ring life buoy and its attachments drop clear of the side of thevessel when released. A self-activating smoke signal is not required forthis test if a dummy device of comparable size and weight is used. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart 71.25_Annual Inspection </ITAG>38. By revising andSection; 71.25-15 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 71.25-15</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Lifesaving equipment. </ITAG>(a) At each inspection for certification, the following inspections andtests must be conducted in the presence of a marine inspector, or as otherwisedirected by the OCMI: (1) Each air tank provided for buoyancy on a lifeboat, liferaft, buoyantapparatus or life float, must be tested and demonstrated to be airtight.(2) Each lifeboat and rescue boat gravity davit, and each davit-launchedliferaft launching device must be used to lower the boat or liferaft fromits stowed position to a point near the water using the on-deck launchingappliance controls. This test must be conducted twice; once with the boator liferaft loaded with all equipment and additional weight of not morethan one person, and a second time with the weight of a full load of personsand equipment. A davit-launched liferaft is not required for this testif an appropriate test weight is used. During the lowering, the brake mustbe applied and released at least five times. (i) The launching appliance must bring the boat, liferaft, or test weightto a stop by application of the brake by the winch counterweight alone.(ii) The brake action must be smooth and positive. (iii) The brake must be always applied unless the operator, or a mechanismactivated by the operator, holds the brake control in the ``off'' position.(iv) Lowering must begin each time the brake is released. No additionalforce is permitted. (3) Each lifeboat and rescue boat must be lowered to a point just abovethe water and evenly loaded until the total weight of the boat equals the``B'' weight on the boat data plate. If the boat is equipped with mechanicaldisengaging apparatus, the release mechanism control must be operated andmust open all hooks simultaneously and release the boat into the waterproperly. There must be no evident damage or deformation of the boat, thelaunching appliance, or its connections to the vessel. (4) Each davit-launched liferaft launching appliance must be loaded witha weight equal to the liferaft loaded with its full load of persons andequipment. The weight must be lowered to a point just above the water,dock or other surface that will support the weight. The automatic disengagingapparatus control must be set to release, and must open when the weightis lowered to and supported by the surface. There must be no evident damageor deformation of the automatic disengaging apparatus, launching appliance,or its connections to the vessel. (5) Each lifejacket, immersion suit, and work vest must be examined todetermine that it is in serviceable condition. Each lifejacket, immersionsuit, and work vest not in serviceable condition must be either repaired,or destroyed and removed from the vessel. The marine inspector may markthe lifejackets, immersion suits, and work vests to indicate that theyhave been inspected and passed. (6) The control apparatus for each electrically-controlled launching appliancewinch must be opened, inspected, and determined to be in serviceable condition.(7) Each inflatable liferaft and inflatable lifejacket must be inspectedto determine that it has been serviced under andSection; 78.95-80 of thischapter. (8) Each hydrostatic release unit must be inspected to determine that ithas been serviced under andSection; 78.95-90 of this chapter. (9) Each other item of lifesaving equipment on the vessel must be inspectedto determine that it is in serviceable condition. Each item not in serviceablecondition must be repaired or replaced. Each item of survival equipmentwith an expiration date on it must be replaced if the expiration date haspassed. (10) An abandon-ship drill must be held. The marine inspector specifiesthe nature of the emergency to be simulated. <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 75_LIFESAVING EQUIPMENT </ITAG>39. By removing and reserving Part 75.39a. The following Table of Contents for Part 78 reflects new or revisedsubparts to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 78_OPERATIONS</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart 78.00_Incorporation by Reference</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">78.00-1 Incorporation by reference.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart 78.13_Emergency Signals</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">78.13-1 Emergency signals.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart 78.14_Manning of Survival Craft and Supervision</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">78.14-1 Certificate of proficiency. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">78.14.5 Manning and supervision.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart 78.95_Operational Readiness, Maintenance and Inspection ofLifesaving Equipment</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">78.95-20 Operational readiness.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">78.95-30 Maintenance.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">78.95-40 Maintenance of falls.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">78.95-50 Spare parts and repair equipment.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">78.95-60 Weekly maintenance and inspection.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">78.95-70 Monthly inspections.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">78.95-73 Quarterly inspections.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">78.95-75 Annual inspection and repair.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">78.95-80 Servicing of inflatable liferafts, inflatable buoyant apparatus,inflatable lifejackets and inflated rescue boats.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">78.95-90 Periodic servicing of hydrostatic release units.</ITAG>40. The authority citation for Part 78 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>46 U.S.C. 3306, 6101; 49 CFR 1.46.</ITAG>41. By adding Subpart 78.00 to read as follows:  <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart 78.00_Incorporation by Reference </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 78.00-1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Incorporation by reference. </ITAG>(a) Certain materials are incorporated by reference into this part withthe approval of the Director of the Federal Register in accordance with5 U.S.C. 552(a). To enforce any edition other than the one listed in paragraph(b) of this section, notice of change must be published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>and the material made available to the public.All approved material is on file at the Office of the Federal Register,1100 L Street, NW., Washington, DC, and at the U.S. Coast Guard, MerchantVessel Inspection Division (G-MVI), 2100 Second Street, SW., Washington,DC 20593-0001, and is available from the sources indicated in paragraph(b) of this section.(b) The material approved for incorporation by reference in this part,and the sections affected are: <ITAG tagnum="73">American Society for Testing and Materials </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1916 Race St., Philadelphia, PA 19103 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">ASTM D93-80, Test for Flash Point by Pennsky-Martens Closed Tester: 78.17-75. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">International Maritime Organization (IMO) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Publications Section, 4 Albert Embankment, London SE1 7SR, England</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Resolution [LSR 19/WP.4, Annex 3], ``Guidelines Concerning the Useand Fitting of Retroreflective Materials on Life-saving Appliances'', June1987: 78.47-60; 78.47-65.</ITAG>42. By revising Subpart 78.13 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart 78.13_Emergency Signals </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 78.13-1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Emergency signals. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>The various signals used to call the crew to their stationsand to give instructions to the crew must be listed on the station billrequired under andSection; 199.80 of this chapter. The signals must be asfollows:  (1) The fire and emergency signal must consist of a continuous blast ofthe whistle for not less than 10 seconds followed by the continuous ringingof the general alarm bells for not less than 10 seconds. (2) The signal for dismissal from fire alarm stations must consist of ringingof the general alarm bells three times, followed by three short blastsof the whistle. (3) The signal for boat stations or boat drill must consist of a successionof more than six short blasts, followed by one long blast of the whistle,followed by the same signal on the general alarm bells. (4) A man-overboard signal must be established. (5) An abandon-ship signal must be established. (6) The signal to lower lifeboats or davit launched liferafts must consistof one short blast of the whistle. (7) The signal to stop lowering lifeboats or davit launched liferafts mustconsist of two short blasts of the whistle. (8) The signal for dismissal from boat stations must consist of three shortblasts of the whistle. (9) Each other emergency signal established must not conflict with navigationalsignals or other general alarm signals. (b) <T3>River service. </T3>For vessels in river service where a whistle isnot used, the ship's bell must be used for the whistle signals describedin this section. 43. By revising Subpart 78.14 to read as follows:  <ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart 78.14_Manning of Survival Craft and Supervision </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 78.14-1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Certificate of proficiency. </ITAG>A merchant mariner's document endorsement as a lifeboatman or another inclusiverating under Part 12 of this Title is evidence of training in survivalcraft and serves as a certificate of proficiency. For the purposes of thissubpart, a ``certificated person'' is a person holding a merchant mariner'sdocument with such an endorsement. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 78.14-5</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Manning and supervision. </ITAG>(a) There must be a sufficient number of trained persons on board for musteringand assisting untrained persons. (b) There must be a sufficient number of deck officers, able seamen, orcertificated persons on board to operate the survival craft and launchingarrangements required for abandonment by the total number of persons permittedon board. (c) One person must be placed in charge of each survival craft to be used.(1) Except for vessels in river service, the person in command must bea deck officer, able seaman, or certificated person. (2) The OCMI, considering the nature of the voyage, the number of personspermitted on board and the characteristics of the vessel, may permit personspracticed in the handling and operation of liferafts to be placed in chargeof liferafts instead of persons required under paragraph (c)(1) of thissection. (3) A deck officer, able seaman, or certificated person must be designatedsecond-in-command for_(i) Each lifeboat on a vessel in ocean service; and (ii) Except on a vessel in river service, each lifeboat permitted to carrymore than 40 persons. (4) Each vessel that is not in river service, must have a least one deckofficer, able seaman, or certificated person for every 20 passengers assignedto each lifeboat. (d) The person in charge of each survival craft shall have a list of thesurvival craft crew and shall see that the crewmembers are acquainted withtheir duties. The second-in-command of a lifeboat shall also have a listof the lifeboat crew. (e) Each lifeboat required to carry a radiotelegraph installation underandSection; 199.250 of this chapter must have a person assigned who is capableof operating the equipment. (f) Each motorized survival craft must have a person assigned who is capableof operating the engine and carrying out minor adjustments. (g) The master shall make sure the persons required under paragraphs (a),(b), and (c) of this section are equitably distributed among the vessel'ssurvival craft. <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart 78.17_Tests, Drills, and Inspections</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 78.17-40</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended] </ITAG>44. By removing paragraph (a)(3) of andSection; 78.17-40. 45. By revising andSection; 78.17-50 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 78.17-50</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Abandon-ship training and drills. </ITAG>(a) Abandon-ship training material must be on board each vessel. The trainingmaterial must consist either of a manual of one or more volumes, or audio-visualtraining aids, or both. (1) The training material must contain instructions and information onthe lifesaving appliances on the vessel and on the best methods of survival.A training manual must be written in easily understood terms, illustratedwherever possible. (2) If a training manual is used, a copy must be in each crew messroomand recreation room or in each crew cabin. If audio-visual training aidsare used they must be incorporated in the onboard training sessions underparagraph (d) of this section. (3) The training material must explain the following in detail: (i) Donning of the lifejackets and immersion suits carried on board. (ii) Muster at the assigned stations. (iii) Boarding, launching, and clearing the survival craft and rescue boats.(iv) Method of launching from within the survival craft. (v) Release from launching appliances. (vi) Method and use of devices for protection in launching areas, whereappropriate. (vii) Illumination in launching areas. (viii) Use of all survival equipment. (ix) Use of all detection equipment. (x) With illustrations, the use of radio lifesaving appliances. (xi) Use of sea anchors. (xii) Use of engine and accessories. (xiii) Recovery of survival craft and rescue boats including stowage andsecuring.(xiv) Hazards of exposure and the need for warm clothing.(xv) Best use of the survival craft for survival.(xvi) Methods of retrieval, including the use of helicopter rescue gear(slings, baskets, stretchers), breeches-buoy and shore lifesaving apparatusand vessel's line-throwing apparatus.(xvii) All other functions contained in the muster list and emergency instructions.(xviii) Instructions for emergency repair of the lifesaving appliances.(b) An abandon-ship drill must be conducted on each vessel at least onceeach week. If a drill cannot be held during any week due to bad weatheror other unavoidable reason, the drill must be conducted at the first opportunityfollowing the time when the drill would normally have been held.(1) Any member of the crew excused from an abandon-ship drill must participatein a later drill, so that each member participates in at least one abandon-shipdrill each month. If more than 25% of the crew have not participated inan abandon-ship drill on board that particular vessel in the previous month,a drill must be conducted before the vessel leaves port if reasonable andpracticable, but not later than 24 hours after the vessel leaves port.The Commandant (G-MVI) may accept other arrangements that are at leastequivalent for those vessels where this is impractical.(2) On a vessel on an international voyage that is not a short internationalvoyage, musters of the passengers must take place within 24 hours aftertheir embarkation. Passengers must be instructed in the use of the lifejacketsand the action to take in an emergency. The passengers must be encouragedto participate fully in the abandon-ship drill. If only a small numberof passengers embark at a port after the original muster has been held,the attention of these passengers must be drawn to the emergency instructionsrequired under andSection;andSection; 199.80(a) and 199.80(c) of this chapterif another muster is not held.(3) On each vessel on a short international voyage, and on each other vesselnot on an international voyage, a muster of the passengers must be heldon departure, or else_(i) For voyages of more than one day's duration, musters of the passengersmust be in accordance with paragraph (b)(2) of this section as for vesselson an international voyage; and(ii) For voyages of less than one day's duration, the attention of thepassengers must be drawn to the emergency instructions required under andSection;199.80(a) and 199.80(c) of this chapter.(4) Each abandon-ship drill must include:(i) Summoning of passengers and crew to muster stations with the generalalarm and making sure that they are made aware of how the order to abandonship is given, as specified in the station bill.(ii) Simulation of an abandon-ship emergency which varies from drill todrill.(iii) Reporting to stations, preparing for, and demonstrating the dutiesassigned under the procedure described in the station bill for the particularabandon-ship emergency being simulated.(iv) Checking to see that passengers and crew are suitably dressed.(v) Checking to see that lifejackets are correctly donned.(vi) Lowering of at least one lifeboat after any necessary preparationfor launching. The lifeboat must be lowered at least to the extent wherethe davit head has completed its travel and the fall wire has begun topay out.(vii) Starting and operating the lifeboat engine.(viii) Operation of davits used for launching liferafts.(5) Different lifeboats must, as far as practicable, be lowered to meetparagraph (b)(4)(v) of this section at successive drills.(6) Each abandon-ship drill must, as far as practicable, be conducted asif there were an actual emergency.(7) Each lifeboat must be launched with its assigned operating crew aboardand maneuvered in the water at least once every 3 months during an abandon-shipdrill. Except for vessels on international voyages which are not shortinternational voyages, the OCMI may allow a vessel not to launch the lifeboatson one side of the vessel if the berthing arrangements in port and thetrading pattern does not permit launching of lifeboats on that side. However,each such lifeboat must be lowered at least once every 3 months and launchedat least annually.(8) Each rescue boat that is not also a lifeboat must be launched withits assigned crew aboard and maneuvered in the water_(i) Once each month, if reasonable and practicable; but(ii) At least once every 3 months.(9) If lifeboat and rescue boat launching drills are carried out with thevessel making headway, such drills must, because of the dangers involved,be practiced only in waters where it is safe, under the supervision ofan officer experienced in such drills.(10) At least one drill every 3 months must be held at night, unless themaster determines it is unsafe.(11) Emergency lighting for mustering and abandonment must be tested ateach abandon-ship drill.(c) The master of a vessel carrying immersion suits shall make sure that_(1) Each crew member either_(i) Wears an immersion suit in at least one abandon-ship drill per monthunless it is impracticable due to warm weather; or(ii) Participates in at least one immersion suit drill per month that includesdonning an immersion suit and being instructed in its use;(2) If immersion suits are carried for passengers_(i) In each abandon-ship drill, passengers are instructed in the use ofimmersion suits; and(ii) Passengers are told at the beginning of the voyage where immersionsuits are stowed on board and are encouraged to read the instructions fordonning and use of the immersion suits.(d) The master of a vessel carrying thermal protective aids shall makesure that_(1) In each abandon-ship drill, passengers are instructed in the use ofthermal protective aids; and(2) Passengers are told at the beginning of the voyage where thermal protectiveaids are stowed on board and are encouraged to read the instructions fordonning and use of the thermal protective aids.(e) Each crew member on board the vessel must be given training in theuse of lifesaving appliances and the duties assigned in the station bill.(1) Except as provided under paragraph (e)(2) of this section, onboardtraining in the use of the vessel's lifesaving appliances, including survivalcraft equipment, must be given to each crew member as soon as possible,but not later than 2 weeks after the crew member joins the vessel.(2) If a crew member is on a regularly scheduled rotating assignment toa vessel, onboard training in the use of the vessel's lifesaving appliances,including survival craft equipment, must be given to the crew member notlater than 2 weeks after the time the crew member first joins the vessel.(3) The crew must be instructed in the use of the vessel's lifesaving appliancesand in survival at sea at the same interval as the abandon-ship drills.If individual instruction sessions cover different parts of the vessel'slifesaving system, all the vessel's lifesaving equipment and appliancesmust be covered within each 2 month period. Each member of the crew mustbe instructed in at least_(i) Operation and use of the vessel's inflatable liferafts;(ii) Problems of hypothermia, first-aid treatment for hypothermia and otherappropriate first-aid procedures; and(iii) Special instructions necessary for use of the vessel's lifesavingappliances in severe weather and severe sea conditions.(4) Onboard training in the use of davit-launched liferafts must take placeat intervals of not more than 4 months on each vessel with davit-launchedliferafts. Whenever practicable this must include the inflation and loweringof a liferaft. If this liferaft is a special liferaft intended for trainingpurposes only, and is not part of the vessel's lifesaving equipment, thisliferaft must be conspicuously marked.(f) The date when musters are held, details of abandon-ship drills, drillsof other lifesaving appliances and onboard training must be recorded inthe vessel's official logbook. Each logbook entry must include the following,as applicable:(1) The time and date.(2) Length of drill or training session.(3) Identification of survival craft used in drills.(4) Subject of training session.(5) Statement as to the condition of the equipment used.(6) If a full muster, drill or training session is not held at the appointedtime, the circumstances and the extent of the muster, drill or trainingsession held.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 78.17-52</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed]</ITAG>46. By removing andSection; 78.17-52.47. By revising andSection; 78.17-55 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 78.17-55</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Fire drills.</ITAG>(a) A fire drill must be conducted on each vessel at least once each week.The fire drill must not be conducted as part of the abandon-ship drill,nor immediately prior to or after the abandon-ship drill. If a fire drillcannot be held during any week due to bad weather or other unavoidablereason, the drill must be conducted at the first opportunity followingthe time when the drill would normally have been held.(b) Any member of the crew excused from a fire drill must participate ina later drill, so that each member participates in at least one fire drilleach month. If more than 25% of the crew have not participated in a firedrill on board that particular vessel in the previous month, a drill mustbe conducted before the vessel leaves port if reasonable and practicable,but not later than 24 hours after the vessel leaves port. The Commandant(G-MVI) may accept other arrangements that are at least equivalent forthose vessels where this is impractical. (c) Each fire drill must include: (1) Summoning of passengers and crew to their stations with the generalalarm. (2) Simulation of a fire emergency which varies from drill to drill. (3) Reporting to stations, preparing for, and demonstrating the dutiesassigned under the procedure described in the station bill for the particularfire emergency being simulated. (4) Starting of fire pumps and use of a sufficient number of outlets todetermine that the system is in proper working order. (5) Bringing out each breathing apparatus and other item of rescue andsafety equipment from the emergency equipment lockers, and demonstratingthe use of each item by the person or persons designated to use it. (6) Operating each watertight door used while the vessel is underway. (7) Operation of each self-closing fire door. (8) Closing all fire doors and doors in fire boundaries. (d) Each fire drill must, as far as practicable, be conducted as if therewere an actual emergency. (e) The date when fire drills are held, and details of fire drills mustbe recorded in the vessel's official logbook. Each logbook entry must includethe following, as applicable: (1) The time and date. (2) Length of drill.(3) Number and lengths of hose used. (4) Statement as to the condition of the equipment used. (5) If a full drill is not held at the appointed time, the circumstancesand the extent of the drill held.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 78.17-60</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed] </ITAG>48. By removing andSection; 78.17-60.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 78.17-70</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed] </ITAG>49. By removing andSection; 78.17-70.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 78.17-85</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed] </ITAG>50. By removing andSection; 78.17-85.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 78.17-90</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed] </ITAG>51. By removing andSection; 78.17-90. 52. By revising paragraphs (a)(1) and (a)(10) of andSection; 78.37-5 to readas follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 78.37-5</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Actions required to be logged. </ITAG>(a) * * * (1) Abandon-ship training and drills, and fire drills. As held. See andSection;andSection;78.17-50, and 78.17-55. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(10) Survival craft winches. Once in each three months. See andSection; 78.95-73.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart 78.47_Markings for Fire and Emergency Equipment, Etc.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 78.47-47</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed] </ITAG>53. By removing andSection; 78.47-47.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 78.47-50</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed] </ITAG>54. By removing andSection; 78.47-50.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 78.47-51</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed] </ITAG>55. By removing andSection; 78.47-51. 56. By revising andSection; 78.47-60 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 78.47-60</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Lifeboats and rescue boats. </ITAG>(a) The following must be plainly marked or painted on each side of thebow of each lifeboat and rescue boat in letters and numbers at least 75mm (3 in.) high: (1) The name of the vessel. (2) The number of the boat. The boats on each side of the vessel must benumbered from forward to aft. If there are boats on both sides of the vessel,the odd numbers must be on the starboard side. (3) For vessels in ocean service, the name of the port required to be markedon the stern of the vessel under Subpart 67.13 of this chapter. (b) The following must be plainly marked or painted on each side of thebow of each lifeboat and rescue boat in letters and numbers at least 35mm (1.5 in.) high: (1) The length and beam of the boat. (2) The number of persons capacity of the boat. This number must_ (i) Be the number of persons the lifeboat is equipped for; and (ii) Not be greater than the number of persons the boat is approved for,as shown on its nameplate. (c) The following must be plainly marked or painted on each lifeboat andrescue boat in at least two places visible from above the boat in lettersand numbers not less than 75 mm (3 in.) high: (1) The number of persons capacity of the boat. (2) The name of the vessel. (d) The name of the vessel must be plainly marked or painted on each oarand paddle. (e) On or before July 1, 1991, each lifeboat and rescue boat must be markedwith Type II retroreflective material approved under Subpart 164.018 ofthis chapter. The arrangement of the retroreflective material must meetIMO Resolution [LSR 19/WP.4, Annex 3]. 57. By adding a new andSection; 78.47-62 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 78.47-62</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Rigid liferafts. </ITAG>(a) The following must be plainly marked or painted near one entrance ofeach rigid liferaft in letters and numbers at least 75 mm (3 in.) high:(1) The name of the vessel.(2) The number of the liferaft. Liferafts stowed on the sides of the vesselmust be numbered in the same manner as the lifeboats. (3) For vessels in ocean service, the name of the port required to be markedon the stern of the vessel under Subpart 67.13 of this chapter. (b) The following must be plainly marked or painted near one entrance ofeach rigid liferaft in letters and numbers at least 35 mm (1.5 in.) high.(1) Either ``SOLAS A Pack'' or ``SOLAS B Pack'' depending upon its equipmentunder andSection; 199.143(b) or andSection; 199.143(c) of this chapter. (2) The length of the painter. (c) The number of persons capacity must be plainly marked or painted overeach entrance to each rigid liferaft in letters and numbers at least 100mm (4 in.) high, in a color contrasting to that of the liferaft. This numbermust_ (1) Be the number of persons the liferaft is equipped for; and (2) Not be greater than the number of persons the liferaft is approvedfor, as shown on its nameplate. (d) The name of the vessel must be plainly marked or painted on each paddle.58. By revising andSection; 78.47-63 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 78.47-63</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Inflatable liferafts. </ITAG>The number of the liferaft and the number of persons it is permitted toaccommodate must be marked or painted in a conspicuous place in the immediatevicinity of each inflatable liferaft in letters and numbers at least 35mm (1.5 in.) high. Liferafts stowed on the sides of the vessel must benumbered in the same manner as the lifeboats. This marking must not beon the inflatable liferaft container. 59. By adding a new andSection; 78.47-64 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 78.47-64</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Life floats and buoyant apparatus. </ITAG>(a) The name of the vessel must be plainly marked or painted on each lifefloat and buoyant apparatus, together with their oars and paddles. (b) The number of persons capacity must be plainly marked or painted oneach life float and buoyant apparatus in letters and numbers at least 35mm (1.5 in.) high. This number must-(1) Be the number of persons the device is equipped for; and (2) Not be greater than the number of persons the device is approved for,as shown on its nameplate. 60. By revising andSection; 78.47-65 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 78.47-65</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Lifejackets, immersion suits, and ring life buoys. </ITAG>(a) Each lifejacket, immersion suit, and ring life buoy must be markedin block capital letters with the vessel's name. (b) Each container for lifejackets and immersion suits must be marked inletters and numbers at least 50 mm (2 in.) high with the number and identificationof the items stowed inside and their size. (c) Each ring life buoy on a vessel in ocean service must be marked inblock capital letters with the name of the port required to be marked onthe stern of the vessel under Subpart 67.13 of this chapter. (d) Each stowage position for a ring life buoy must be marked ``LIFE BUOY''.(e) Each lifejacket must be marked with Type I retroreflective materialapproved under Subpart 164.018 of this chapter. The arrangement of theretroreflective material must meet IMO Resolution [LSR 19/WP.4, Annex 3].(f) On or before July l, 1991, each ring life buoy must be marked withType II retroreflective material approved under Subpart 164.018 of thischapter. The arrangement of the retroreflective material must meet IMOResolution [LSR 19/WP.4, Annex 3].<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note: </T4>Each approved immersion suit is provided with retroreflectivematerial by the manufacturer of the suit.</ITAG>61. By revising andSection; 78.47-72 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 78.47-72</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">EPIRBs and SARTs. </ITAG>The name of the vessel must be plainly marked or painted on each EmergencyPosition Indicating Radio Beacon (EPIRB) and on each Search and RescueTransponder (SART), except for an EPIRB or SART_(a) In an inflatable liferaft; or (b) Permanently installed in a survival craft.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 78.49-1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed] </ITAG>62. By removing Subpart 78.49 (consisting of andSection; 78.49-1).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;andSection; 78.87-1, 78.87-5, and 78.87-10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed] </ITAG>63. By removing Subpart 78.87 (consisting of andSection;andSection; 78.87-1,78.87-5, and 78.87-10). 64. By adding a new Subpart 78.95 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart 78.95_Operational Readiness, Maintenance and Inspection ofLifesaving Equipment </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 78.95-20</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Operational readiness. </ITAG>(a) Except as provided in andSection; 78.95-30(e), each lifesaving applianceand each item of survival craft, rescue boat, life float, and buoyant apparatusequipment must be in good working order and ready for immediate use beforethe vessel leaves port and at all times when the vessel is in navigation.(b) Each deck where lifeboats, liferafts, life floats, and buoyant apparatusare stowed or boarded must be kept clear of obstructions that would interferewith the boarding and launching of the lifesaving appliances. (c) If lifeboats are used to carry persons to and from the vessel whenthe vessel is in a harbor or at an anchorage, there must be a sufficientnumber of lifeboats and liferafts available for use to accommodate allpersons remaining on board. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 78.95-30</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Maintenance. </ITAG>(a) The manufacturer's instructions for onboard maintenance of lifesavingappliances must be onboard and must include the following for each appliance_(1) Checklists for use when carrying out the inspections required underandSection; 78.95-70(a); (2) Maintenance and repair instructions; (3) A schedule of periodic maintenance; (4) A diagram of lubrication points with the recommended lubricants; (5) A list of replaceable parts; (6) A list of sources of spare parts; and (7) A log for records of inspections and maintenance. (b) The master shall make sure that maintenance is carried out in accordancewith the instructions required under paragraph (a) of this section. (c) For lifesaving appliances constructed on or before July l, 1986, paragraph(a) of this section need only be complied with to the extent that the manufacturer'sinstructions are available. (d) The OCMI may accept, instead of the instructions required under paragraph(a) of this section, a shipboard planned maintenance program that includesthe items listed in that paragraph. (e) If lifeboats, rescue boats, and rigid liferafts are maintained andrepaired while the vessel is underway, there must be a sufficient numberof lifeboats and liferafts available for use to accommodate all personson board. (f) Except in an emergency, extensive repairs or alterations must not bemade to any lifesaving appliance without advance notification of the OCMI.Insofar as possible, each repair or alteration must be made in accordancewith the requirements for the lifesaving appliance in Subchapter Q of thischapter. The OCMI may require each lifesaving appliance that has been alteredor extensively repaired to be subjected to each test for the appliancein Subchapter Q of this chapter that is affected by the repair or alteration.(g) The master shall report each emergency repair or alteration to a lifesavingappliance as soon as practicable to the OCMI in the next port in the UnitedStates where the vessel calls. If the vessel does not regularly call atports in the United States, the report must be made to the OCMI responsiblefor one of the foreign ports where the vessel calls.(h) A lifeboat or rigid liferaft must not be repaired or reconditionedfor use on a vessel other than the one it was originally built for, unlessspecifically permitted by the OCMI. If required by the OCMI, the repairor reconditioning of the lifeboat or rigid liferaft must be made underthe OCMI's supervision.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 78.95-40</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Maintenance of falls.</ITAG>(a) Each fall used in a launching appliance must be turned end for endat intervals of not more than 30 months.(b) Each fall must be renewed when necessary due to deterioration or atintervals of not more than 5 years, whichever is the earlier.(c) Each fall must have a corrosion-resistant tag with the following permanentlymarked on it:(1) The date the new fall was installed.(2) If the fall has been turned end for end, the date it was turned.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 78.95-50</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Spare parts and repair equipment.</ITAG>Spare parts and repair equipment must be provided for each lifesaving applianceand component subject to excessive wear or consumption and that needs tobe replaced regularly. These parts and equipment must be kept on boardthe vessel, or, if the vessel operates daily out of the same shore base,these parts and equipment may be kept at the shore base.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 78.95-60</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Weekly maintenance and inspection.</ITAG>The following tests and inspections must be carried out weekly:(a) Each survival craft, rescue boat and launching appliance must be visuallyinspected to ensure its readiness for use.(b) Each lifeboat engine and rescue boat engine must be run ahead and asternfor not less than 3 min., unless the ambient temperature is below the minimumtemperature required for starting the engine.(c) The general alarm system must be tested.(d) Each battery for lifeboat and rescue boat engine starting, searchlights,fixed lifeboat radio installations, and portable radio apparatus must bebrought up to full charge at least once each week if_(1) The battery is of a type that requires recharging; and(2) The battery is not connected to a device that keeps it continuouslycharged.(e) The transmitter of each fixed lifeboat radio installation and portableradio apparatus must be tested at least once each week using a dummy antennaload.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 78.95-70</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Monthly inspections.</ITAG>(a) Each lifesaving appliance, including lifeboat equipment, must be inspectedmonthly using the checklist required under andSection; 78.95-30(a)(1) tomake sure it is complete and in good order. A report of the inspection,including a statement as to the condition of the equipment, must be recordedin the vessel's official logbook.(b) Each EPIRB and each SART other than an EPIRB or SART in an inflatableliferaft, must be tested monthly. The EPIRB must be tested using the integratedtest circuit and output indicator to determine that it is operative.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 78.95-73</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Quarterly inspections.</ITAG>(a) Each lifeboat winch control apparatus, including motor controllers,emergency switches, master switches, and limit switches must be examinedonce each three months.(b) The examination must include the removal of drain plugs and the openingof drain valves to make sure that enclosures are free of water.(c) The date of the examination required under this section and the conditionof the equipment must be noted in the official logbook.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 78.95-75</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Annual inspection and repair.</ITAG>(a) Each lifeboat, rescue boat, rigid liferaft, buoyant apparatus, andlife float must be stripped, cleaned, and thoroughly inspected and repairedas needed at least once each year, including emptying and cleaning of eachfuel tank, and refilling it with fresh fuel.(b) Each davit, winch, fall and other launching appliance must be thoroughlyinspected and repaired as needed once each year.(c) Each item of survival equipment with an expiration date must be replacedduring the annual inspection and repair if the expiration date has passed.(d) Each battery used in an item of survival equipment and clearly markedwith a date identified as an expiration date must be replaced during theannual inspection and repair if the expiration date has passed.(e) Except for a storage battery used in a lifeboat or rescue boat, eachbattery without an expiration date used in an item of survival equipmentmust be replaced during the annual inspection and repair.(f) The requirements in this section do not relieve the master or personin charge of the requirement under andSection; 78.95-20(a) to keep the equipmentready for immediate use.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 78.95-80</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Servicing of inflatable liferafts, inflatable buoyant apparatus, inflatablelifejackets and inflated rescue boats.</ITAG>(a) Each inflatable liferaft, inflatable lifejacket, and hybrid inflatablelifejacket or work vest must be serviced_(1) Within 12 months of its initial packing; and(2) Within 12 months of each subsequent servicing, except when servicingis delayed until the next scheduled inspection of the vessel, providedthat the delay does not exceed 5 months.(b) Each inflatable liferaft must be serviced_(1) Whenever the container of the raft is damaged, or the straps or sealbroken; and(2) In accordance with the servicing procedure under Subpart 160.051 ofthis chapter. (c) Each inflatable lifejacket must be serviced in accordance with theservicing procedure under Subpart 160.076 of this chapter. (d) Each hybrid inflatable lifejacket or work vest must be serviced inaccordance with the servicing procedure under Subpart 160.077 of this chapter.(e) Repair and maintenance of inflated rescue boats must be in accordancewith the manufacturer's instructions. All repairs must be made at a servicingfacility approved by the Commandant (G-MVI), except for emergency repairscarried out on board the vessel. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 78.95-90</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Periodic servicing of hydrostatic release units. </ITAG>(a) Each hydrostatic release unit must be serviced_ (1) Within 12 months of its manufacture and within 12 months of each subsequentservicing, except when servicing is delayed until the next scheduled inspectionof the vessel, provided that the delay does not exceed 5 months; and (2) In accordance with the repair and testing procedures under Subpart160.062 of this chapter. (b) The springs of each spring-tensioned gripe used with a hydrostaticrelease unit must be renewed when the unit is serviced and tested. <ITAG tagnum="72">SUBCHAPTER I_CARGO AND MISCELLANEOUS VESSELS  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 90_GENERAL PROVISIONS </ITAG>65. The authority citation for Part 90 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>46 U.S.C. 3306, 3703; 49 CFR 1.46.</ITAG>66. By adding a new Subpart 90.27 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart 90.27_Lifesaving Appliances and Arrangements </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 90.27-1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General. </ITAG>Lifesaving appliances and arrangements on cargo and miscellaneous vesselsmust meet Subchapter W of this chapter. <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 91_INSPECTION AND CERTIFICATION </ITAG>67. The authority citation for Part 91 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>46 U.S.C. 3306, 3703; 49 CFR 1.46. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart 91.20_Initial Inspection </ITAG>68. By revising paragraph (a)(1) of andSection; 91.20-20 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 91.20-20</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Specific tests and inspections. </ITAG>(a) * * * (1) The following tests and inspections and the tests and inspections inandSection; 91.25-15(a)(5) through andSection; 91.25-15(a)(9) must be conductedfor each initial inspection for certification. The tests and inspectionsunder paragraph (a)(1)(i) of this section must also be conducted when eachnew davit, winch, or other launching appliance is installed on the vessel.The test under paragraph (a)(1)(ii) of this section must also be conductedwhen each new lifeboat or rescue boat is installed on the vessel. The inspectionunder paragraph (a)(1)(vi) of this section must also be conducted wheneach new lifeboat, rescue boat, liferaft, davit, winch, or other launchingappliance is installed on the vessel. The test under paragraph (a)(1)(vii)of this section must also be conducted when each new life buoy quick releasedevice is installed on the vessel. (i) Each launching appliance using falls and a winch for a rescue boat,davit-launched liferaft, or lifeboat including any auxiliary davit systemfor a free-fall lifeboat must be tested as follows: (A) The lifeboat, rescue boat or davit-launched liferaft must be loadedwith all of its equipment or the deadweight equivalent. In addition, thedavit-launched liferaft must be loaded with a 75 kg (165 lb.) weight tosimulate the load of one person. A davit-launched liferaft is not requiredfor this test if an appropriate test weight is used. The boat or liferaftmust be lowered from the embarkation station and launched into the waterusing the normal launching procedure. If a test weight is substituted forthe davit-launched liferaft, the weight must be ``launched'' onto a surfacethat will support its weight. The rescue boat must then be loaded withthe deadweight equivalent of its full rescue boat complement using a weightof 75 kg (165 lb.) per person. In the case of a lifeboat or rescue boatlaunching appliance, the boat must then be recovered by the launching appliance.In the case of a liferaft launching appliance, the hand-operated quick-returnmechanism must be used to recover the fall. (<T3>1</T3>) There must be no deformation of or damage to the launchingappliance or its connections to the vessel. (<T3>2</T3>) The lowering speed must meet andSection; 199.153(j) of this chapter,and the falls must meet andSection; 199.153(g) of this chapter. For a multipledrum winch, the falls must wind off the drums at the same rate when lowering,and wind onto the drums evenly in a level wrap at the same rate when hoisting.(<T3>3</T3>) The release mechanism control in a boat must open all hookssimultaneously and release the boat into the water. (<T3>4</T3>) The automatic disengaging apparatus for a davit-launched liferaftmust open and release the liferaft or test weight after the apparatus isset to open automatically and the liferaft or test weight is set on thesurface. (<T3>5</T3>) The recovery of the boat must meet andSection; 199.153(1) ofthis chapter, and if the boat is a rescue boat, andSection; 199.160(d) ofthis chapter. (<T3>6</T3>) For each launching device equipped to recover a boat by power,including a launching device with a portable power source, the limit switchesor other safety devices must automatically cut off the power before theboat reaches the stops to avoid overstressing the falls and davits. (<T3>7</T3>) The hand-operated recovery gear for a lifeboat or rescue boatlaunching appliance must be capable of moving the boat into its stowedposition where the boat can be safely and properly secured.(<T3>8</T3>) The operation of the hand-operated quick-return mechanism ona davit-launched liferaft launching appliance must be smooth, rapid, andeasy enough for one person to recover the fall. (B) If the lowering of a lifeboat or rescue boat is controlled from withinthe boat by a control wire wound on an auxiliary drum on the winch, thelaunching of the boat must be tested with the boat loaded as under paragraph(a)(1)(i)(A) of this section, but with an operator inside. (<T3>1</T3>) The mass of the control wire must be sufficient to overcomethe friction of the sheaves used on the control wire when the launchingappliance is being operated by the on-deck controls. (<T3>2</T3>) The control wire must properly operate the winch brake. (<T3>3</T3>) The winch brake must not be affected by the mass of the fullyextended control wire. (<T3>4</T3>) There must be sufficient length of control wire available insidethe boat to operate the winch brake during all stages of lowering. (<T3>5</T3>) The free end of the control wire must be retained within theboat until the boat is released from the falls by the operator. (C) The test procedure under paragraph (a)(1)(i)(A) of this section mustbe repeated with the lifeboat, rescue boat or liferaft loaded with weightequivalent to all of its equipment and full complement of persons, plus10% of the total weight of the loaded boat or liferaft. In the case ofa davit-launched liferaft, the automatic disengaging apparatus must beset to release. The on-deck launching controls must be used for this test,with the boat or liferaft being stopped after it has reached its maximumlowering speed, and then at approximately 2 m (6 ft.) intervals. In thecase of a lifeboat or rescue boat, when the boat reaches a position justabove the water, it must be released from the falls using the on-load releasemechanism control. (<T3>1</T3>) There must be no deformation of or damage to the launchingappliance or its connections to the vessel. (<T3>2</T3>) The lowering speed must meet andSection;andSection; 199.153(i)and 199.153(k) of this chapter, and the falls must meet andSection; 199.153(g)of this chapter. (<T3>3</T3>) The launching appliance must bring the boat or raft to a stopwithin 1 m (39 in.) by application of the brake by the winch counterweightalone. (<T3>4</T3>) The brake action must be smooth and positive. (<T3>5</T3>) The brake must be always applied unless the operator, or amechanism activated by the operator, holds the brake control in the ``off''position. (<T3>6</T3>) The boat or raft must begin to lower each time the brake isreleased. No additional force is permitted. (<T3>7</T3>) The release mechanism control in a boat must open all hookssimultaneously and release the boat into the water. (<T3>8</T3>) The automatic disengaging apparatus for a davit-launched liferaftmust not release the liferaft or test weight until the liferaft or testweight is set on the surface. (D) The release apparatus for a davit launched liferaft must be testedto determine that it will release under a towing strain. The liferaft ortest weight loaded as required under paragraph (a)(1)(i)(C) of this sectionmust be suspended just above the surface and the release apparatus setto open automatically. A horizontal towing strain sufficient to pull thefalls 5anddegrees; from vertical must be applied to the liferaft or testweight and the liferaft lowered. The release apparatus must release theliferaft or test weight as it is set on the surface. (E) If any winch brake surface is exposed to the weather, the test underparagraph (a)(1)(i)(C) of this section must be conducted with the brakesurfaces dry and repeated with the brake surfaces wet. The brake must stopthe winch when the brake surface is wet, but the stopping distance requirementdoes not apply. (ii) Each free-fall launched lifeboat and launching system must be testedas follows with the vessel at its lightest seagoing draft: (A) The lifeboat loaded with only its normal equipment or the deadweightequivalent of the equipment, must be launched into the water. After launching,the boat must be retrieved and examined. (<T3>1</T3>) The free-fall release mechanism must operate properly and releasethe boat from the launching appliance. (<T3>2</T3>) The launching system must operate smoothly, must launch theboat into the water at the intended angle, and must not show any evidenceof improper operation. (<T3>3</T3>) The lifeboat must not show any evidence of instability in theair or in the water. (<T3>4</T3>) There must be no deformation of or damage to the lifeboat,the launching appliance or its connections to the vessel. (B) The procedure under paragraph (a)(1)(ii)(A) of this section must berepeated with each seat in the lifeboat loaded with 75 kg (165 lb.) ofdeadweight properly secured in place to simulate the weight of one person.(<T3>1</T3>) The inspections required under paragraphs (a)(1)(ii)(A)(<T3>1</T3>) through (a)(1)(ii)(A)(<T3>4</T3>) of this section must be performed. (<T3>2</T3>) Each seat and its mounting arrangements must be closely inspected.There must be no deformation or damage to any seat or its mounting arrangements.(<T3>3</T3>) If the inspector has reason to believe that the boat is notbeing launched in a safe and proper manner, the inspector may order thetest under this paragraph (paragraph (a)(1)(ii)(B) of this section) tobe repeated with the boat instrumented with acceleration monitoring equipment.The data must be compared with the approval test data to determine whetheror not the boat is being launched in a safe and proper manner. (C) The procedure under paragraph (a)(1)(ii)(A) of this section must berepeated with at least one operator aboard the lifeboat. The rest of theseats in the lifeboat must be empty, loaded with deadweight, or with personnelto the satisfaction of the inspector. The launching of the lifeboat mustbe completely controlled by the personnel in the lifeboat. (<T3>1</T3>) The inspections required under paragraphs (a)(1)(ii)(A)(<T3>1</T3>) through (a)(1)(ii)(A)(<T3>4</T3>) of this section must be performed. (<T3>2</T3>) There must be no injury to any of the personnel in the lifeboat.(iii) Each lifeboat and rescue boat must be operated in the water for atleast 2 hr. During this time, the propulsion system must be operated bothforward and astern. At least l hr. of this running time must be with thepropulsion system operating at full speed. Each boat system such as anypowered bilge pump, water spray system, or air supply system must be operated.(A) The boat and each of its systems must operate properly without overheatingor being damaged. (B) The boat must not have any evident leakage through the hull or aroundany through-hull fitting. (iv) An abandon-ship simulation must be held to determine that all survivalcraft required for abandonment by the total number of persons permittedon board, can be launched with their full complement of persons and equipmentwithin 10 min. from the time the abandon-ship signal is given. (A) This simulation must include loading and launching of sufficient survivalcraft to demonstrate that the requirement can be met. (B) This test is not required if the Coast Guard has witnessed a successfultest on a sister vessel with the same lifesaving appliance arrangements.(v) One lifeboat and one rescue boat of each type on board must be launchedwith the vessel proceeding at a speed of approximately 5 knots. No particularloading of the boat is required. The boat must not give any indicationthat it is unstable or out of control during the launching procedure. (vi) The installation of each lifeboat, rescue boat, liferaft and launchingappliance must be inspected to determine that it meets each condition ofits approval, as listed on its Certificate of Approval (Form CGHQ 10030).(vii) The quick release device for ring life buoys required for certainvessels under andSection; 199.70(c) of this chapter, must be tested to demonstratethat the ring life buoy and its attachments drop clear of the side of thevessel when released. A self-activating smoke signal is not required forthis test if a dummy device of comparable size and weight is used. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart 91.25_Inspection for Certification </ITAG>69. By revising andSection; 91.25-15 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 91.25-15</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Lifesaving equipment. </ITAG>(a) At each inspection for certification, the following inspections andtests must be conducted in the presence of a marine inspector, or as otherwisedirected by the OCMI: (1) Each air tank provided for buoyancy on a lifeboat, liferaft, buoyantapparatus or life float, must be tested and demonstrated to be airtight.(2) Each lifeboat and rescue boat gravity davit including each auxiliarydavit system for a free-fall lifeboat, and each davit-launched liferaftlaunching device must be used to lower the boat or liferaft from its stowedposition to a point near the water using the on-deck launching appliancecontrols. This test must be conducted twice; once with the boat or liferaftloaded with all equipment and additional weight of not more than one person,and a second time with the weight of a full load of persons and equipment.A davit-launched liferaft is not required for this test if an appropriatetest weight is used. During the lowering, the brake must be applied andreleased at least five times. (i) The launching appliance must bring the boat, liferaft, or test weightto a stop by application of the brake by the winch counterweight alone.(ii) The brake action must be smooth and positive. (iii) The brake must be always applied unless the operator, or a mechanismactivated by the operator, holds the brake control in the ``off'' position.(iv) Lowering must begin each time the brake is released. No additionalforce is permitted. (3) Each lifeboat and rescue boat on a davit must be lowered to a pointjust above the water and evenly loaded until the total weight of the boatequals the ``B'' weight on the boat data plate. If the boat is equippedwith mechanical disengaging apparatus, the release mechanism control mustbe operated and must open all hooks simultaneously and release the boatinto the water properly. There must be no evident damage or deformationof the boat, the launching appliance, or its connections to the vessel.(4) Each free-fall launched lifeboat and launching system must be testedwith the lifeboat loaded with only its normal equipment or the deadweightequivalent of the equipment. The lifeboat must be launched into the water.After launching, the boat must be retrieved and examined.(i) The free-fall release mechanism must operate properly and release theboat from the launching appliance. (ii) The launching system must operate smoothly, must launch the boat intothe water at the intended angle, and must not show any evidence of improperoperation. (iii) The lifeboat must not show any evidence of instability in the airor in the water. (iv) There must be no deformation of or damage to the lifeboat, the launchingappliance or its connections to the vessel. (5) The procedure under paragraph (a)(4) of this section must be repeatedwith each seat in the lifeboat loaded with 75 kg (165 lb.) of deadweightproperly secured in place to simulate the weight of one person. (i) The inspections required under paragraphs (a)(4)(i) through (a)(4)(iv)of this section must be performed. (ii) Each seat and its mounting arrangements must be closely inspected.There must be no deformation or damage to any seat or its mounting arrangements.(6) If the inspector has reason to believe that the free-fall boat is notbeing launched in a safe and proper manner, the inspector may order thetest under paragraphs (a)(4) and (a)(5) of this section to be repeatedwith the boat instrumented with acceleration monitoring equipment. Thedata must be compared with the approval test data to determine whetheror not the boat is being launched in a safe and proper manner. (7) The procedure under paragraph (a)(4) of this section must be repeatedwith at least one operator aboard the lifeboat. The rest of the seats inthe lifeboat must either be empty, loaded with deadweight, or with personnelto the satisfaction of the inspector. The launching of the lifeboat mustbe completely controlled by the personnel in the lifeboat. (A) The inspections required under paragraphs (a)(4)(i) through (a)(4)(iv)of this section must be performed. (B) There must be no injury to any of the personnel in the lifeboat. (8) Each davit-launched liferaft launching appliance must be loaded witha weight equal to the liferaft loaded with its full load of persons andequipment. The weight must be lowered to a point just above the water,dock or other surface that will support the weight. The automatic disengagingapparatus control must be set to release, and must open when the weightis lowered to and supported by the surface. There must be no evident damageor deformation of the release mechanism, launching appliance, or its connectionsto the vessel. (9) Each lifejacket, immersion suit, and work vest must be examined todetermine that it is in serviceable condition. Each lifejacket, immersionsuit, and work vest not in serviceable condition must be either repaired,or destroyed and removed from the vessel. The marine inspector may markthe lifejackets, immersion suits, and work vests to indicate that theyhave been inspected and passed. (10) The control apparatus for each electrically-controlled launching appliancewinch must be opened, inspected, and determined to be in serviceable condition.(11) Each inflatable liferaft and inflatable lifejacket must be inspectedto determine that it has been serviced under andSection; 97.90-80 of thischapter. (12) Each hydrostatic release unit must be inspected to determine thatit has been serviced under andSection; 97.90-90 of this chapter. (13) Each other item of lifesaving equipment on the vessel must be inspectedto determine that it is in serviceable condition. Each item not in serviceablecondition must be repaired or replaced. Each item of survival equipmentwith an expiration date on it must be replaced if the expiration date haspassed. (14) An abandon-ship drill must be held. The marine inspector specifiesthe nature of the emergency to be simulated. <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 94_LIFESAVING EQUIPMENT </ITAG>70. By removing and reserving Part 94.70a. The following Table of Contents for Part 97 reflects new or revisedsubparts to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 97_OPERATIONS</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart 97.00_Incorporation by reference</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">97.00-1 Incorporation by reference.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart 97.13_Emergency Signals</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">97.13-1 Emergency signals.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart 97.14_Manning of Survival Craft and Supervision</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">97.14-1 Certificate of proficiency.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">97.14-5 Manning and supervision.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="76">Subpart 97.90_Operational Readiness, Maintenance and Inspection ofLifesaving Equipment</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">97.90-20 Operational readiness.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">97.90-30 Maintenance.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">97.90-40 Maintenance of falls.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">97.90-50 Spare parts and repair equipment.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">97.90-60 Weekly inspection.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">97.90-70 Monthly inspections.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">97.90-73 Quarterly inspections.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">97.90-75 Annual inspection and repair.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">97.90-80 Servicing of inflatable liferafts, inflatable lifejacketsand inflated rescue boats.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">97.90-90 Periodic servicing of hydrostatic release units.</ITAG>71. The authority citation for Part 97 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4> Authority: </T4>46 U.S.C. 3306, 3703, 6101, 8105; 49 CFR 1.46.</ITAG>72. By adding Subpart 97.00 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart 97.00 Incorporation by reference. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 97.00-1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Incorporation by reference. </ITAG>(a) Certain materials are incorporated by reference into this part withthe approval of the Director of the Federal Register in accordance with5 U.S.C. 552(a). To enforce any edition other than the one listed in paragraph(b) of this section, notice of change must be published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> and the material made available to the public.All approved material is on file at the Office of the Federal Register,1100 L Street, NW., Washington, DC, and at the U.S. Coast Guard, MerchantVessel Inspection Division (G-MVI), 2100 Second Street, SW., Washington,DC 20593-0001, and is available from the sources indicated in paragraph(b) of this section. (b) The material approved for incorporation by reference in this part,and the sections affected are: <ITAG tagnum="73">American Society for Testing and Materials </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1916 Race St., Philadelphia, PA 19103. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">ASTM D93-80, Test for Flash Point by Pennsky-Martens Closed Tester:97.15-55. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">International Maritime Organization (IMO) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Publications Section, 4 Albert Embankment, London SE1 7SR, England.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Resolution [LSR 19/WP.4, Annex 3], ``Guidelines Concerning the Useand Fitting of Retroreflective Materials on Life-saving Appliances'', June1987: 97.37-37; 97.37-43.</ITAG>73. By revising Subpart 97.13 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart 97.13_Emergency Signals </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 97.13-1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Emergency signals. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>The various signals used to call the crew to their stationsand to give instructions to the crew must be listed on the station billrequired under andSection; 199.80 of this chapter. The signals must be asfollows: (1) The fire and emergency signal must consist of a continuous blast ofthe whistle for not less than 10 seconds followed by the continuous ringingof the general alarm bells for not less than 10 seconds. (2) The signal for dismissal from fire alarm stations must consist of ringingof the general alarm bells three times, followed by three short blastsof the whistle. (3) The signal for boat stations or boat drill must consist of a successionof more than six short blasts, followed by one long blast of the whistle,followed by the same signal on the general alarm bells. (4) A man-overboard signal must be established. (5) An abandon-ship signal must be established. (6) The signal to lower lifeboats or davit launched liferafts must consistof one short blast of the whistle.(7) The signal to stop lowering lifeboats or davit launched liferafts mustconsist of two short blasts of the whistle. (8) The signal for dismissal from boat stations must consist of three shortblasts of the whistle. (9) Each other emergency signal established must not conflict with navigationalsignals or other general alarm signals. (b) <T3>River service. </T3>For vessels in river service where a whistle isnot used, the ship's bell must be used for the whistle signals describedin this section. 74. By revising Subpart 97.14 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart 97.14_Manning of Survival Craft and Supervision </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 97.14-1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Certificate of proficiency. </ITAG>A merchant mariner's document endorsement as a lifeboatman or another inclusiverating under Part 12 of this Title is evidence of training in survivalcraft and serves as a certificate of proficiency. For the purposes of thissubpart, a ``certificated person'' is a person holding a merchant mariner'sdocument with such an endorsement. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 97.14-5 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Manning and supervision. </ITAG>(a) There must be a sufficient number of trained persons on board for musteringand assisting untrained persons. (b) There must be a sufficient number of deck officers, able seamen, orcertificated persons on board to operate the survival craft and launchingarrangements required for abandonment by the total number of persons permittedon board. (c) One person must be placed in charge of each survival craft to be used.(1) Except for vessels in river service, the person in command must bea deck officer, able seaman, or certificated person. (2) A deck officer, able seaman, or certificated person must be designatedsecond-in-command for_ (i) Each lifeboat on a vessel in ocean service; and (ii) Except on a vessel in river service, each lifeboat permitted to carrymore than 40 persons. (3) Each vessel that carries passengers and is not in river service, musthave at least one deck officer, able seaman, or certificated person forevery 20 passengers assigned to each lifeboat. (d) The person in charge of each survival craft shall have a list of thesurvival craft crew and shall see that the crewmembers are acquainted withtheir duties. The second-in-command of a lifeboat shall also have a listof the lifeboat crew. (e) Each motorized survival craft must have a person assigned who is capableof operating the engine and carrying out minor adjustments. (f) The master shall make sure the persons required under paragraphs (a),(b), and (c) of this section are equitably distributed among the vessel'ssurvival craft. <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart 97.15_Tests, Drills, and Inspections </ITAG>75. By removing paragraph (a)(3) of andSection; 97.15-25. 76. By revising andSection; 97.15-35 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 97.15-35 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Abandon-ship training and drills. </ITAG>(a) Abandon-ship training material must be on board each vessel. The trainingmaterial must consist either of a manual of one or more volumes, or audio-visualtraining aids, or both. (1) The training material must contain instructions and information onthe lifesaving appliances on the vessel and on the best methods of survival.A training manual must be written in easily understood terms, illustratedwherever possible. (2) If a training manual is used, a copy must be in each crew messroomand recreation room or in each crew cabin. If audio-visual training aidsare used they must be incorporated in the onboard training sessions underparagraph (d) of this section. (3) The training material must explain the following in detail: (i) Donning of the lifejackets and immersion suits carried on board. (ii) Muster at the assigned stations. (iii) Boarding, launching, and clearing the survival craft and rescue boats.(iv) Method of launching from within the survival craft. (v) Release from launching appliances. (vi) Method and use of devices for protection in launching areas, whereappropriate. (vii) Illumination in launching areas. (viii) Use of all survival equipment. (ix) Use of all detection equipment. (x) With illustrations, the use of radio lifesaving appliances. (xi) Use of sea anchors. (xii) Use of engine and accessories. (xiii) Recovery of survival craft and rescue boats including stowage andsecuring. (xiv) Hazards of exposure and the need for warm clothing. (xv) Best use of the survival craft for survival. (xvi) Methods of retrieval, including the use of helicopter rescue gear(slings, baskets, stretchers), breeches-buoy and shore lifesaving apparatusand vessel's line-throwing apparatus. (xvii) All other functions contained in the muster list and emergency instructions.(xviii) Instructions for emergency repair of the lifesaving appliances.(b) An abandon-ship drill must be conducted on each vessel in alternatingweeks. If a drill can not be held during the appointed week due to badweather or other unavoidable reason, the drill must be conducted at thefirst opportunity following the time when the drill would normally havebeen held. (1) Any member of the crew excused from an abandon-ship drill must participatein the next drill, so that each member participates in at least one abandon-shipdrill each month. If more than 25% of the crew have not participated inan abandon-ship drill on board that particular vessel in the previous month,a drill must be conducted before the vessel leaves port if reasonable andpracticable, but not later than 24 hours after the vessel leaves port.The Commandant (G-MVI) may accept other arrangements that are at leastequivalent for those vessels where this is impractical. (2) On a vessel on an international voyage, musters of the passengers musttake place within 24 hours after their embarkation. Passengers must beinstructed in the use of the lifejackets and the action to take in an emergency.The passengers must be encouraged to participate fully in the abandon-shipdrill. If only a small number of passengers embark at a port after themuster has been held, the attention of these passengers must be drawn tothe emergency instructions required under andSection; 199.80(a) and 199.80(c)of this chapter if another muster is not held. (3) On each vessel not on an international voyage, a muster of the passengersmust be held on departure, or else_ (i) For voyages of more than one day's duration, musters of the passengersmust be in accordance with paragraph (b)(2) of this section as for vesselson an international voyage; and (ii) For voyages of less than one day'sduration, the attention of the passengers must be drawn to the emergencyinstructions required under andSection; 199.80(a) and 199.80(c) of this chapter.(4) Each abandon-ship drill must include: (i) Summoning of passengers and crew to muster stations with the generalalarm and making sure that they are made aware of the order to abandon-shipas specified in the station bill.(ii) Simulation of an abandon-ship emergency which varies from drill todrill.(iii) Reporting to stations, preparing for, and demonstrating the dutiesassigned under the procedure described in the station bill for the particularabandon-ship emergency being simulated.(iv) Checking to see that passengers and crew are suitably dressed.(v) Checking to see that lifejackets are correctly donned.(vi) Lowering of at least one lifeboat after any necessary preparationfor launching. The lifeboat must be lowered at least to the extent wherethe davit head has completed its travel and the fall wire has begun topay out.(vii) Starting and operating the lifeboat engine.(viii) Operation of davits used for launching liferafts.(5) Different lifeboats must, as far as practicable, be lowered to meetparagraph (b)(4)(vi) of this section at successive drills.(6) Each abandon-ship drill must, as far as practicable, be conducted asif there were an actual emergency.(7) Each lifeboat must be launched with its assigned operating crew aboardand maneuvered in the water at least once every 3 months during an abandon-shipdrill.(8) Each rescue boat that is not also a lifeboat must be launched withits assigned crew aboard and maneuvered in the water_(i) Once each month, if reasonable and practicable; but(ii) At least once every 3 months.(9) If lifeboat and rescue boat launching drills are carried out with thevessel making headway, such drills must, because of the dangers involved,be practiced only in waters where it is safe, under the supervision ofan officer experienced in such drills.(10) At least one drill every 3 months must be held at night, unless themaster determines it is unsafe.(11) Emergency lighting for mustering and abandonment must be tested ateach abandon-ship drill.(c) The master of a vessel carrying immersion suits shall make sure that_(1) Each crew member either_(i) Wears an immersion suit in at least one abandon-ship drill per monthunless it is impracticable due to warm weather; or(ii) Participates in at least one immersion suit drill per month that includesdonning an immersion suit and being instructed in its use;(2) In each abandon-ship drill, each passenger on board is instructed inthe use of immersion suits; and(3) Each passenger is told at the beginning of the voyage where immersionsuits are stowed on board and is encouraged to read the instructions fordonning and use of the immersion suits.(d) Each crew member on board the vessel must be given training in theuse of lifesaving appliances and the duties assigned in the station bill.(1) Except as provided under paragraph (d)(2) of this section, onboardtraining in the use of the vessel's lifesaving appliances, including survivalcraft equipment, must be given to each crew member as soon as possiblebut not later than 2 weeks after the crew member joins the vessel.(2) If a crew member is on a regularly scheduled rotating assignment toa vessel, onboard training in the use of the vessel's lifesaving appliances,including survival craft equipment, must be given to the crew member notlater than 2 weeks after the time the crew member first joins the vessel.(3) The crew must be instructed in the use of the vessel's lifesaving appliancesand in survival at sea on alternating weeks, normally in the weeks whenabandon-ship drills are not held. If individual instruction sessions coverdifferent parts of the vessel's lifesaving system, all the vessel's lifesavingequipment and appliances must be covered within each 2 month period. Eachmember of the crew must be instructed in at least_(i) Operation and use of the vessel's inflatable liferafts;(ii) Problems of hypothermia, first-aid treatment for hypothermia and otherappropriate first-aid procedures; and(iii) Special instructions necessary for use of the vessel's lifesavingappliances in severe weather and severe sea conditions.(4) Onboard training in the use of davit-launched liferafts must take placeat intervals of not more than 4 months on each vessel with davit-launchedliferafts. Whenever practicable this must include the inflation and loweringof a liferaft. If this liferaft is a special liferaft intended for trainingpurposes only, and is not part of the vessel's lifesaving equipment, thisliferaft must be conspicuously marked.(e) The date when musters are held, details of abandon-ship drills, drillsof other lifesaving appliances and onboard training must be recorded inthe vessel's official logbook. Each logbook entry must include the following,as applicable:(1) The time and date.(2) Length of drill or training session.(3) Identification of survival craft used in drills.(4) Subject of training session.(5) Statement as to the condition of the equipment used.(6) If a full muster, drill or training session is not held at the appointedtime, the circumstances and the extent of the muster, drill or trainingsession held.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 97.15-37</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed]</ITAG>77. By removing andSection; 97.15-37.78. By revising andSection; 97.15-40 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 97.15-40</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Fire drills.</ITAG>(a) A fire drill must be conducted on each vessel in alternating weeks.The fire drill must not be conducted as part of the abandon-ship drill,nor immediately prior to or after the abandon-ship drill. If a fire drillcannot be held during the appointed week due to bad weather or other unavoidablereason, the drill must be conducted at the first opportunity followingthe time when the drill would normally have been held.(b) Any member of the crew excused from a fire drill must participate inthe next drill, so that each member participates in at least one fire drilleach month. If more than 25% of the crew have not participated in a firedrill on board that particular vessel in the previous month, a drill mustbe conducted before the vessel leaves port if reasonable and practicable,but not later than 24 hours after the vessel leaves port. The Commandant(G-MVI) may accept other arrangements that are at least equivalent forthose vessels where this is impractical.(c) Each fire drill must include:(1) Summoning of passengers and crew to their stations with the generalalarm.(2) Simulation of a fire emergency which varies from drill to drill.(3) Reporting to stations, preparing for, and demonstrating the dutiesassigned under the procedure described in the station bill for the particularfire emergency being simulated.(4) Starting of fire pumps and use of a sufficient number of outlets todetermine that the system is in proper working order.(5) Bringing out each breathing apparatus and other item of rescue andsafety equipment from the emergency equipment lockers, and demonstratingthe use of each item by the person or persons designated to use it.(6) Operating each watertight door used while the vessel is underway.(7) Operation of each self-closing fire door.(8) Closing all fire doors and doors in fire boundaries.(d) Each fire drill must, as far as practicable, be conducted as if therewere an actual emergency.(e) The date when fire drills are held, and details of fire drills mustbe recorded in the vessel's official logbook. Each logbook entry must includethe following, as applicable:(1) The time and date.(2) Length of drill.(3) Number and lengths of hose used.(4) Statement as to the condition of the equipment used.(5) If a full drill is not held at the appointed time, the circumstancesand the extent of the drill held.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 97.15-45</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed]</ITAG>79. By removing andSection; 97.15-45.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 97.15-50</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed]</ITAG>80. By removing andSection; 97.15-50.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 97.15-65</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed]</ITAG>81. By removing andSection; 97.15-65.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 97.15-70</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed]</ITAG>82. By removing andSection; 97.15-70.83. By revising paragraphs (a)(1) and (a)(7) of andSection; 97.35-5 to readas follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 97.35-5</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Actions required to be logged.</ITAG>(a) * * *(1) Abandon-ship training and drills, and fire drills. As held. See andSection;andSection;97.15-35, and 97.15-40.<ITAG tagnum="37"> * * * * *</ITAG>(7) Survival craft winches. Once in each three months. See andSection; 97.90-73.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart 97.37_Markings for Fire and Emergency Equipment, Etc. </ITAG>84. By revising andSection; 97.37-37 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 97.37-37</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Lifeboats and rescue boats. </ITAG>(a) The following must be plainly marked or painted on each side of thebow of each lifeboat and rescue boat in letters and numbers at least 75mm (3 in.) high: (1) The name of the vessel. (2) The number of the boat. The boats on each side of the vessel must benumbered from forward to aft. If there are boats on both sides of the vessel,the odd numbers must be on the starboard side. (3) For vessels in ocean service, the name of the port required to be markedon the stern of the vessel under Subpart 67.13 of this chapter. (b) The following must be plainly marked or painted on each side of thebow of each lifeboat and rescue boat in letters and numbers at least 35mm (1.5 in.) high: (1) The length and beam of the boat. (2) The number of persons capacity of the boat. This number must_ (i) Be the number of persons the lifeboat is equipped for; and (ii) Not be greater than the number of persons the boat is approved for,as shown on its nameplate. (c) The following must be plainly marked or painted on each lifeboat andrescue boat in at least two places visible from above the boat in lettersand numbers not less than 75 mm (3 in.) high: (1) The number of persons capacity of the boat. (2) The name of the vessel. (d) The name of the vessel must be plainly marked or painted on each oarand paddle. (e) On or before July 1, 1991, each lifeboat and rescue boat must be markedwith Type II retroreflective material approved under Subpart 164.018 ofthis chapter. The arrangement of the retroreflective material must meetIMO Resolution (LSR 19/WP.4, Annex 3). 85. By adding a new andSection; 97.37-39 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 97.37-39</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Rigid liferafts. </ITAG>(a) The following must be plainly marked or painted near one entrance ofeach rigid liferaft in letters and numbers at least 75 mm (3 in.) high:(1) The name of the vessel. (2) The number of the liferaft. Liferafts stowed on the sides of the vesselmust be numbered in the same manner as the lifeboats. (3) For vessels in ocean service, the name of the port required to be markedon the stern of the vessel under Subpart 67.13 of this chapter. (b) The following must be plainly marked or painted near one entrance ofeach rigid liferaft in letters and numbers at least 35 mm (1.5 in.) high:(1) Either ``SOLAS A Pack'' or ``SOLAS B Pack'' depending upon its equipmentunder andSection; 199.143(b) or andSection; 199.143(c) of this chapter. (2) The length of the painter. (c) The number of persons capacity must be plainly marked or painted overeach entrance to each rigid liferaft in letters and numbers at least 100mm (4 in.) high, in a color contrasting to that of the liferaft. This numbermust_ (1) Be the number of persons the liferaft is equipped for; and (2) Not be greater than the number of persons the liferaft is approvedfor, as shown on its nameplate. (d) The name of the vessel must be plainly marked or painted on each paddle.86. By revising andSection; 97.37-40 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 97.37-40</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Inflatable liferafts. </ITAG>The number of the liferaft and the number of persons it is permitted toaccommodate must be marked or painted in a conspicuous place in the immediatevicinity of each inflatable liferaft in letters and numbers at least 35mm (1.5 in.) high. Liferafts stowed on the sides of the vessel must benumbered in the same manner as the lifeboats. This marking must not beon the inflatable liferaft container. 87. By adding a new andSection; 97.37-42 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 97.37-42</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Life floats and buoyant apparatus. </ITAG>(a) The name of the vessel must be plainly marked or painted on each lifefloat and buoyant apparatus, together with their oars and paddles. (b) The number of persons capacity must be plainly marked or painted oneach life float and buoyant apparatus in letters and numbers at least 35mm (1.5 in.) high. This number must_ (1) Be the number of persons the device is equipped for; and (2) Not be greater than the number of persons the device is approved for,as shown on its nameplate. 88. By revising andSection; 97.37-43 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 97.37-43</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Lifejackets, immersion suits, and ring life buoys. </ITAG>(a) Each lifejacket, immersion suit, and ring life buoy must be markedin block capital letters with the vessel's name. (b) Each container for lifejackets and immersion suits must be marked inletters and numbers at least 50 mm (2 in.) high with the number and identificationof the items stowed inside and their size. (c) Each ring life buoy on a vessel in ocean service must be marked inblock capital letters with the name of the port required to be marked onthe stern of the vessel under Subpart 67.13 of this chapter. (d) Each stowage position for a ring life buoy must be marked ``LIFE BUOY''.(e) Each lifejacket must be marked with Type I retroreflective materialapproved under Subpart 164.018 of this chapter. The arrangement of theretroreflective material must meet IMO Resolution (LSR 19/WP.4, Annex 3).(f) On or before July 1, 1991, each ring life buoy must be marked withType II retroreflective material approved under Subpart 164.018 of thischapter. The arrangement of the retroreflective material must meet IMOResolution (LSR 19/WP.4, Annex 3).<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note: </T4>Each approved immersion suit is provided with retroreflectivematerial by the manufacturer of the suit.</ITAG>89. By revising andSection; 97.37-55 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 97.37-55</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">EPIRBs and SARTs. </ITAG>The name of the vessel must be plainly marked or painted on each EmergencyPosition Indicating Radio Beacon (EPIRB) and on each Search and RescueTransponder (SART), except for an EPIRB or SART_ (a) In an inflatable liferaft; or (b) Permanently installed in a survival craft.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 97.39-1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed] </ITAG>90. By removing Subpart 97.39 (consisting of andSection;97.39-1).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;andSection; 97.85-1, 97.85-5, and 97.85-10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed] </ITAG>91. By removing Subpart 97.85 (consisting of andSection;andSection; 97.85-1,97.85-5, and 97.85-10). 92. By redesignating Subpart 97.90 as Subpart 97.85 and adding a new Subpart97.90 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart 97.90_Operational Readiness, Maintenance and Inspection ofLifesaving Equipment </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 97.90-20</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Operational readiness. </ITAG>(a) Except as provided in andSection; 97.90-30(e), each lifesaving applianceand each item of survival craft, rescue boat, life float, and buoyant apparatusequipment must be in good working order and ready for immediate use beforethe vessel leaves port and at all times when the vessel is in navigation.(b) Each deck where lifeboats, liferafts, life floats, and buoyant apparatusare stowed or boarded must be kept clear of obstructions that would interferewith the boarding and launching of the lifesaving appliances. (c) If lifeboats are used to carry persons to and from the vessel whenthe vessel is in a harbor or at an anchorage, there must be a sufficientnumber of lifeboats and liferafts available for use on each side of thevessel to accommodate all persons remaining on board. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 97.90-30</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Maintenance. </ITAG>(a) The manufacturer's instructions for onboard maintenance of lifesavingappliances must be onboard and must include the following for each appliance_(1) Checklists for use when carrying out the inspections required underandSection; 97.90-70(a); (2) Maintenance and repair instructions; (3) A schedule of periodic maintenance; (4) A diagram of lubrication points with the recommended lubricants; (5) A list of replaceable parts; (6) A list of sources of spare parts; and (7) A log for records of inspections and maintenance. (b) The master shall make sure that maintenance is carried out in accordancewith the instructions required under paragraph (a) of this section. (c) For lifesaving appliances constructed on or before July 1, 1986, paragraph(a) of this section need only be complied with to the extent that the manufacturer'sinstructions are available. (d) The OCMI may accept, instead of the instructions required under paragraph(a) of this section, a shipboard planned maintenance program that includesthe items listed in that paragraph. (e) If lifeboats, rescue boats, and rigid liferafts are maintained andrepaired while the vessel is underway, there must be a sufficient numberof lifeboats and liferafts available for use on each side of the vesselto accommodate all persons on board. (f) Except in an emergency, extensive repairs or alterations must not bemade to any lifesaving appliance without advance notification of the OCMI.Insofar as possible, each repair or alteration must be made in accordancewith the requirements for the lifesaving appliance in Subchapter Q of thischapter. The OCMI may require each lifesaving appliance that has been alteredor extensively repaired to be subjected to each test for the appliancein Subchapter Q of this chapter that is affected by the repair or alteration.(g) The master shall report each emergency repair or alteration to a lifesavingappliance as soon as practicable to the OCMI in the next port in the UnitedStates where the vessel calls. If the vessel does not regularly call atports in the the United States, the report must be made to the OCMI responsiblefor one of the foreign ports where the vessel calls.(h) A lifeboat or rigid liferaft must not be repaired or reconditionedfor use on a vessel other than the one it was originally built for, unlessspecifically permitted by the OCMI. If required by the OCMI, the repairor reconditioning of the lifeboat or rigid liferaft must be made underthe OCMI's supervision.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 97.90-40</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Maintenance of falls.</ITAG>(a) Each fall used in a launching appliance must be turned end for endat intervals of not more than 30 months.(b) Each fall must be renewed when necessary due to deterioration or atintervals of not more than 5 years, whichever is the earlier.(c) Each fall must have a corrosion-resistant tag with the following permanentlymarked on it:(1) The date the new fall was installed.(2) If the fall has been turned end for end, the date it was turned.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 97.90-50</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Spare parts and repair equipment.</ITAG>Spare parts and repair equipment must be provided for each lifesaving applianceand component subject to excessive wear or consumption and that needs tobe replaced regularly. These parts and equipment must be kept on boardthe vessel, or, if the vessel operates daily out of the same shore base,these parts and equipment may be kept at the shore base.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 97.90-60</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Weekly inspection.</ITAG>The following tests and inspections must be carried out weekly:(a) Each survival craft, rescue boat and launching appliance must be visuallyinspected to make sure it is ready for use.(b) Each lifeboat engine and rescue boat engine must be run ahead and asternfor not less than 3 min., unless the ambient temperature is below the minimumtemperature required for starting the engine.(c) The general alarm system must be tested. (d) Each battery for lifeboat and rescue boat engine starting, searchlights,fixed lifeboat radio installations, and portable radio apparatus must bebrought up to full charge at least once each week if_(1) The battery is of a type that requires recharging; and(2) The battery is not connected to a device that keeps it continuouslycharged.(e) The transmitter of each fixed lifeboat radio installation and portableradio apparatus must be tested at least once each week using a dummy antennaload.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 97.90-70</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Monthly inspections.</ITAG>(a) Each lifesaving appliance, including lifeboat equipment, must be inspectedmonthly using the checklist required under andSection; 97.90-30(a)(1) tomake sure it is complete and in good order. A report of the inspection,including a statement as to the condition of the equipment, must be recordedin the vessel's official logbook.(b) Each EPIRB and each SART other than an EPIRB or SART in an inflatableliferaft, must be tested monthly. The EPIRB must be tested using the integratedtest circuit and output indicator to determine that it is operative.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 97.90-73</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Quarterly inspections.</ITAG>(a) Each lifeboat winch control apparatus, including motor controllers,emergency switches, master switches, and limit switches must be examinedonce each three months.(b) The examination must include the removal of drain plugs and the openingof drain valves to make sure that enclosures are free of water.(c) The date of the examination required under this section and the conditionof the equipment must be noted in the official logbook.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 97.90-75</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Annual inspection and repair.</ITAG>(a) Each lifeboat, rescue boat, rigid liferaft, buoyant apparatus, andlife float must be stripped, cleaned, and thoroughly inspected and repairedas needed at least once each year, including emptying and cleaning of eachfuel tank, and refilling it with fresh fuel.(b) Each davit, winch, fall and other launching appliance must be thoroughlyinspected and repaired as needed once each year.(c) Each item of survival equipment with an expiration date must be replacedduring the annual inspection and repair if the expiration date has passed.(d) Each battery used in an item of survival equipment and clearly markedwith a date identified as an expiration date must be replaced during theannual inspection and repair if the expiration date has passed.(e) Except for a storage battery used in a lifeboat or rescue boat, eachbattery without an expiration date used in an item of survival equipmentmust be replaced during the annual inspection and repair.(f) The requirements in this section do not relieve the master or personin charge of the requirement under andSection; 97.90-20(a) to keep the equipmentready for immediate use.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 97.90-80</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Servicing of inflatable liferafts, inflatable lifejackets and inflatedrescue boats.</ITAG>(a) Each inflatable liferaft, inflatable lifejacket, and hybrid inflatablelifejacket or work vest must be serviced_(1) Within 12 months of its initial packing; and(2) Within 12 months of each subsequent servicing, except when servicingis delayed until the next scheduled inspection of the vessel, providedthat the delay does not exceed 5 months.(b) Each inflatable liferaft must be serviced_(1) Whenever the container of the raft is damaged, or the straps or sealbroken; and(2) In accordance with the servicing procedure under Subpart 160.051 ofthis chapter.(c) Each inflatable lifejacket must be serviced in accordance with theservicing procedure under Subpart 160.076 of this chapter.(d) Each hybrid inflatable lifejacket or work vest must be serviced inaccordance with the servicing procedure under Subpart 160.077 of this chapter.(e) Repair and maintenance of inflated rescue boats must be in accordancewith the manufacturer's instructions. All repairs must be made at a servicingfacility approved by the Commandant (G-MVI), except for emergency repairscarried out on board the vessel.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 97.90-90</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Periodic servicing of hydrostatic release units.</ITAG>(a) Each hydrostatic release unit must be serviced_(1) Within 12 months of its manufacture and within 12 months of each subsequentservicing, except when servicing is delayed until the next scheduled inspectionof the vessel, provided that the delay does not exceed 5 months; and(2) In accordance with the repair and testing procedures under Subpart160.062 of this chapter.(b) The springs of each spring-tensioned gripe used with a hydrostaticrelease unit must be renewed when the unit is serviced and tested. <ITAG tagnum="72">SUBCHAPTER I-A_MOBILE OFFSHORE DRILLING UNITS </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 107_INSPECTION AND CERTIFICATION</ITAG>93. The authority citation for Part 107 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> 43 U.S.C. 1333(d); 46 U.S.C. 3306; 49 CFR 1.46.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart B_Inspection and Certification</ITAG>94. By removing and reserving paragraphs (h) and (i), by revising paragraphs(a)(8), (b), (e), (f), (g), (y), and (z), and by adding paragraph (a)(9)to andSection; 107.231 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 107.231</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Inspection for certification.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(a) * * *(8) Subchapter S of this chapter, Subdivision and Stability; and(9) Subchapter W of this chapter, Lifesaving Appliances and Arrangements.<ITAG tagnum="84">Lifesaving Equipment</ITAG>(b) Each item of lifesaving equipment on the vessel is in serviceable condition.(1) Each item not in serviceable condition must be repaired or replaced.(2) A lifejacket that is cleaned or repaired must meet Subpart 160.006of this chapter.(3) The marine inspector may mark the lifejackets, immersion suits, andwork vests to indicate that they have been inspected and passed. (4) Each item of survival equipment with an expiration date on it mustbe replaced if the expiration date has passed. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(e) Each inflatable liferaft and inflatable lifejacket has been servicedunder andSection; 109.317 of this chapter. (f) Each hydrostatic release unit has been serviced under $ andSection; 109.319of this chapter. (g) A successful drill to abandon the unit is held. The marine inspectorspecifies the nature of the emergency to be simulated. (h) [Reserved] (i) [Reserved] <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(y) Each new davit or winch meets the tests and inspections in andSection;31.01-5(c)(1) of this chapter, each new free-fall launching system meetsthe tests and inspections in andSection; 31.01-5(c)(2) of this chapter, eachnew lifeboat and rescue boat meets the test in andSection; 31.01-5(c)(3)of this chapter, each new lifeboat, liferaft, rescue boat, davit, winch,or other launching appliance meets the inspection under andSection; 31.01-5(c)(6)of this chapter, and each new ring life buoy quick release device meetsthe test in andSection; 31.01-5(c)(7) of this chapter. (z) For the original certificate of inspection, a simulation demonstratesthat all survival craft required for abandonment by the total number ofpersons on board, can be launched with their full complement of personsand equipment within 10 min. from the time the signal to abandon the unitis given. This simulation must include loading and launching of sufficientsurvival craft to demonstrate that the requirement can be met. This testis not required if the Coast Guard has witnessed a successful test on asister unit with the same lifesaving appliance arrangements. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>95. By revising andSection; 107.239 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 107.239</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Testing of lifeboats, rescue boats, lifeboat launching systems, anddavit-launched liferaft systems. </ITAG>(a) Each lifeboat and rescue boat gravity davit, and each davit-launchedliferaft launching device must be used to lower the boat or liferaft fromits stowed position to a point near the water using the on-deck launchingappliance controls. This test must be conducted twice; once with the boator liferaft loaded with all equipment and additional weight of not morethan one person, and a second time with the weight of a full load of personsand equipment. A davit-launched liferaft is not required for this testif an appropriate test weight is used. During the lowering, the brake mustbe applied and released at least five times. (1) The launching appliance must bring the boat, liferaft, or test weightto a stop by application of the brake by the winch counterweight alone.(2) The brake action must be smooth and positive. (3) The brake must be always applied unless the operator, or a mechanismactivated by the operator, holds the brake control in the ``off'' position.(4) Lowering must begin each time the brake is released. No additionalforce is permitted. (b) Each lifeboat and rescue boat must be lowered to a point just abovethe water. If the test is conducted in sheltered waters, the boat mustbe evenly loaded until the total weight of the boat equals the ``B'' weighton the boat data plate. The release mechanism control must be operatedand must open all hooks simultaneously and release the boat into the waterproperly. There must be no evident damage or deformation of the boat, thelaunching appliance, or its connections to the vessel. (c) The air supply system of each fire protected lifeboat must be checkedby_ (1) Determining that the air regulator is operating properly either bydischarging one or more of the air supply cylinders through the regulator,or by checking the flow rate on a test apparatus; and (2) Making sure each air supply cylinder is fully charged and meets andSection;147.04-1(a) of this chapter. (d) The water spray system of each fire protected lifeboat must be checkedby operating the pump and determining that all sprinkler heads are operatingproperly and provide a uniform flow of water over the surface of the lifeboat.(e) Each davit-launched liferaft launching appliance must be loaded witha weight equal to the liferaft loaded with its full load of persons andequipment. The weight must be lowered to a point just above the water,dock or other surface that will support the weight. The automatic disengagingapparatus control must be set to release, and must open when the weightis lowered to and supported by the surface. There must be no evident damageor deformation of the automatic disengaging apparatus, launching appliance,or its connections to the vessel. <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart C_Plan Approval </ITAG>96. By revising paragraphs (bb) and (cc) of andSection; 107.305 to read asfollows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 107.305</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Plans and information. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Lifesaving Equipment </ITAG>(bb) The location and arrangement of each lifesaving system including eachembarkation deck, showing each overboard discharge and clearances fromprojections and obstructions in the way of launching lifeboats, rescueboats, and liferafts throughout the range of list and trim angles requiredunder Subchapter W of this chapter. (cc) The weight of each lifeboat, rescue boat, and davit-launched liferaftwhen fully equipped and loaded. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 108_DESIGN AND EQUIPMENT </ITAG>97. The authority citation for Part 108 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>43 U.S.C. 1333(d); 46 U.S.C. 3306; 49 CFR 1.46.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart A_General </ITAG>98. By revising andSection; 108.101 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 108.101</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Incorporation by reference. </ITAG>(a) Certain materials are incorporated by reference into this part withthe approval of the Director of the Federal Register in accordance with5 U.S.C. 552(a). To enforce any edition other than the one listed in paragraph(b) of this section, notice of change must be published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4> and the material made available to the public.All approved material is on file at the Office of the Federal Register,1100 L Street, NW., Washington, DC, and at the U.S. Coast Guard, MerchantVessel Inspection Division (G-MVI), 2100 Second Street, SW., Washington,DC 20593-0001, and is available from the sources indicated in paragraph(b) of this section. (b) The material approved for incorporation by reference in this part,and the sections affected are:<ITAG tagnum="73">American Bureau of Shipping </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">45 Eisenhower Dr., Paramus, NJ 07652 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Rules for Building and Classing Offshore Mobile Drilling Units, 1980_108.113;108.705  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">American National Standards Institute </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">1430 Broadway, New York, NY 10018 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">ANSI Z89.1, Industrial Head Protection, 1969_108.497 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">ANSI A14.3, Fixed Ladders, 1974_108.160 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">American Petroleum Institute </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">300 Corrigan Tower Bldg., Dallas, TX 75201 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">API Spec 2C with supplement 2, Specification for Offshore Cranes,1972_108.601  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">International Maritime Organization (IMO) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Publications Section, 4 Albert Embankment, London SE1 7SR, England</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Resolution [LSR 19/WP.4, Annex 3], ``Guidelines Concerning the Useand Fitting of Retro-reflective Materials on Life-saving Appliances'',June 1987_108.645; 108.649 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">National Fire Protection Association </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Batterymarch Park, Quincy, MA 02269 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">NFPA 407, Standard for Aircraft Fuel Servicing, 1980_108.239 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">NFPA 496, Standard for Purged and Pressurized Enclosures for ElectricalEquipment in Hazardous Locations, 1974_108.187 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Naval Forms and Publications Center </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Customer Service, Code 1052, 5801 Tabor Ave., Philadelphia, PA 19120</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Federal Specification ZZ-H-451 F, Hose, Fire, Woven-jacketed Rubberor Cambric-lined with Couplings, 1976_108.425 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Underwriters Laboratories </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">333 Pfingston Rd., Northbrook, IL 60062 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">UL 19-78, Woven-jacketed Rubber Lined Fire Hose, 1978_108.425 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart E_Lifesaving Equipment </ITAG>99. By revising andSection; 108.501 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 108.501</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Lifesaving appliances and arrangements. </ITAG>Lifesaving appliances and arrangements on each unit must meet SubchapterW of this chapter. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 108.503</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> [Removed] </ITAG>100. By removing andSection; 108.503. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 108.505</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> [Removed] </ITAG>101. By removing andSection; 108.505. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 108.506</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> [Removed] </ITAG>102. By removing andSection; 108.506. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 108.507</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> [Removed] </ITAG>103. By removing andSection; 108.507. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 108.508</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> [Removed] </ITAG>104. By removing andSection; 108.508. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 108.509</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> [Removed] </ITAG>105. By removing andSection; 108.509. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 108.510</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> [Removed] </ITAG>106. By removing andSection; 108.510. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 108.511</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> [Removed] </ITAG>107. By removing andSection; 108.511. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 108.513</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> [Removed] </ITAG>108. By removing andSection; 108.513. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 108.514</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> [Removed] </ITAG>109. By removing andSection; 108.514. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 108.515</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> [Removed] </ITAG>110. By removing andSection; 108.515. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 108.517</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> [Removed] </ITAG>111. By removing andSection; 108.517. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 108.519</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> [Removed] </ITAG>112. By removing andSection; 108.519. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 108.521</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> [Removed] </ITAG>113. By removing andSection; 108.521. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 108.523</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> [Removed] </ITAG>114. By removing andSection; 108.523. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 108.525</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> [Removed] </ITAG>115. By removing andSection; 108.525. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 108.527</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> [Removed] </ITAG>116. By removing andSection; 108.527. 117. By revising andSection; 108.645 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 108.645</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Lifeboats and rescue boats. </ITAG>(a) The following must be plainly marked or painted on each side of thebow of each lifeboat and rescue boat in letters and numbers at least 75mm (3 in.) high: (1) The name of the unit. (2) The number of the boat. The boats on each side of the unit must benumbered from forward to aft. If there are boats on both port and starboardsides of the unit, the odd numbers must be on the starboard side. (3) The name of the port required to be marked on the unit under Subpart67.13 of this chapter. (b) The following must be plainly marked or painted on each side of thebow of each lifeboat and rescue boat in letters and numbers at least 35mm (1.5 in.) high: (1) The length and beam of the boat. (2) The number of persons capacity of the boat. This number must_ (i) Be the number of persons the lifeboat is equipped for; and (ii) Not be greater than the number of persons the boat is approved for,as shown on its nameplate. (c) The following must be plainly marked or painted on each lifeboat andrescue boat in at least two places visible from above the boat in lettersand numbers not less than 75 mm (3 in.) high: (1) The number of persons capacity of the boat. (2) The name of the unit. (d) The name of the unit must be plainly marked or painted on each oarand paddle. (e) On or before July 1, 1991, each lifeboat and rescue boat must be markedwith Type II retroreflective material approved under Subpart 164.018 ofthis chapter. The arrangement of the retroreflective material must meetIMO Resolution [LSR 19/WP.4, Annex 3].118. By adding a new andSection; 108.646 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 108.646</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Rigid liferafts. </ITAG>(a) The following must be plainly marked or painted near one entrance ofeach rigid liferaft in letters and numbers at least 75 mm (3 in.) high:(1) The name of the unit. (2) The number of the liferaft. Liferafts stowed on the sides of the unitmust be numbered in the same manner as the lifeboats. (3) The name of the port required to be marked on the unit under Subpart67.13 of this chapter. (b) The following must be plainly marked or painted near one entrance ofeach rigid liferaft in letters and numbers at least 35 mm (1.5 in.) high:(1) Either ``SOLAS A Pack'' or ``SOLAS B Pack'' depending upon its equipmentunder andSection; 199.143(b) or andSection; 199.143(c) of this chapter. (2) The length of the painter. (c) The number of persons capacity must be plainly marked or painted overeach entrance to each rigid liferaft in letters and numbers at least 100mm (4 in.) high, in a color contrasting to that of the liferaft. This numbermust_ (1) Be the number of persons the liferaft is equipped for; and (2) Not be greater than the number of persons the liferaft is approvedfor, as shown on its nameplate. (d) The name of the unit must be plainly marked or painted on each paddle.119. By revising andSection; 108.647 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 108.647</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Inflatable liferafts. </ITAG>The number of the liferaft and the number of persons it is permitted toaccommodate must be marked or painted in a conspicuous place in the immediatevicinity of each inflatable liferaft in letters and numbers at least 35mm (1.5 in.) high. Liferafts stowed on the sides of the unit must be numberedin the same manner as the lifeboats. This marking must not be on the inflatableliferaft container. 120. By revising andSection; 108.649 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 108.649</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Lifejackets, immersion suits, and ring life buoys. </ITAG>(a) Each lifejacket, immersion suit, and ring life buoy must be markedin block capital letters with the unit's name. (b) Each container for lifejackets and immersion suits must be marked inletters and numbers at least 50 mm (2 in.) high with the number and identificationof the items stowed inside and their size. (c) Each ring life buoy must be marked in block capital letters with thename of the port required to be marked on the unit under Subpart 67.13of this chapter. (d) Each stowage position for a ring life buoy must be marked ``LIFE BUOY''.(e) Each lifejacket must be marked with Type I retroreflective materialapproved under Subpart 164.018 of this chapter. The arrangement of theretroreflective material must meet IMO Resolution [LSR 19/WP.4, Annex 3].(f) On or before July 1, 1991, each ring life buoy must be marked withType II retroreflective material approved under Subpart 164.018 of thischapter. The arrangement of the retroreflective material must meet IMOResolution [LSR 19/WP.4, Annex 3].<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note: </T4>Each approved immersion suit is provided with retroreflectivematerial by the manufacturer of the suit.</ITAG>121. By adding a new andSection; 108.650 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 108.650</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">EPIRBs and SARTs. </ITAG>The name of the vessel must be plainly marked or painted on each EmergencyPosition Indicating Radio Beacon (EPIRB) and on each Search and RescueTransponder (SART), except for an EPIRB or SART_ (a) In an inflatable liferaft; or (b) Permanently installed in a survival craft.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 108.655</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed] </ITAG>122. By removing andSection; 108.655. <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 109_OPERATIONS </ITAG>123. The authority citation for Part 109 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>43 U.S.C. 1333(d); 46 U.S.C. 3306, 6101; 49 CFR 1.46.Section 431 also issued under 46 U.S.C. 11301. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart B_Tests, Drills, and Inspections </ITAG>124. By adding paragraph (c) to andSection; 109.207 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 109.207</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Line-throwing equipment. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(c) The master or person in charge shall make sure the line-throwing equipmentis not operated in an explosive atmosphere.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 109.208</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed] </ITAG>125. By removing andSection; 109.208. 126. By revising andSection; 109.213 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 109.213</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Fire fighting training and fire drills. </ITAG>(a) A fire drill must be conducted on each unit in alternating weeks. Thefire drill must not be conducted as part of the abandonment drill, norimmediately prior to or after the abandonment drill. If a fire drill cannotbe held during the appointed week due to bad weather or other unavoidablereason, the drill must be conducted at the first opportunity followingthe time when the drill would normally have been held. (b) Any member of the crew or any of the industrial personnel excused froma fire drill must participate in the next drill, so that each person participatesin at least one fire drill each month. Each drill must take place within24 hours of a change in crew or industrial personnel if more than 25% ofthe persons on board have not participated in a fire drill on board theunit in the previous month. (c) Each fire drill must include: (1) Summoning of crew and industrial personnel to their stations with thegeneral alarm. (2) Simulation of a fire emergency which varies from drill to drill. (3) Reporting to stations, preparing for, and demonstrating the dutiesassigned under the procedure described in the station bill for the particularfire emergency being simulated. (4) Starting of fire pumps and use of a sufficient number of outlets todetermine that the system is in proper working order. (5) Bringing out each breathing apparatus and other item of rescue andsafety equipment from the emergency equipment lockers, and demonstratingthe use of each item by the person or persons designated to use it. (6) Operation of fire doors, watertight doors, and other closing arrangements.(7) Training in the use of firefighting equipment such as fire pumps, firehoses and hydrants, portable fire extinguishers, foam generators, and fireman'soutfits. (8) Operation of remote controls for stopping ventilation and fuel suppliesto machinery spaces. (d) Each fire drill must, as far as practicable, be conducted as if therewere an actual emergency. (e) Each of the industrial personnel without designated responsibilityfor the survival of others on board, must be instructed in at least_ (1) The location and actuation of fire alarm controls; (2) The location and proper method of use of firefighting equipment; and(3) Fire precautions. (f) Each member of the crew and each of the industrial personnel with designatedresponsibility for the survival of others on board must be instructed inat least the items covered in paragraph (e) of this section and_ (1) Methods of detection, isolation, control, and extinguishing of fire;and (2) Checking and maintaining fire fighting equipment. 127. By revising andSection; 109.215 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 109.215</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Abandonment training and drills. </ITAG>(a) Unit abandonment training material must be on board each unit. Thetraining material must consist either of a manual of one or more volumes,or audio-visual training aids, or both. (1) The training material must contain instructions and information onthe lifesaving appliances on the unit and on the best methods of survival.A training manual must be written in easily understood terms, illustratedwherever possible. (2) If a training manual is used, a copy must be made available to eachperson on board the unit. If audio-visual training aids are used they mustbe incorporated in the onboard training sessions under paragraph (d) ofthis section. (3) The training material must explain the following in detail: (i) Donning of the lifejackets and immersion suits carried on board.(ii) Muster at the assigned stations.(iii) Boarding, launching, and clearing the survival craft and rescue boat.(iv) Method of launching from within the survival craft.(v) Release from launching appliances.(vi) Method and use of devices for protection in launching areas, whereappropriate.(vii) Illumination in launching areas.(viii) Use of all survival equipment.(ix) Use of all detection equipment.(x) With illustrations, the use of radio lifesaving appliances.(xi) Use of sea anchors.(xii) Use of engine and accessories.(xiii) Recovery of survival craft and rescue boat including stowage andsecuring.(xiv) Hazards of exposure and the need for warm clothing.(xv) Best use of the survival craft for survival.(xvi) Methods of retrieval, including the use of helicopter rescue gear(slings, baskets, stretchers), breeches-buoy and shore lifesaving apparatusand unit's line-throwing apparatus.(xvii) All other functions contained in the muster list and emergency instructions.(xviii) Instructions for emergency repair of the lifesaving appliances.(b) An abandonment drill must be conducted on each unit in alternatingweeks. If a drill cannot be held during the appointed week due to bad weatheror other unavoidable reason, the drill must be conducted at the first opportunityfollowing the time when the drill would normally have been held.(1) Any member of the crew or any of the industrial personnel excused froman abandonment drill must participate in the next drill, so that each personparticipates in at least one abandonment drill each month. A drill musttake place within 24 hours of a change in crew or industrial personnelif more than 25% of the persons on board have not participated in an abandonmentdrill on board the unit in the previous month.(2) Each abandonment drill must include:(i) Summoning of crew and industrial personnel to muster stations withthe general alarm and making sure that they are made aware of how the orderto abandon the unit is given, as specified in the station bill.(ii) Simulation of an abandonment emergency which varies from drill todrill.(iii) Reporting to stations, preparing for, and demonstrating the dutiesassigned under the procedure described in the station bill for the particularabandonment emergency being simulated.(iv) Checking to see that crew members and industrial personnel are suitablydressed.(v) Checking to see that lifejackets are correctly donned.(vi) Lowering of at least one lifeboat after any necessary preparationfor launching. The lifeboat must be lowered at least to the extent wherethe davit head has completed its travel and the fall wire has begun topay out.(vii) Starting and operating the lifeboat engine.(viii) Operation of davits used for launching liferafts.(4) Different lifeboats must, as far as practicable, be lowered to meetparagraph (b)(4)(v) of this section at successive drills.(5) Each abandonment drill must, as far as practicable, be conducted asif there were an actual emergency.(6) Each lifeboat must be launched with its assigned operating crew aboardand maneuvered in the water at least once every 3 months during an abandonmentdrill.(7) Each rescue boat that is not also a lifeboat must be launched withits assigned crew aboard and maneuvered in the water_(i) Once each month, if reasonable and practicable; but(ii) At least once every 3 months.(8) At least one drill every 3 months must be held at night, unless themaster or person in charge determines it is unsafe.(9) Emergency lighting for mustering and abandonment must be tested ateach abandonment drill.(c) The master or person in charge of a unit carrying immersion suits shallmake sure that_(1) Each member of the crew and industrial personnel either_(i) Wears an immersion suit in at least one abandonment drill per monthunless is is impracticable due to warm weather; or(ii) Participates in at least one immersion suit drill per month that includesdonning an immersion suit and being instructed in its use.(d) Each member of the crew and industrial personnel on board the unitmust be given training in the use of lifesaving appliances and the dutiesassigned in the station bill.(1) Except as provided under paragraph (d)(2) of this section, onboardtraining in the use of the unit's lifesaving appliances, including survivalcraft equipment, must be given to each member of the crew and industrialpersonnel as soon as possible, but not later than 2 weeks after they jointhe unit.(2) If the crew or industrial personnel are on a regularly scheduled rotatingassignment to a unit, onboard training in the use of the unit's lifesavingappliances, including survival craft equipment, must be given to each memberof the crew and industrial personnel not later than 2 weeks after the timethe person first joins the unit.(3) The crew and the industrial personnel must be instructed in the useof the unit's lifesaving appliances and in survival at sea on alternatingweeks, normally in the weeks when abandonment drills are not held. If individualinstruction sessions cover different parts of the unit's lifesaving system,all the unit's lifesaving equipment and appliances must be covered withineach 2 month period.(i) Each of the industrial personnel without designated responsibilityfor the survival of others on board, must be instructed in at least_(A) The emergencies which might occur on that particular type of unit;(B) The consequences of panic;(C) The types of all lifesaving appliances carried on the unit and propermethods of using them, including_(<T3>1</T3>) The correct method of donning and wearing a lifejacket, andif provided, an immersion suit;(<T3>2</T3>) Jumping into the water from a height while wearing a lifejacketand, if provided, an immersion suit;(<T3>3</T3>) How to board survival craft from the unit and from the water;(<T3>4</T3>) Operation and use of the unit's inflatable liferafts;(<T3>5</T3>) Special instructions necessary for use of the unit's lifesavingappliances in severe weather and severe sea conditions;(<T3>6</T3>) Swimming while wearing a lifejacket; and(<T3>7</T3>) Keeping afloat without a lifejacket;(D) Where appropriate, how to survive in the water_(<T3>1</T3>) In the presence of fire or oil on the water;(<T3>2</T3>) In cold conditions; and(<T3>3</T3>) If sharks may be present;(E) Problems of hypothermia, first-aid treatment for hypothermia and otherappropriate first-aid procedures; and(F) The need to adhere to the principles of survival; and(G) The basic methods of boarding helicopters.(ii) Each member of the crew and each of the industrial personnel withdesignated responsibility for the survival of others on board, must beinstructed in at least the items covered in paragraph (d)(3)(i) of thissection, and_(A) Marshalling of personnel;(B) Abandonment of the unit, including_(<T3>1</T3>) Launching survival craft;(<T3>2</T3>) Getting survival craft quickly and safely clear of the unit;and(<T3>3</T3>) Righting a capsized survival craft;(C) Handling all survival craft and their equipment, including_(<T3>1</T3>) Checking and maintaining their readiness for immediate use;(<T3>2</T3>) Using equipment to the best advantage;(<T3>3</T3>) Using the sea anchor;(<T3>4</T3>) Remaining, as far as practicable, in the general vicinity ofthe unit, well clear of but not downwind of any hydrocarbons or fire;(<T3>5</T3>) Recovering and, as far as practicable, caring for other survivors;(<T3>6</T3>) Keeping a look-out;(<T3>7</T3>) Operating available means of detection by others, includingradio distress alerting and radio emergency procedures; and(<T3>8</T3>) Making proper use of food and drinking water and using protectivemeasures in survival craft such as those for preventing exposure to cold,sun, wind, rain, and sea, and for preventing seasickness;(D) Cautioning on the preservation of body fluids and the dangers of drinkingseawater;(E) Transferring personnel from survival craft to helicopters or to workboats;(F) Maintaining morale; and(G) Methods of helicopter rescue.(4) Onboard training in the use of davit-launched liferafts must take placeat intervals of not more than 4 months on each unit with davit-launchedliferafts. Whenever practicable this must include the inflation and loweringof a liferaft. If this liferaft is a special liferaft intended for trainingpurposes only, and not part of the unit's lifesaving equipment, it mustbe conspicuously marked.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 109.217</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed] </ITAG>128. By removing andSection; 109.217.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 109.219</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed] </ITAG>129. By removing andSection; 109.219.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 109.221</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed] </ITAG>130. By removing andSection; 109.221.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 109.225</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed] </ITAG>131. By removing andSection; 109.225. <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart C_Operation and Stowage of Safety Equipment </ITAG>132. By revising andSection; 109.301 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 109.301</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Operational readiness. </ITAG>(a) Except as provided in andSection; 109.303(e), each item of firefightingequipment, each lifesaving appliance and each item of survival craft andrescue boat equipment must be in good working order and ready for immediateuse at all times when the unit is in operation. (b) Each deck where lifeboats and liferafts are stowed or boarded mustbe kept clear of obstructions that would interfere with the boarding andlaunching of the lifesaving appliances.  133. By adding a new andSection; 109.303 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 109.303 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Maintenance of lifesaving appliances. </ITAG>(a) The manufacturer's instructions for onboard maintenance of lifesavingappliances must be onboard and must include the following for each appliance_(1) Checklists for use when carrying out the inspections required underandSection; 109.311(a); (2) Maintenance and repair instructions; (3) A schedule of periodic maintenance; (4) A diagram of lubrication points with the recommended lubricants; (5) A list of replaceable parts; (6) A list of sources of spare parts; and (7) A log for records of inspections and maintenance. (b) The master or person in charge shall make sure that maintenance iscarried out in accordance with the instructions required under paragraph(a) of this section. (c) For lifesaving appliances constructed on or before July 1, 1986, paragraph(a) of this section need only be complied with to the extent that the manufacturer'sinstructions are available. (d) The OCMI may accept, instead of the instructions required under paragraph(a) of this section, an onboard planned maintenance program that includesthe items listed in that paragraph. (e) If lifeboats, rescue boats, and rigid liferafts are maintained andrepaired while the unit is in operation, there must be a sufficient numberof lifeboats and liferafts available for use in at least two separate locationsto accommodate all persons on board. (f) Except in an emergency, extensive repairs or alterations must not bemade to any lifesaving appliance without advance notification of the OCMI.Insofar as possible, each repair or alteration must be made in accordancewith the requirements for the lifesaving appliance in Subchapter Q of thischapter. The OCMI may require each lifesaving appliance that has been alteredor extensively repaired to be subjected to each test for the appliancein Subchapter Q of this chapter that is affected by the repair or alteration.(g) The master or person in charge shall report each emergency repair oralteration to a lifesaving appliance as soon as practicable to the OCMIresponsible for the area where the unit is operating. (h) A lifeboat or rigid liferaft must not be repaired or reconditionedfor use on a unit other than the one it was originally built for, unlessspecifically permitted by the OCMI. If required by the OCMI, the repairor reconditioning of the lifeboat or rigid liferaft must be made underthe OCMI's supervision. 134. By revising andSection; 109.305 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 109.305</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Maintenance of falls. </ITAG>(a) Except as provided under paragraph (d) of this section, each fall usedin a launching appliance must be turned end for end at intervals of notmore than 30 months. (b) Each fall must be renewed when necessary due to deterioration or atintervals of not more than 5 years, whichever is the earlier. (c) Each fall must have a corrosion-resistant tag with the following permanentlymarked on it: (1) The date the new fall was installed. (2) If the fall has been turned end for end, the date it was turned. (d) A fall which can not be turned end for end must be carefully inspectedbetween 24 and 30 months after its installation. If the inspection showsthat the fall is faultless, the fall may be continued in service up to48 months after its installation, when it must be replaced. 135. By revising andSection; 109.307 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 109.307</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Spare parts and repair equipment for lifesaving appliances. </ITAG>Spare parts and repair equipment must be on board the unit for each lifesavingappliance and component subject to excessive wear or consumption and thatneeds to be replaced regularly. 136. By adding a new andSection; 109.309 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 109.309</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Weekly inspection of lifesaving appliances. </ITAG>The following tests and inspections must be carried out weekly: (a) Each survival craft, rescue boat and launching appliance must be visuallyinspected to ensure its readiness for use. (b) Each lifeboat engine and rescue boat engine must be run ahead and asternfor not less than 3 min., unless the ambient temperature is below the minimumtemperature required for starting the engine. (c) The general alarm system must be tested. (d) Each battery for lifeboat and rescue boat engine starting, searchlights,fixed lifeboat radio installations, and portable radio apparatus must bebrought up to full charge at least once each week if_ (1) The battery is of a type that requires recharging; and (2) The battery is not connected to a device that keeps it continuouslycharged. (e) The transmitter of each portable radio apparatus must be tested atleast once each week using a dummy antenna load. 137. By adding a new andSection; 109.311 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 109.311</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Monthly inspections of lifesaving appliances. </ITAG>(a) Each lifesaving appliance, including lifeboat equipment, must be inspectedmonthly using the checklist required under andSection; 109.303(a)(1) to makesure it is complete and in good order. A report of the inspection, includinga statement as to the condition of the equipment, must be recorded in theunit's official logbook. (b) Each EPIRB and each SART other than an EPIRB or SART in an inflatableliferaft, must be tested monthly. The EPIRB must be tested using the integratedtest circuit and output indicator to determine that it is operative. 138. By revising andSection; 109.313 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 109.313</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Quarterly inspections of lifesaving appliances. </ITAG>(a) Each lifeboat winch control apparatus, including motor controllers,emergency switches, master switches, and limit switches must be examinedonce each three months. (b) The examination must include the removal of drain plugs and the openingof drain valves to make sure that enclosures are free of water. (c) The date of the examination required under this section and the conditionof the equipment must be noted in the official logbook.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 109.314</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed] </ITAG>139. By removing andSection; 109.314. 140. By adding a new andSection; 109.315 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 109.315</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Annual inspection and repair of lifesaving appliances. </ITAG>(a) Each lifeboat, rescue boat and rigid liferaft must be stripped, cleaned,and thoroughly inspected and repaired as needed at least once each year,including emptying and cleaning of each fuel tank, and refilling it withfresh fuel. (b) Each davit, winch, fall and other launching appliance must be thoroughlyinspected and repaired as needed once each year. (c) Each item of survival equipment with an expiration date must be replacedduring the annual inspection and repair if the expiration date has passed.(d) Each battery used in an item of survival equipment and clearly markedwith a date identified as an expiration date must be replaced during theannual inspection and repair if the expiration date has passed. (e) Except for a storage battery used in a lifeboat or rescue boat, eachbattery without an expiration date used in an item of survival equipmentmust be replaced during the annual inspection and repair. (f) The requirements in this section do not relieve the master or personin charge of the requirement under andSection; 109.301(a) to keep the equipmentready for immediate use.141. By revising andSection; 109.317 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 109.317</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Servicing of inflatable liferafts, inflatable lifejackets and inflatedrescue boats. </ITAG>(a) Each inflatable liferaft, inflatable lifejacket, and hybrid inflatablelifejacket or work vest must be serviced_ (1) Within 12 months of its initial packing; and (2) Within 12 months of each subsequent servicing, except when servicingis delayed until the next scheduled inspection of the unit, provided thatthe delay does not exceed 5 months. (b) Each inflatable liferaft must be serviced_ (1) Whenever the container of the raft is damaged, or the straps or sealbroken; and (2) In accordance with the servicing procedure under Subpart 160.051 ofthis chapter. (c) Each inflatable lifejacket must be serviced in accordance with theservicing procedure under Subpart 160.076 of this chapter. (d) Each hybrid inflatable lifejacket or work vest must be serviced inaccordance with the servicing procedure under Subpart 160.077 of this chapter.(e) Repair and maintenance of inflated rescue boats must be in accordancewith the manufacturer's instructions. All repairs must be made at a servicingfacility approved by the Commandant (G-MVI), except for emergency repairscarried out on board the vessel.142. By adding a new andSection; 109.319 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 109.319</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Periodic servicing of hydrostatic release units. </ITAG>(a) Each hydrostatic release unit must be serviced_ (1) Within 12 months of its manufacture and within 12 months of each subsequentservicing, except when servicing is delayed until the next scheduled inspectionof the unit, provided that the delay does not exceed 5 months; and (2) In accordance with the repair and testing procedures under Subpart160.062 of this chapter. (b) The springs of each spring-tensioned gripe used with a hydrostaticrelease unit must be renewed when the unit is serviced and tested.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 109.320</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed] </ITAG>143. By removing andSection; 109.320.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 109.321</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed] </ITAG>144. By removing andSection; 109.321.145. By revising andSection; 109.323 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 109.323</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Manning of survival craft and supervision. </ITAG>(a) A merchant mariner's document endorsement as a lifeboatman or anotherinclusive rating under Part 12 of this Title is evidence of training insurvival craft and serves as a certificate of proficiency. For the purposesof this section, a ``certificated person'' is a person holding a merchantmariner's document with such an endorsement. (b) There must be a sufficient number of trained persons on board for musteringand assisting untrained persons. (c) There must be a sufficient number of deck officers, able seamen, orcertificated persons on board to operate the survival craft and launchingarrangements required for abandonment by the total number of persons permittedon board. (d) One person must be placed in charge of each survival craft to be used.(1) The person in command must be a deck officer, able seaman, or certificatedperson. (2) A deck officer, able seaman, or certificated person must be designatedsecond-in-command for each lifeboat permitted to carry more than 40 persons.(e) The person in charge of each survival craft shall have a list of thesurvival craft crew and shall see that the crewmembers are acquainted withtheir duties. The second-in-command of a lifeboat shall also have a listof the lifeboat crew. (f) Each motorized survival craft must have a person assigned who is capableof operating the engine and carrying out minor adjustments. (g) The master or person in charge shall make sure the persons requiredunder paragraphs (b), (c), and (d) of this section are equitably distributedamong the unit's survival craft.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 109.325</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed] </ITAG>146. By removing andSection; 109.325.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 109.341</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed] </ITAG>147. By removing andSection; 109.341.148. By revising andSection; 109.425 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 109.425</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Repairs and alterations: fire detecting and extinguishing equipment.</ITAG>(a) Before making repairs or alterations, except emergency repairs or alterationsto fire detecting and extinguishing equipment, the master or person incharge shall report the nature of the repairs or alterations to the Officerin Charge, Marine Inspection. (b) When emergency repairs or alterations to fire detecting or fire extinguishingequipment have been made, the master or person in charge shall report thenature of the repairs or alterations to the Officer in Charge, Marine Inspection.149. By revising paragraphs (d) and (e) of andSection; 109.433 to read asfollows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 109.433</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Logbook Entries. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(d) The date when fire drills are held, and details of fire fighting trainingand fire drills. Each logbook entry must include the following, as applicable:(1) The time and date. (2) Length of drill or training session. (3) Number and lengths of hose used. (4) Subject of training session. (5) Statement as to the condition of the equipment used. (6) If a full drill or training session is not held at the appointed time,the circumstances and the extent of the drill or training session held.(e) The date when musters are held, details of abandonment drills, drillsof other lifesaving appliances and onboard training. Each logbook entrymust include the following, as applicable: (1) The time and date. (2) Length of drill or training session. (3) Identification of survival craft used in drills. (4) Subject of training session. (5) Statement as to the condition of the equipment used. (6) If a full muster, drill or training session is not held at the appointedtime, the circumstances and the extent of the muster, drill or trainingsession held. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>By revising the title of Subpart E to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart E_Emergency Signals</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 109.501</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed] </ITAG>150. By removing andSection; 109.501.151. By removing and reserving paragraph (a), by revising the section heading,and by revising paragraph (c)(2) of andSection; 109.503 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 109.503</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Emergency signals. </ITAG>(a) [reserved] <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(c) * * * (2) If whistle signals are used to direct the handling of lifeboats anddavit-launched liferafts, they must be_ (i) One short blast to lower the lifeboats and davit-launched liferafts;and (ii) Two short blasts to stop lowering the lifeboats and davit-launchedliferafts. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 109.505</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed] </ITAG>152. By removing andSection; 109.505.<ITAG tagnum="72">SUBCHAPTER J_ELECTRICAL ENGINEERING </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 112_EMERGENCY LIGHTING AND POWER SYSTEMS</ITAG>153. The authority citation for Part 112 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> 46 U.S.C. 2113, 3306, 3703, 4104; 49 CFR 1.46.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart 112.15_Emergency Loads </ITAG>154. By revising paragraphs (c) and (g) of andSection; 112.15-1 to read asfollows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 112.15-1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Temporary emergency loads.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37"> * * * * *</ITAG>(c) Lighting for passageways, stairways, and escape trunks in passengerquarters, crew quarters, public spaces, machinery spaces, and work spacessufficient to allow passengers and crew to find their way to open decksand to survival craft muster stations and embarkation stations with allwatertight doors and fire-screen doors closed.<ITAG tagnum="37"> * * * * *</ITAG>(g) Lighting for survival craft launching, including muster stations, embarkationstations, the survival craft, its launching appliance, and the area ofthe water where it is to be launched. Lights must meet andSection; 111.75-16and 112.43-11.<ITAG tagnum="37"> * * * * *</ITAG>155. By adding a new paragraph (u) to andSection; 112.15-5 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 112.15-5</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Final emergency loads.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37"> * * * * *</ITAG>(u) Each stabilizer wing and indicator that must be movable to preventdamage to survival craft.<ITAG tagnum="72">SUBCHAPTER O_CERTAIN BULK DANGEROUS CARGOES </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">PART 154_SAFETY STANDARDS FOR SELF-PROPELLED VESSELS CARRYING BULKLIQUIFIED GASES</ITAG>156. The authority citation for Part 154 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> 46 U.S.C. 3703; E.O. 12234, 3 CFR, 1980 Comp. p. 277;49 CFR 1.46.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 154.1445</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed]</ITAG>157. By removing andSection; 154.1445<ITAG tagnum="72">SUBCHAPTER Q_EQUIPMENT, CONSTRUCTION, AND MATERIALS: SPECIFICATIONAND APPROVAL </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 160_LIFESAVING EQUIPMENT</ITAG>158. The authority citation for Part 160 is revised to read as followsand all other authority citations in Part 160 are removed:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> 46 U.S.C. 3306, 3703, 4102, 4302; 49 CFR 1.46.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart 160.040_Line-Throwing Appliance; Impulse-Projected RocketType (and Equipment) </ITAG>159. By revising andSection; 160.040-6 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 160.040-6</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Marking and labeling.</ITAG>(a) Each line throwing appliance must be permanently and legibly markedwith the_(1) Model designation;(2) Serial number;(3) Coast Guard approval number; and(4) Name of the manufacturer.(b) Each projectile must be permanently and legibly marked with the_(1) Model designation;(2) Coast Guard approval number;(3) Name of the manufacturer;(4) Month and year manufactured; and(5) Expiration date that must not be more than 48 months after the dateof manufacture.(c) Each primer-ejector cartridge must be permanently and legibly markedwith the_(1) Model designation;(2) Coast Guard approval number;(3) Name of the manufacturer;(4) Month and year manufactured; and(5) Expiration date that must not be more than 48 months after the dateof manufacture.(d) Each container of new service line must be permanently and legiblymarked with_(1) The name of the manufacturer;(2) The month and year manufactured; and(3) A statement to the effect that in all respects the line meets the applicablerequirements of this subpart.(e) Each faking box and reel must bear the name of the manufacturer.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;andSection; 160.042-1 through 160.142-5</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed]</ITAG>160. By removing Subpart 160.042 (consisting of andSection;andSection; 160.042-1through 160.142-5).<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 161_ELECTRICAL EQUIPMENT</ITAG>161. The authority citation for Part 161 is revised to read as followsand all other authority citations in Part 161 are removed:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> 46 U.S.C. 3306, 3703, 4104; 49 CFR 1.46.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;andSection; 161.006-1 through 161.006-6</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed]</ITAG>161a. By removing Subpart 161.006 (consisting ofandSection;andSection; 161.006-1through 161.006-6).  <ITAG tagnum="72">SUBCHAPTER R_NAUTICAL SCHOOLS </ITAG>161b. The following Table of Contents for Part 167 reflects revised Subpart167.35 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 167_PUBLIC NAUTICAL SCHOOL SHIPS</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart 167.35_Lifesaving Appliances and Arrangements</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">167.35-1 General.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">167.35-5 Emergency signals.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">167.35-10 Manning of survival craft and supervision.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">167.35-90 Operational readiness, maintenance and inspection of lifesavingequipment.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37"> * * * * *</ITAG>162. The authority citation for Part 167 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> 46 U.S.C. 3306, 6101; 49 CFR 1.46.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart 167.15_Inspections</ITAG>163. By adding a new andSection; 167.15-27 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 167.15-28</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Inspection of lifesaving appliances and arrangements.</ITAG>(a) At each initial inspection, one of the following must be done in thepresence of a marine inspector:(1) The tests and inspections under andSection; 71.20-20(a)(1) of this chapterfor each public nautical school ship provided with lifesaving appliancesand arrangements meeting passenger vessel requirements.(2) The tests and inspections under andSection; 91.20-20(a)(1) of this chapterfor each public nautical school ship provided with lifesaving appliancesand arrangements meeting cargo and miscellaneous vessel requirements.(b) At each inspection for certification, one of the following must bedone in the presence of a marine inspector:(1) The tests and inspections under andSection; 71.25-15 of this chapterfor each public nautical school ship provided with lifesaving appliancesand arrangements meeting passenger vessel requirements.(2) The tests and inspections under andSection; 91.25-15 of this chapterfor each public nautical school ship provided with lifesaving appliancesand arrangements meeting cargo and miscellaneous vessel requirements. 164. By revising Subpart 167.35 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart 167.35_Lifesaving Appliances and Arrangements </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 167.35-1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General. </ITAG>Lifesaving appliances and arrangements on public nautical school shipsmust meet the requirements for nautical school ships in Subchapter W ofthis chapter. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 167.35-5</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Emergency signals. </ITAG>The various signals used to call the crew to their stations and to giveinstructions to the crew must be listed on the station bill required underandSection; 199.80 of this chapter. The signals must meet_ (a) Section 78.13-1 of this chapter for each public nautical school shipprovided with lifesaving appliances and arrangements meeting passengervessel requirements, or (b) Section 97.13-1 of this chapter for each public nautical school shipprovided with lifesaving appliances and arrangements meeting cargo andmiscellaneous vessel requirements. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 167.35-10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Manning of survival craft and supervision. </ITAG>The manning of survival craft and their supervision must meet_ (a) Subpart 78.14 of this chapter for each public nautical school shipprovided with lifesaving appliances and arrangements meeting passengervessel requirements, or (b) Subpart 97.14 of this chapter for each public nautical school shipprovided with lifesaving appliances and arrangements meeting cargo andmiscellaneous vessel requirements. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 167.35-90</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Operational readiness, maintenance and inspection of lifesaving equipment.</ITAG>The operational readiness, maintenance, and inspection of lifesaving equipmentmust be as required under_ (a) Subpart 78.95 of this chapter for each public nautical school shipprovided with lifesaving appliances and arrangements meeting passengervessel requirements, or (b) Subpart 97.90 of this chapter for each public nautical school shipprovided with lifesaving appliances and arrangements meeting cargo andmiscellaneous vessel requirements. <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart 167.55_Special Markings Required </ITAG>165. By revising paragraph (j) and adding paragraphs (k), (l), (m), (n),and (o) of andSection; 167.55-5 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 167.55-5</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Marking of fire and emergency equipment, etc. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(j) <T3>Lifeboats and rescue boats.</T3> Each lifeboat and rescue boat mustbe marked as required under_ (1) Section 78.47-60 of this chapter for each public nautical school shipprovided with lifesaving appliances and arrangements meeting passengervessel requirements, or (2) Section 97.37-37 of this chapter for each public nautical school shipprovided with lifesaving appliances and arrangements meeting cargo andmiscellaneous vessel requirements. (k) <T3>Rigid liferafts. </T3>Each rigid liferaft must be marked as requiredunder_(1) Section 78.47-62 of this chapter for each public nautical school shipprovided with lifesaving appliances and arrangements meeting passengervessel requirements, or (2) Section 97.37-39 of this chapter for each public nautical school shipprovided with lifesaving appliances and arrangements meeting cargo andmiscellaneous vessel requirements. (l) <T3>Inflatable liferafts. </T3>Markings for each inflatable liferaft mustbe as required under_ (1) Section 78.47-63 of this chapter for each public nautical school shipprovided with lifesaving appliances and arrangements meeting passengervessel requirements, or (2) Section 97.37-40 of this chapter for each public nautical school shipprovided with lifesaving appliances and arrangements meeting cargo andmiscellaneous vessel requirements. (m) <T3>Life floats and buoyant apparatus. </T3>Each life float and buoyantapparatus must be marked as required under_ (1) Section 78.47-64 of this chapter for each public nautical school shipprovided with lifesaving appliances and arrangements meeting passengervessel requirements, or (2) Section 97.37-42 of this chapter for each public nautical school shipprovided with lifesaving appliances and arrangements meeting cargo andmiscellaneous vessel requirements. (n) <T3>Lifejackets, immersion suits, and ring life buoys. </T3>Each lifejacket,immersion suit, and ring life buoy must be marked as required under_ (1) Section 78.47-65 of this chapter for each public nautical school shipprovided with lifesaving appliances and arrangements meeting passengervessel requirements, or (2) Section 97.37-43 of this chapter for each public nautical school shipprovided with lifesaving appliances and arrangements meeting cargo andmiscellaneous vessel requirements. (o) <T3>EPIRBs and SARTs. </T3>Each EPIRB and each SART must be marked as requiredunder_ (1) Section 78.47-72 of this chapter for each public nautical school shipprovided with lifesaving appliances and arrangements meeting passengervessel requirements, or (2) Section 97.37-55 of this chapter for each public nautical school shipprovided with lifesaving appliances and arrangements meeting cargo andmiscellaneous vessel requirements. <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart 167.65_Special Operating Requirements </ITAG>166. By revising andSection; 167.65-1 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 167.65-1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Abandon-ship training and drills. </ITAG>(a) Abandon-ship training and drills must be conducted as required under_(1) Section 78.17-50 of this chapter for each public nautical school shipprovided with lifesaving appliances and arrangements meeting passengervessel requirements, or (2) Section 97.15-35 of this chapter for each public nautical school shipprovided with lifesaving appliances and arrangements meeting cargo andmiscellaneous vessel requirements. (b) Wherever the term ``passenger'' is used in andSection; 78.17-50 or andSection;97.15-35 of this chapter, it shall be interpreted as meaning a_ (1) Student; (2) Cadet; and (3) Instructor who is not also a member of the crew. 167. By adding a new andSection; 167.65-2 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 167.65-2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Fire drills. </ITAG>(a) A fire drill must be conducted on each vessel in alternating weeks.The fire drill must not be conducted as part of the abandon-ship drill,nor immediately prior to or after the abandon-ship drill. If a fire drillcan not be held during the appointed week due to bad weather or other unavoidablereason, the drill must be conducted at the first opportunity followingthe time when the drill would normally have been held. (b) Any member of the crew excused from a fire drill must participate inthe next drill, so that each member participates in at least one fire drilleach month. If more than 25% of the crew have not participated in a firedrill on board that particular vessel in the previous month, a drill mustbe conducted before the vessel leaves port if reasonable and practicable,but not later than 24 hours after the vessel leaves port. The Commandant(G-MVI) may accept other arrangements that are at least equivalent forthose vessels where this is impractical. (c) Each fire drill must include: (1) Summoning of the crew and other persons on board to their stationswith the general alarm. (2) Simulation of a fire emergency which varies from drill to drill. (3) Reporting to stations, preparing for, and demonstrating the dutiesassigned under the procedure described in the station bill for the particularfire emergency being simulated. (4) Starting of fire pumps and use of a sufficient number of outlets todetermine that the system is in proper working order. (5) Bringing out each breathing apparatus and other item of rescue andsafety equipment from the emergency equipment lockers, and demonstratingthe use of each item by the person or persons designated to use it. (6) Operating each watertight door used while the vessel is underway. (7) Operation of each self-closing fire door. (8) Closing all fire doors and doors in fire boundaries. (d) Each fire drill must, as far as practicable, be conducted as if therewere an actual emergency. (e) The date when fire drills are held, and details of fire drills mustbe recorded in the vessel's official logbook. Each logbook entry must includethe following, as applicable: (1) The time and date. (2) Length of drill. (3) Number and lengths of hose used. (4) Statement as to the condition of the equipment used. (5) If a full drill is not held at the appointed time, the circumstancesand the extent of the drill held.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 167.65-55</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed] </ITAG>168. By removing andSection; 167.65-55.<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 168_CIVILIAN NAUTICAL SCHOOL VESSELS </ITAG>169. The authority citation for Part 168 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>46 U.S.C. 3306; 49 CFR 1.46. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart 168.05_General Requirements </ITAG>170. By revising andSection; 168.05-5 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 168.05-5</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Application of passenger vessel inspection regulations. </ITAG>Except for requirements covered specifically by this part, all of the followingregulations applying to passenger vessels apply to each vessel and itemof floating equipment used by or in connection with a civilian nauticalschool: (a) For vessels 100 gross tons and over, Subchapter H (Passenger Vessels)of this chapter, and all other regulations in this chapter applicable topassenger vessels 100 gross tons and over. (b) For vessels less than 100 gross tons, Subchapter T (Small PassengerVessels) of this chapter, and all other regulations in this chapter applicableto passenger vessels less than 100 gross tons. <ITAG tagnum="72">SUBCHAPTER U_OCEANOGRAPHIC RESEARCH VESSELS  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 188_GENERAL PROVISIONS </ITAG>171. The authority citation for Part 188 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>46 U.S.C. 2113, 3306; 49 CFR 1.46.</ITAG>172-173. By adding a new Subpart 188.27 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart 188.27_Lifesaving Appliances and Arrangements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 188.27-1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General. </ITAG>Lifesaving appliances and arrangements on oceanographic research vesselsmust meet the requirements for special purpose ships in Subchapter W ofthis chapter. <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 189_INSPECTION AND CERTIFICATION </ITAG>174. The authority citation for Part 189 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>46 U.S.C. 3306; 49 CFR 1.46. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart 189.20_Initial Inspection </ITAG>175. By revising paragraph (a)(1) of andSection; 189.20-20 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 189.20-20</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Specific tests and inspections. </ITAG>(a) * * * (1) The tests and inspections under andSection; 71.20-20(a)(1) of this chapterfor each oceanographic research vessel provided with lifesaving appliancesand arrangements meeting passenger vessel requirements, or the tests andinspections under andSection; 91.20-20(a)(1) of this chapter for each oceanographicresearch vessel provided with lifesaving appliances and arrangements meetingcargo and miscellaneous vessel requirements. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart 189.25_Inspection for Certification </ITAG>176. By revising andSection; 189.25-15 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 189.25-15</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Lifesaving equipment. </ITAG>At each inspection for certification, one of the following must be donein the presence of a marine inspector: (a) The tests and inspections under andSection; 71.25-15 of this chapterfor each oceanographic research vessel provided with lifesaving appliancesand arrangements meeting passenger vessel requirements. (b) The tests and inspections under andSection; 91.25-15 of this chapterfor each oceanographic research vessel provided with lifesaving appliancesand arrangements meeting cargo and miscellaneous vessel requirements. <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 192_LIFESAVING EQUIPMENT </ITAG>177. By removing and reserving Part 192.177a. The following Table of Contents for Part 196 reflects new or revisedsubparts to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 196_OPERATIONS</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart 196.00_Incorporation by Reference</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">196.00-1 Incorporation by reference.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart 196.13_Emergency Signals</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">196.13-1 Emergency Signals.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart 196.14_Manning of Survival Craft and Supervision</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">196.14-1 General.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart 196.90_Operational Readiness, Maintenance and Inspection ofLifesaving Equipment</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">196.90-20 Operational readiness.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart 196.95_Pilot Boarding Operations</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>178. The authority citation for Part 196 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4> Authority: </T4>46 U.S.C. 3306; 49 CFR 1.46.</ITAG>179. By adding Subpart 196.00 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart 196.00_Incorporation by Reference  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 196.00-1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Incorporation by reference. </ITAG>(a) Certain material is incorporated by reference into this part with theapproval of the Director of the Federal Register in accordance with 5 U.S.C.552(a). To enforce any edition other than the one listed in paragraph (b)of this section, notice of change must be published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>and the material made available to the public.All approved material is on file at the Office of the Federal Register,1100 L Street NW., Washington, DC, and at the U.S. Coast Guard, MerchantVessel Inspection Division (G-MVI), 2100 Second Street SW., Washington,DC 20593-0001, and is available from the source indicated in paragraph(b) of this section. (b) The material approved for incorporation by reference in this part,and the sections affected are: <ITAG tagnum="73">International Maritime Organization (IMO) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Publications Section, 4 Albert Embankment, London SE1 7SR, England</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Resolution [LSR 19/WP.4, Annex 3], ``Guidelines Concerning the Useand Fitting of Retroreflective Materials on Life-saving Appliances'', June1987_196.37-37;     196.37-43</ITAG>180. By revising Subpart 196.13 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart 196.13_Emergency Signals </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 196.13-1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Emergency signals. </ITAG>The various signals used to call the crew to their stations and to giveinstructions to the crew must be listed on the station bill required underandSection; 199.80 of this chapter. The signals must meet_ (a) Section 78.13-1 of this chapter for each oceanographic research vesselprovided with lifesaving appliances and arrangements meeting passengervessel requirements, or (b) Section 97.13-1 of this chapter for each oceanographic research vesselprovided with lifesaving appliances and arrangements meeting cargo andmiscellaneous vessel requirements. 181. By revising Subpart 196.14 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart 196.14_Manning of Survival Craft and Supervision </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 196.14-1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General. </ITAG>The manning of survival craft and their supervision must meet_ (a) Subpart 78.14 of this chapter for each oceanographic research vesselprovided with lifesaving appliances and arrangements meeting passengervessel requirements, or (b) Subpart 97.14 of this chapter for each oceanographic research vesselprovided with lifesaving appliances and arrangements meeting cargo andmiscellaneous vessel requirements. <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart 196.15_Tests, Drills, and Inspections</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 196.15-25</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended] </ITAG>182. By removing andSection; 196.15-25(a)(3). 183. By revising andSection; 196.15-35 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 196.15-35</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Abandon-ship training and drills. </ITAG>(a) Abandon-ship training and drills must be conducted as required under_(1) Section 78.17-50 of this chapter for each oceanographic research vesselprovided with lifesaving appliances and arrangements meeting passengervessel requirements, or (2) Section 97.15-35 of this chapter for each oceanographic research vesselprovided with lifesaving appliances and arrangements meeting cargo andmiscellaneous vessel requirements. (b) Wherever the term ``passenger'' is used in andSection; 78.17-50 or andSection;97.15-35 of this chapter, it shall be interpreted as meaning one of thescientific personnel on an oceanographic research vessel for the purposesof this section.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 196.15-37</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed] </ITAG>184. By removing andSection; 196.15-37. 185. By revising andSection; 196.15-40 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 196.15-40</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Fire drills. </ITAG>(a) A fire drill must be conducted on each vessel in alternating weeks.The fire drill must not be conducted as part of the abandon-ship drill,nor immediately prior to or after the abandon-ship drill. If a fire drillcannot be held during the appointed week due to bad weather or other unavoidablereason, the drill must be conducted at the first opportunity followingthe time when the drill would normally have been held. (b) Any member of the crew excused from a fire drill must participate inthe next drill, so that each member participates in at least one fire drilleach month. If more than 25% of the crew have not participated in a firedrill on board that particular vessel in the previous month, a drill mustbe conducted before the vessel leaves port if reasonable and practicable,but not later than 24 hours after the vessel leaves port. The Commandant(G-MVI) may accept other arrangements that are at least equivalent forthose vessels where this is impractical. (c) Each fire drill must include: (1) Summoning of scientific personnel and crew to their stations with thegeneral alarm. (2) Simulation of a fire emergency which varies from drill to drill. (3) Reporting to stations, preparing for, and demonstrating the dutiesassigned under the procedure described in the station bill for the particularfire emergency being simulated. (4) Starting of fire pumps and use of a sufficient number of outlets todetermine that the system is in proper working order. (5) Bringing out each breathing apparatus and other item of rescue andsafety equipment from the emergency equipment lockers, and demonstratingthe use of each item by the person or persons designated to use it. (6) Operating each watertight door used while the vessel is underway. (7) Operation of each self-closing fire door. (8) Closing all fire doors and doors in fire boundaries. (d) Each fire drill must, as far as practicable, be conducted as if therewere an actual emergency. (e) The date when fire drills are held, and details of fire drills mustbe recorded in the vessel's official logbook. Each logbook entry must includethe following, as applicable: (1) The time and date. (2) Length of drill. (3) Number and lengths of hose used. (4) Statement as to the condition of the equipment used. (5) If a full drill is not held at the appointed time, the circumstancesand the extent of the drill held.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 196.15-45</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed] </ITAG>186. By removing andSection; 196.15-45.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 196.15-50</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed] </ITAG>187. By removing andSection; 196.15-50.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 196.15-65</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed]  </ITAG>188. By removing andSection; 196.15-65. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 196.15-70</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed] </ITAG>189. By removing andSection; 196.15-70.190. By revising paragraphs (a)(1) and (a)(6) of andSection; 196.35-5 toread as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 196.35-5</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Actions required to be logged. </ITAG>(a) * * * (1) Abandon-ship training and drills, and fire drills. As held. See andSection;andSection;196.15-35 and 196.15-40. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(6) Survival craft winches. Once in each three months. See andSection; 196.90-73.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart 196.37_Markings for Fire and Emergency Equipment, etc. </ITAG>191. By revising andSection; 196.37-37 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 196.37-37</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Lifeboats and rescue boats. </ITAG>(a) The following must be plainly marked or painted on each side of thebow of each lifeboat and rescue boat in letters and numbers at least 75mm (3 in.) high: (1) The name of the vessel. (2) The number of the boat. The boats on each side of the vessel must benumbered from forward to aft. If there are boats on both sides of the vessel,the odd numbers must be on the starboard side. (3) For vessels in ocean service, the name of the port required to be markedon the stern of the vessel under Subpart 67.13 of this chapter. (b) The following must be plainly marked or painted on each side of thebow of each lifeboat and rescue boat in letters and numbers at least 35mm (1.5 in.) high: (1) The length and beam of the boat. (2) The number of persons capacity of the boat. This number must_ (i) Be the number of persons the lifeboat is equipped for; and (ii) Not be greater than the number of persons the boat is approved for,as shown on its nameplate. (c) The following must be plainly marked or painted on each lifeboat andrescue boat in at least two places visible from above the boat in lettersand numbers not less than 75 mm (3 in.) high: (1) The number of persons capacity of the boat. (2) The name of the vessel. (d) The name of the vessel must be plainly marked or painted on each oarand paddle. (e) On or before July 1, 1991, each lifeboat and rescue boat must be markedwith Type II retroreflective material approved under Subpart 164.018 ofthis chapter. The arrangement of the retroreflective material must meetIMO Resolution [LSR 19/WP.4, Annex 3].192. By adding a new andSection; 196.37-39 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 196.37-39</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Rigid liferafts. </ITAG>(a) The following must be plainly marked or painted near one entrance ofeach rigid liferaft in letters and numbers at least 75 mm (3 in.) high:(1) The name of the vessel. (2) The number of the liferaft. Liferafts stowed on the sides of the vesselmust be numbered in the same manner as the lifeboats. (3) For vessels in ocean service, the name of the port required to be markedon the stern of the vessel under Subpart 67.13 of this chapter. (b) The following must be plainly marked or painted near one entrance ofeach rigid liferaft in letters and numbers at least 35 mm (1.5 in.) high:(1) Either ``SOLAS A Pack'' or ``SOLAS B Pack'' depending upon its equipmentunder andSection; 199.143(b) or andSection; 199.143(c) of this chapter. (2) The length of the painter. (c) The number of persons capacity must be plainly marked or painted overeach entrance to each rigid liferaft in letters and numbers at least 100mm (4 in.) high, in a color contrasting to that of the liferaft. This numbermust_ (1) Be the number of persons the liferaft is equipped for; and (2) Not be greater than the number of persons the liferaft is approvedfor, as shown on its nameplate. (d) The name of the vessel must be plainly marked or painted on each paddle.193. By revising andSection; 196.37-40 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 196.37-40</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Inflatable liferafts. </ITAG>The number of the liferaft and the number of persons it is permitted toaccommodate must be marked or painted in a conspicuous place in the immediatevicinity of each inflatable liferaft in letters and numbers at least 35mm (1.5 in.) high. Liferafts stowed on the sides of the vessel must benumbered in the same manner as the lifeboats. This marking must not beon the inflatable liferaft container.194. By adding a new andSection; 196.37-42 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 196.37-42</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Life floats and buoyant apparatus. </ITAG>(a) The name of the vessel must be plainly marked or painted on each lifefloat and buoyant apparatus, together with their oars and paddles. (b) The number of persons capacity must be plainly marked or painted oneach life float and buoyant apparatus in letters and numbers at least 35mm (1.5 in.) high. This number must_ (1) Be the number of persons the device is equipped for; and (2) Not be greater than the number of persons the device is approved for,as shown on its nameplate.195. By revising andSection; 196.37-43 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 196.37-43</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Lifejackets, immersion suits, and ring life buoys. </ITAG>(a) Each lifejacket, immersion suit, and ring life buoy must be markedin block capital letters with the vessel's name. (b) Each container for lifejackets and immersion suits must be marked inletters and numbers at least 50 mm (2 in.) high with the number and identificationof the items stowed inside and their size. (c) Each ring life buoy on a vessel in ocean service must be marked inblock capital letters with the name of the port required to be marked onthe stern of the vessel under Subpart 67.13 of this chapter. (d) Each stowage position for a ring life buoy must be marked ``LIFE BUOY''.(e) Each lifejacket must be marked with Type I retroreflective materialapproved under Subpart 164.018 of this chapter. The arrangement of theretroreflective material must meet IMO Resolution [LSR 19/WP.4, Annex 3].(f) On or before July 1, 1991, each ring life buoy must be marked withType II retroreflective material approved under Subpart 164.018 of thischapter. The arrangement of the retroreflective material must meet IMOResolution [LSR 19/WP.4, Annex 3].<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note:</T4> Each approved immersion suit is provided with retroreflectivematerial by the manufacturer of the suit.</ITAG>196. By revising andSection; 196.37-49 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 196.37-49</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">EPIRBs and SARTs. </ITAG>The name of the vessel must be plainly marked or painted on each EmergencyPosition Indicating Radio Beacon (EPIRB) and on each Search and RescueTransponder (SART), except for an EPIRB or SART_ (a) In an inflatable liferaft; or (b) Permanently installed in a survival craft. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 196.39-1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed] </ITAG>197. By removing Subpart 196.39 (consisting of andSection; 196.39-1).198. By revising Subpart 196.90 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart 196.90_Operational Readiness, Maintenance and Inspection ofLifesaving Equipment </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 196.90-20</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Operational readiness. </ITAG>The operational readiness, maintenance, and inspection of lifesaving equipmentmust be as required under_ (a) Subpart 78.95 of this chapter for each oceanographic research vesselprovided with lifesaving appliances and arrangements meeting passengervessel requirements, or (b) Subpart 97.90 of this chapter for each oceanographic research vesselprovided with lifesaving appliances and arrangements meeting cargo andmiscellaneous vessel requirements.<ITAG tagnum="6">M.J. Schiro,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Captain, U.S. Coast Guard, Acting Chief, Office of Marine Safety, Securityand Environmental Protection.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Dated: September 8, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Editorial Note:</T4> This document was received by the Office of the<T4>Federal Register, </T4> April 5, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-8366 Filed 4-20-89; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4910-14-M </ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>